<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89307-0036 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.3-07-89.f2.A1035</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Internal Revenue Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">26 CFR Part 1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[EE-130-86]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Benefits Provided Under Certain Employee Benefit Plans</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Internal Revenue Service, Treasury.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This document contains proposed regulations relatingto benefits provided under certain employee benefit plans under sections89 and 125 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. The regulations reflectchanges made by the Revenue Act of 1978, the Tax Reform Act of 1984, theTax Reform Act of 1986, and the Technical and Miscellaneous Revenue Actof 1988. The regulations provide the public with guidance on the nondiscriminationand qualification requirements for certain employee benefit plans and affectsponsors of, and participants in, a variety of types of plans, includingaccident and health plans, group-term life insurance, and dependent careassistance programs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Written comments and requests for a public hearing mustbe delivered or mailed on or before May 8, 1989. The amendments are generallyproposed to apply to plan years beginning after December 31, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Send comments and requests for a public hearing to: Commissionerof Internal Revenue, Attention: CC:CORP:T:R (EE-130-86), Washington, DC20224.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Felix Zech or David Munroe ofthe Office of the Assistant Chief Counsel, Employee Benefits and ExemptOrganizations, Internal Revenue Service, 1111 Constitution Avenue, NW.,Washington, DC 20224 (Attention: CC:CORP:T:R (EE-!30-86)) ((202) 535-3818)(not a toll-free number).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG>The collections of information contained in this notice of proposed rulemakinghave been submitted to the Office of Management and Budget for review inaccordance with the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3504(h)).Comments on the collections of information should be sent to the Officeof Management and Budget, Paperwork Reduction Project, Washington, DC 20503,with copies to the Internal Revenue Service, Attention: IRS Reports ClearanceOfficer TR:FP, Washington. DC 20224. The collections of information in these regulations are in andSection;andSection;1.89(a)-1 and 1.89(k)-1. Certain of this information is required by theInternal Revenue Service to memorialize the method of testing used by theemployer in determining whether it meets the requirements of section 89(a)and correctly reports an employee's wages on the Form W-2. Additional requirementsinclude the preparation of a written plan document, a notice relating tobenefits (both required under section 89(k)). The likely respondents/recordkeepersare employers who provide welfare benefit programs to their employees.These estimates are an approximation of the average time expected to benecessary for a collection of information. They are based on such informationas is available to the Internal Revenue Service. Individual recordkeepersmay require more or less time, depending on their particular circumstances. The burden estimates represent an estimation of the actual time for recordkeeping,learning about the law, computations and testings.  The estimated total annual reporting and/or recordkeeping burden: 9,000,000hours. With respect to learning about the law, testing and making any writtenelections, the estimated annual burden per respondent/recordkeeper variesfrom l hour to 40 hours, depending on individual circumstances, with anestimated average of 10 hours. The estimated number of respondents and/orrecordkeepers: 750,000. With respect to physically preparing the writtenplan, notice and statement relating to employees, the estimated annualburden per respondent/recordkeeper varies from 30 minutes to 4 hours, dependingon individual circumstances, with an estimated average of 2 hours. Theestimated number of respondents and/or recordkeepers: 750,000. Estimatedannual frequency of response (for reporting requirements only): as necessary.<ITAG tagnum="84"> Background </ITAG> This document contains proposed additions to the Income Tax Regulations(26 CFR Part 1) under sections 89 and 125 of the InternaI Revenue Codeof 1986 (Code). The additions with respect to section 89 are proposed toconform the regulations to section 1151 of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (TRA'86) (100 Stat. 2494), and section 3021 of the Technical and MiscellaneousRevenue Act of 1988 (TAMRA '88) (102 Stat. 3625). The additions with respectto section 125 are proposed pursuant to section 134 of the  Revenue Actof 1978 (92 Stat. 2763), section 101 of the Technical Corrections Act of1979 (92 Stat. 2227), section 226 of the Miscellaneous Revenue Act of 1980(94 Stat. 3525), section 531(b)(4) of the Tax Reform Act of 1984 (96 Stat.494), section 1l51 of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (TRA '86) (100 Stat. 2494),and section 1O11B of the Technical and Miscellaneous Revenue Act of 1988(TAMRA '88) (!02 Stat. 3485).  Section 89 was intended, in part, to discourage employers from offeringhealth plans and other welfare benefits that disproportionately favor highlycompensated employees either as to coverage or extent of benefits. A principalobjective of this legislation was to extend health coverage for employeesnot now covered. The sanction for failing to meet nondiscrimination criteriaoutlined in the statute and this implementing rule is the taxation of theexcess value of highly compensated employees' benefits.  To help provide an improved basis for evaluation of the specific contentand effect of the statute and these regulations, comments are invited onchanges in plan provisions, the numbers and types of employee eligiblefor plans affected by these regulations, and employee participation ratesthat may be associated with one or more changes proposed in these regulations.Information indicating the effect on particular groups of employees identifiedby wage leve1s, occupations, industries or other characteristics wouldbe especially useful. Comments also are invited on the expected effecton costs to  employers and health providers which result from particularrequirements.<ITAG tagnum="84">Explanation of Rules </ITAG>The proposed regulations include guidance in three general areas. First,they provide information with respect to miscellaneous matters relatingto the nondiscrimination rules of section 89(a). Second, the proposed regulationscontain detailed guidance with respect to the qualification requirementsof section 89(k). Finally, the proposed regulations include questions andanswers relating to section l25 (cafeteria plans) and supplementing theexisting proposed regulations contained at andSection; 1.125-1 (49 FR 19321).The proposed regulations include a variety of special rules to facilitatethe application of and compliance with sections 89 and 125, particularlyfor plan years beginning in 1989.1. In GeneralThese proposed regulations constitute the issuance of comprehensive section89 rules on which taxpayers may rely. Nevertheless, until the later ofJanuary 1, 1990, or the beginning of the second testing year beginningafter December 31, 1988, if an employer reasonably and in good faith complieswith the requirements of section 89 (including the legislative historythereto), the employer will be treated as having satisfied section 89.After this transition period, this standard of compliance will not applyto the extent that these proposed regulations address issues under section89. Whether compliance is reasonable and in good faith is to be determinedon the basis of all the facts and circumstances, including whether theemployer makes a reasonable and good faith effort to collect and analyzethe necessary data and information, and whether the employer consistentlyresolves unclear issues in its favor.These questions and answers do not provide comprehensive guidance on certainissues. For example, no guidance is provided on the special multiemployerplan rules adopted in TAMRA '88. In addition, this guidance does not addressthe separate line of business rules of section 414(r) or the extent towhich additional employer disaggregation is available under section 89.In addition, the proposed regulations generally do not address the applicationof section 89 to group-term life insurance. These matters will be addressedin future guidance.The proposed regulations also do not address certain issues with regardto the application of section 89 to former employees and with regard towho is an excludable employee under section 89(h). Nevertheless, underthe excludable employee rules, if any employee included in a collectivebargaining unit receives any employer-provided benefit, no employee inthat collective bargaining unit may be treated as an excludable employeemerely because the employee is a member of the collective bargaining unit.This is the case without regard to the fact that the employer-providedbenefit is in the form of an employer contribution under a collective bargainingagreement to a multiemployer plan. See section 1151(k) of TRA '86 and paragraph(a)(2) of Question and Answer (Qandamp;A) 10 of the proposed regulation forthe effective date of section 89 for certain collectively bargained plans.The proposed regulations provide that, in general, section 414(n) appliesto employee benefit plans covered by section 89 in the same manner as itapplies to qualified plans covered by section 401(a). They also includea delegation to the Commissioner to provide guidance in the form of revenuerulings, notices or other publications of general applicability on theextent to which the differing nature of these types of plans require differentrules. The Service invites comments on the manner in which the leased employeerules apply to plans covered by section 89 and, in particular, on the extentto which different rules are appropriate.The proposed regulations also clarify that plans are not exempt from section89 merely because they are maintained by the federal government, stateor local governments, or employee organizations. In addition, plans maintainedby tax-exempt entities are subject to the requirements of section 89, withthe exception that a plan maintained exclusively for church employees byan entity described in section 3121(w) is not required to satisfy the requirementsof section 89.If the public wishes to comment on the content and timing of additionalguidance that may be required to implement the law, the Service will considerthese comments in developing further guidance. In particular, the Serviceinvites comments regarding the exclusion of certain classes of employeesfor purposes of applying the nondiscrimination rules of section 89 (e.g.,prisoners incarcerated in federal or state institutions or clients in shelteredworkshops maintained by charitable entities) similar to the exclusion providedin the safe harbors in Notice 89-23, l989-8 I.R.B. 25.2. Nondiscrimination RequirementsSection 89(a) is generally applicable to accident and health plans withinthe meaning of sections 105 and 106 (health plans) and group-term lifeinsurance plans within the meaning of section 79. In addition, an employermay elect to treat certain other plans as subject to section 89(a). Theterm ``benefit'' appears throughout the proposed regulations. Unless indicatedotherwise, the term ``benefit'' in connection with the nondiscriminationrequirements of section 89(a) means the value of the coverage providedunder the plan in the case of insurance type plans and, in the case ofnoninsurance type plans, the value of the payments, reimbursements, servicesand products provided under the plan. The proposed regulation containedat andSection; 1.89(a)-1 includes questions and answers relating to nondiscriminationrules for purposes of section 89.Qandamp;A-1 of andSection; 1.89(a)-1 sets forth in general terms the nondiscriminationtests applicable under section 89(a). In general, an employer has two approachesto nondiscrimination testing under section 89. Under the first approach,an employer's employee benefit plan satisfies section 89(a) only if (i)at least 50 percent of the employees eligible to participate in a planare nonhighly compensated employees (the 50 percent eligibility test);(ii) at least 90 percent of the nonhighly compensated employees are eligibleto participate in the plan or plans of the same type that, on an aggregatebasis, are at least 50 percent as valuable as the combined value of theplans of the same type that are available to any highly compensated employee(the 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test); and (iii) the average benefitreceived by nonhighly compensated employees under all plans of the sametype is at least 75 percent of the average benefit received by highly compensatedemployees under such plans (the 75 percent benefits test).Under the second approach, an employer's employee benefit plan satisfiessection 89(a) only if it benefits at least 80 percent of the employer'snonhighly compensated employees (the 80 percent coverage test). An employermay elect to test its health and group-term life insurance plans (and determineexcess benefits, if any) under the 80 percent coverage test notwithstandingthe fact that the first approach would produce different amounts of excessbenefits. Under either of the two approaches, a plan fails to satisfy section 89(a)if the plan contains any provision that by its terms, operation or otherwisediscriminates in favor of highly compensated employees (the nondiscriminatoryprovisions test). For 1989 and 1990, an employer may decide to adopt an alternative to the75 percent benefits test for its health plans. Under this alternative,set forth in Qandamp;A-2, an employer must treat as includible in gross income(i.e., as discriminatory excess benefits) all employer-provided coverageunder its health plans with respect to certain highly compensated employees.Also, if an employer adopts this alternative for 1989, the employer mayuse a modified version of the 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test underwhich at least 80 percent of the nonhighly compensated employees must beeligible to participate in plans of the same type that, on an aggregatebasis, are at least 66 percent as valuable as the aggregate value of theplans of the same type available to any highly compensated employee. Fortesting years ending in 1990, this modified version of the 90 percent/50percent eligibility test is not available and the class of highly compensatedemployees who are considered to receive taxable employer-provided healthcoverage under the alternative to the 75 percent benefits test is broadened. Qandamp;A-2 also provides a permanent alternative to the general nondiscriminationtests for certain large employers whose employees are substantially allnonhighly compensated employees. Under this alternative, an employer'shealth plans satisfy section 89(a) if the employer employs at least 5,000individuals; at least 90 percent of the full-time active employees arenonhighly compensated employees; less than 0.75 percent of all active employeeshave compensation in excess of twice the section 414(q)(1)(C) amount ($50,000indexed); at least 80 percent of those employees eligible to participatein each plan are nonhighly compensated employees and 80 percent of thenonhighly  compensated employees have available to them under all healthplans a health benefit that is at least 80 percent as valuable as the largestsuch benefits available to any highly compensated employee; and at least66 percent of all nonhighly compensated employees receive core health benefitsthat are at least 66 percent as valuable as the largest such benefit availableto any highly compensated employee. In addition, the nondiscriminatoryprovisions test must be satisfied. This alternative is only available todetermine if any employer's health plan or plans are discriminatory: itis not available to determine the amount of excess benefits. Core health coverage generally means comprehensive major medical and hospitalizationcoverage. Dental, vision and health coverages provided under flexible spendingarrangements (see paragraph (c) of Qandamp;A-7 of proposed andSection; 1.125-2)are not core health benefits. Note that the definition of ``core healthcoverage'' under section 89 is not necessarily the same as the definitionof ``core coverage'' under section 4980B (COBRA continuation coverage)and, therefore, no inference should be drawn from these proposed regulationswith respect to the meaning of such term under section 4980B. Qandamp;A-3 details the treatment of family and other coverage under section89 and the extent to which such coverages may be tested separately fromemployee-only coverage. Included in Qandamp;A-3 is guidance relating to theuse of sworn statements when employee-only coverage is to be tested separately.The proposed  regulations state that a sworn statement need not be notarizedbut, for testing years commencing on or after January 1, 1990, a swornstatement must be made under penalty of perjury. An example of a swornstatement is provided. Qandamp;A-4 sets forth rules relating to health plan comparability and healthplan aggregation for the purposes of the 50 percent eligibility test andthe 80 percent coverage tests. These rules were changed extensively byTAMRA '88. The comparability rules in the proposed regulations generallyenable health plans that fail the 50 percent eligibility test or the 80percent coverage test on an individual basis to satisfy such tests on agroup basis. Qandamp;A-5 and Qandamp;A-6 of the proposed regulation set forth the methodfor nondiscrimination testing. Qandamp;A-5 states that testing for compliancewith the nondiscrimination requirements of section 89(a) is done by referenceto the employees employed on, and benefits provided for, a single day (thetesting day), and such results are then annualized for the entire testingyear with adjustments to reflect certain benefit changes during the testingyear (both before and after the testing day). In general, the facts onthe testing day must be adjusted to reflect benefit changes due to changesin plan terms and, in the case of highly compensated employees, changesin elections by such employees. lf the terms of available plans changeduring an open season, benefit changes that occur due to elections duringthat open season are considered changes due to changes in plan terms. Theproposed regulation contains a transition rule for 1989 that generallyallows benefit changes prior to July 1, 1989 to be disregarded. The employer must designate a uniform 12-month testing period for allits plans of the same type. In certain circumstances, an employer may electa short testing year. To the extent that the employer elects to test plansof different types together for purposes of certain nondiscrimination tests,all these plans must be tested on a uniform testing year. Thus, if an employertests its group-term life insurance plans with its dependent care assistanceprograms for purposes of the 75 percent benefits test, all such plans andprograms must be tested on the same 12-month period. The same rule applieswhere the employer aggregates its health plans with its group-term lifeinsurance plans to enable its group-term life insurance plans to satisfythe requirements of the 75 percent benefits test. As set forth in Qandamp;A-6, the first testing year of an employer withrespect to plans of the same type generally must begin on the first dayof the first plan year that any plan of that type is subject to section89. Also, the employer may use an earlier testing year, including the calendaryear, for 1989. Thus, for testing years beginning in 1989, the employeris required to test all its plans of the same type together even thoughnot all of such plans are subject to the requirements of section 89 forthe entire testing year. In these circumstances, the proposed regulationrequires an employer to test all benefits under the plans as if they weresubject to section 89 for the entire  testing year. However, in determiningany excess benefits under the plans, Qandamp;A-6 contains rules under whichan employer may prorate the amount of any excess to reflect the extentto which coverage is subject to section 89.Qandamp;A-7 sets forth rules relating to valuing coverage under a healthplan. These rules apply until the Service publishes valuation proceduresunder section 89(g)(3)(B). Qandamp;A-7 provides that an employer may useany reasonable method for valuing a health plan and specifies that thecost of the health plan is a reasonable method of valuation. Specifically,in valuing coverage an employer is permitted to use the cost of the applicablepremium under section 4980B(f)(4) for continuation coverage under a grouphealth plan and is permitted to adjust the premium for differences relatedto geographic locale, the demographics of the participant population, andutilization. No inference should be drawn from Qandamp;A-7 concerning themethod that may be used to determine the applicable premium under section4980B(f)(4). The proposed regulation clarifies that cost containment features may bedisregarded under a reasonable method of valuation. Similarly, the factthat a delivery system used by a plan is different from a delivery systemused by another plan should not affect the values of such plans. Thus,the fact that one plan is provided through a health maintenance organizationand another through a traditional indemnity program should not cause thevalue of the plans to differ as long as the coverage under both plans issubstantially similar. The method of valuing health plans used by an employer for purposes ofsection 89 must be applied consistently for all the employer's health plans,except that the employer may use the cost method described in section 89(g)(3)(E)for multiemployer plans. When determining the amount of excess benefits under section 89(b), anemployer is required to use the cost method used for determining the applicablepremium under section 4980B(f)(4), even if that was not the valuation methodthe employer used for testing purposes. This method must be used for calculatingboth the highly and nonhighly compensated employees' employer-providedbenefits when excess benefits for highly compensated employees are determined.The only permissible adjustment to this method is for differences in thepremium due to utilization. Qandamp;A-7 also sets forth the method of valuing coverage under flexiblespending arrangements that provide health benefits. See Qandamp;A-7 of andSection;1.125-2 of the proposed regulation for the definition of a flexible spendingarrangement. Such coverage is to be valued on the basis of its cost (ingeneral, the premium required for the health coverage under the arrangement).As is the case with any valuation method, the fact that a premium is notpaid does not affect the value of the coverage so long as the coverageis provided. Qandamp;A-8 of the proposed regulation contains an explanation of the treatmentof salary reduction contributions under the nondiscrimination tests ofsection 89. Salary reduction contributions generally are defined as elective,pre-tax contributions under a cafeteria plan. TAMRA '88 contains a provisionallowing, in certain cases, salary reduction contributions to be takeninto account as employer contributions in performing the 90 percent/50percent eligibility test. In addition to this provision, the proposed regulationdescribes circumstances in which certain salary reduction contributionsby highly compensated employees must be taken into account as employercontributions and circumstances in which certain salary reduction contributionsby nonhighly compensated employees must be treated as after-tax employeecontributions. This mandatory treatment of salary reduction contributionsapplies to testing years beginning after 1989. Qandamp;A-9 sets forth the method by which excess benefits provided undera discriminatory employee benefit plan are to be calculated. Qandamp;A-10 contains guidance relating to the effective dates of the nondiscriminationand qualification requirements. Generally, the requirements apply to plansfor plan years that commence on or after January 1, 1989. With respectto health plans, a special rule applies if the designated plan year ofsuch a plan begins later in calendar year 1989 than the plan year for suchhealth plan began in 1988.Section 89 provides a later effective date that may apply with respectto collectively bargained plans. In the case of a plan maintained pursuantto a collective bargaining agreement ratified before March l, 1986, therules under section 89 do not apply to employees covered by such agreementin years beginning before the earlier of January 1, 1991, or the date onwhich the last collective bargaining agreement relating to the plan expires(determined without regard to any extension thereof after February 28,1986). Thus, such a collectively bargained plan is not subject to section89 before the date determined under the preceding sentence, and collectivelybargained employees under such a plan may be treated as excludable employeesuntil such date for purposes of applying section 89 to those other plansof the same type of the employer that are subject to section 89. The proposedregulation provides that the employer may elect to take all such otherwiseexcludable collectively bargained employees under a plan into account and,in so doing, to accelerate the effective date with respect to the collectivelybargained plan for purposes of the nondiscrimination tests. 3. Qualification Requirements Under Section 89(k) Unless statutory employee benefit plans and certain other plans meet therequirements of section 89(k) employer-provided benefits received undersuch plans are includible in an employee's gross income, notwithstandingthe fact that the employer-provided benefits are otherwise excludable underthe Code. The term ``benefit'' for purposes of the section 89(k) qualificationrequirements, in contrast to the definition of the term ``benefit'' forpurposes of the nondiscrimination tests, means the value of the payments,reimbursements, services and products provided under the plan. In order to meet the requirements of section 89(k), a plan must be in writing,legally enforceable, maintained for the exclusive benefit of employees,and established with the intent that it will be maintained for an indefiniteperiod of time. In addition, an employer must provide those who are eligibleto participate in the plan with reasonable notice of benefits availableunder the plan. Section 89(k) applies to statutory employee benefit plans and certain othertypes of plans maintained by an employer. Section 89(k) generally appliesto the following types of plans, regardless of whether such plans are subjectto nondiscrimination testing under section 89(a): Accident and health plans;group-term life insurance plans; dependent care assistance programs; qualifiedtuition reduction programs; cafeteria plans; fringe benefit programs providingno-additional-cost services, qualified employee discounts, or employer-operatedeating facilities, the benefits from which are otherwise excludable fromthe gross income of the beneficiary; and plans to which section 505 applies.The list of specific kinds of plans contained in the proposed regulationthat are of a type to which section 89(k) applies is not intended to beexhaustive. The proposed regulation contains several special rules with respect toaccident or health plans. In general, an accident or health plan is notsubject to section 89(k) unless the employer-provided benefits under theplan are (or are intended to be) excludable from gross income under section105(b) or (c). Thus, for example, sick pay and disability plans are generallynot subject to the rules of section 89(k). Because coverages under accidental death and dismemberment (ADandamp;D plans)plans and business travel accidental death plans are eligible for the exclusionunder section 106, benefits provided pursuant to such coverages are excludableunder sections 101 and 105(c). Thus, such plans are subject to the provisionsof section 89(k). The coverages and benefits under these plans, like otheraccident or health plans the coverage of which is excludable (or of a kindthat is excludable) under section 106, may not be excluded under section132. If a death benefit under an ADandamp;D plan is not conditioned on theaccidental death of the employee, that benefit is not part of an ADandamp;Dplan.The proposed regulation states that a plan that is a part of an organizationdescribed in section 501(c)(9) or 501(c)(17) must meet the requirementsof section 89(k) and that, to the extent that the plan provides benefitsof the type provided by statutory employee benefit plans, such benefitsmust be considered in nondiscrimination testing under section 89. If aplan does not meet the requirements of section 89(k), the related organizationis not exempt from tax under section 501(a). Section 89 applies to theplan that is part of a voluntary employees' beneficiary association (VEBA)even if the VEBA is a collectively bargained VEBA as described in section505(a)(2). Section 89(k)(1)(A) provides that a plan must be in writing. The proposedregulation provides that all of the material terms of a plan must be oontainedin a single written document. However, the document may incorporate materialterms by reference to other documents rather than setting forth such termsin full. The proposed regulation also clarifies that a single written documentmay satisfy the writing requirement for several plans. Similarly, materialterms contained in one document related to several plans may be incorporatedin each of the single written documents for such plans. These rules havebeen included to give employers the flexibility to group their plans inwritten documents in various ways so long as all of the coverage is infact in writing. Both the proposed regulation and section 89 require that an employer'selections with respect to nondiscrimination testing be in writing. If anysuch election is not in writing it is waived. For example, if no testingyear is designated in writing with regard to any health plan, all healthplans must be tested on the calendar year. The nondiscrimination testinge1ections are not required to be in the single written document. Consequently,the failure to make an election in writing does not cause a plan to failto meet the writing requirement. The proposed regulation provides that a plan must be in writing priorto the first day on which coverage or benefits are available under theplan. There is a transition rule under which a plan is not required tomeet the writing requirement of section 89(k) before the later of the beginningof the first day of the second plan year beginning after December 31, 1988,and the end of the 12-month period beginning on the first day of the firstplan year that the plan is subject to section 89.  Section 89(k)(1)(B) provides that a plan must be legally enforceable.The intent of this provision is to ensure that the employer cannot exerciseexcessive discretion. Therefore, the proposed regulation provides that,in general, the conditions required for an employee to participate in orobtain a benefit under a plan must be definitely determinable and the employeemust be able to compel the coverage or payment of benefits described inthe plan. Except in certain circumstances, a plan fails the enforceabilityrequirement if coverage or a benefit available under the plan is subjectto the discretion of the employer, either in operation or under the termsof the plan. Nevertheless, the proposed regulation permits employer discretionrelating to certain administrative acts. In addition, an employer generallymay expand coverage on a retroactive basis if the employer memorializessuch expansion in writing, provides notice of such expansion, and meetsthe permanence requirements of section 89(k) with regard to the expandedcoverage. The fact that such limited employer discretion does not violatethe  enforceability requirement of section 89(k) does not mean that, undercertain circumstances, such employer discretion would not cause the planto fail the nondiscrimination tests of section 89, in particular the nondiscriminatoryprovisions test of section 89(d)(1)(C).  The proposed regulation contemplates that many cost containment featuresexisting in the health care industry today do not violate the enforceabilityrequirements of section 89(k). For example, a managed care program thatallows an insurer to grant a benefit not otherwise available under theplan in lieu of a benefit described in the plan does not violate the enforceabilityrequirement if the patient, the employer and the insurance company consentto such alternative, a physician recommends or concurs with such alternative,and the plan describes the possibility of such alternative as well as thegeneral criteria under which such alternative is available and may be selected.Similarly, health benefits may be conditioned on a medical opinion of aphysician.  The proposed regulation contains a transition rule with regard to theenforceability rules of section 89(k). A plan is not required to satisfythe enforceability rules outlined in the proposed regulation before thefirst day of the second plan year that the plan is subject to section 89. Section 89(k)(1)(C) provides that employees must be provided reasonablenotification of benefits available in a plan. The purpose of this requirementis to inform an individual who is  eligible to participate in the planof its essential features. Therefore, the proposed regulation requiresthat individuals eligible for coverage or benefits under a plan be providedwith a summary explanation of these features, including directions concerningthe method by which individuals may receive more information. Such noticemust be given to an individual prior to the initial availability of coverageor benefits to such individual.  The proposed regulation states that the employer must provide the notice.ln the case of a multiemployer plan, the plan administrator must providethe notice. Nevertheless, the notice requirements are satisfied if an insurancecompany or other health care insurer or provider (e.g., a health maintenanceorganization) provides the notice.  The proposed regulation provides a transition rule for the notice requirementfor plan years commencing in 1989. Under this rule, an employer is notrequired to provide notice to employees for any such plan year until July1, 1989. Thus, for example, an employer is first required to provide noticeunder section 89(k) with respect to a calendar year plan by July 1, 1989.Similarly, with respect to a plan that uses a September 1 through August30 plan year, notice under section 89(k) is first required by September1, 1989. The delay in the notice to employees under this rule does notpreclude the transitional relief providing for a delay in the requirementthat a plan be in writing. The reporting, notification and written plan requirements under this regulationare in addition to, and not in lieu of, reporting, disclosure, notificationand written plan requirements which may otherwise apply under Title I ofthe Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 or any other law.  Section 89(k)(1)(D) provides that a plan must be maintained for the exclusivebenefit of employees. The purpose of the exclusive benefit requirementis to preclude an employer from extending its plan to individuals who haveno current or prior employment-type relationship with the employer. Theproposed regulation provides, in general, that a plan must be maintainedfor the exclusive benefit of those employees who are described in the planas eligible to participate. A plan may fail this requirement by its termsor through its operation.  The proposed regulation provides rules concerning who may participateunder a plan. In general, only individuals who are or who are treated asemployees (or former employees) of the employer or who otherwise performservices for the employer may participate under a plan of the employer.The proposed regulation does not have any effect on any other existingor future eligibility rule concerning who may participate in a plan. Thus,for example, a self-employed individual described in section 401(c)(1)cannot be a participant in a cafeteria plan even though such individualis treated as an employee for purposes of section 89(k).   There is a transition rule relating to the applicability of the exclusivebenefit requirement. The proposed regulation provides that an employeris not required to meet the exclusive benefit requirement until the firstday of the second plan year that the plan is subject to section 89.  Section 89(k)(1)(E) requires that a plan must be established with theintention that it will be maintained for an indefinite period of time.The proposed regulation focuses on the operation of the plan, as opposedto the plan terms, in determining whether the plan was intended to be maintainedfor an indefinite period of time. Accordingly, if a plan is materiallyamended or terminated and the coverage has been in effect for at leasta consecutive 12-month period, the requirement of section 89(k)(1)(E) issatisfied, regardless of any terms of the plan which may provide that theemployer has the right to change or terminate the plan. However, if a planis materially amended or terminated before the coverage has been in effectfor a consecutive 12-month period, the plan is considered to have beenestablished with the intent of being temporary, unless the employer candemonstrate that there is a substantial business purpose for such terminationor amendment.  The proposed regulation contains several rules relating to the sanctionunder section 89(k). In general, the proposed regulation provides thatif a plan fails to satisfy the qualification requirements of section 89(k),the value of the employer-provided benefits received (rather than the valueof the  coverage provided), is not excludable from gross income. Thus,for example, the exclusions provided in sections 101 and 105 are generallynot available with respect to benefits provided under an accident or healthplan. All employees who receive benefits are subject to this sanction withoutregard to whether they are highly compensated employees within the meaningof section 414(q).  The proposed regulation contains a rule that allows correction of failuresto comply with section 89(k) in certain circumstances. If there is a deminimis failure to comply with certain requirements, the employer may correctthe failure within 90 days of its occurrence. If the employer timely correctsthe failure, the plan does not fail section 89(k) merely because of suchfailure. A failure is not de minimis under this rule if correction requiresthe amendment of the plan document to reduce coverage on a retroactivebasis to conform the document to the operation of the plan.  The proposed regulation clarifies the definition of a plan with respectto the sanction under section 89(k). In the case of a health plan, to theextent that the coverage providing the benefit taxable by reason of section89(k) may reasonably be separated from other plan coverage, the proposedregulation permits the failed portion of the plan to be treated as a separateplan.  The proposed regulation provides for a limitation on the amount that mustbe included in the income of an employee as a  result of section 89(k).The limitation is the sum of the following (dollar amounts are indexedin accordance with section 414(q)(1)(C)): 10 percent of the first $50,000of the employee's compensation; 25 percent for amounts of such compensationin excess of $50,000 and up to $100,000; 75 percent for amounts of suchcompensation in excess of $100,000 and up to $150,000; and 100 percentof compensation in excess of $150,000. In addition, the Commissioner, throughrevenue rulings, notices or other publication of general applicability,is authorized to adjust the amounts of the sanction where such adjustmentis appropriate and is not inconsistent with the purposes of section 89(k).Section 213 governs whether the amount includible in income as a resultof section 89(k) is deductible.If the sanction under section 89(k) is imposed with regard to a benefitunder coverage that is determined under section 89(a) to discriminate infavor of a highly compensated employee, the proposed regulation providesfor the coordination of the two sanctions. In general, the higher of thetwo taxable amounts must be included in the gross income of the highlycompensated employee. 4. Miscellaneous Matters Relating to Section 125 Proposed andSection; 1.125-2 contains seven questions and answers that supplementand, in part, update the questions and answers contained in proposed regulationsunder andSection; 1.125-1 that were published on May 7, 1984 (49 FR 19321),and amended on December 31, 1984 (49 FR 50733). Qandamp;A-1 of proposed andSection;1.125-2 provides that Qandamp;A-2 through Qandamp;A-6 of that section are generallyeffective in accordance with the effective date provisions of section 89(generally plan years commencing after December 31, 1988). In addition,Qandamp;A-1 provides that Qandamp;A-7 of proposed andSection; 1.125-2 (relatingto flexible spending arrangements subject to sections 106 and 105) appliesto plan years beginning after December 31, 1989. Many of the questions and answers under andSection; 1.125-2 clarify previouslyproposed andSection; 1.125-1 as well as andSection; 1.125-2T of the TemporaryRegulations published on February 4, 1986 (51 FR 4318). To the extent theprovisions of proposed andSection; 1.125-2 clarify the provisions of proposedandSection;andSection; 1.125-1 or 1.125-2T and are less restrictive, the Servicewill apply them as if contained in those regulations. However, consistentwith the statement in the preamble to the May 7, 1984 Notice of ProposedRulemaking, to the extent that the provisions of proposed andSection; 1.125-2clarify the provisions of proposed andSection;andSection; 1.125-1 and 1.125-2Tand are more restrictive, the Service will apply them only as set forthin Qandamp;A-1 of proposed andSection; 1.125-2. Qandamp;A-2 and Qandamp;A-3 of the proposed regulation under andSection; 1.125-2restate the general requirements of section 125. Qandamp;A-4 sets forth whatbenefits are treated as qualified benefits and what benefits constitutecash under a cafeteria plan. For example, Qandamp;A-4 provides that a benefitthat is taxable because it is determined to be an excess benefit undersection 89(b) or because the plan fails to satisfy section 89(k) remainsa qualified benefit under section 125. As a result of this provision acafeteria plan may provide such taxable benefits. The proposed regulation provides further guidance with regard to the rulethat a cafeteria plan may not operate to defer compensation. Thus, underQandamp;A-5, to the extent that a benefit carries over to the following planyear, such benefit may not be offered under a cafeteria plan. For example,life or health insurance with a savings or investment feature (e.g., so-calledwhole-life or whole-health insurance) may not be offered in a cafeteriaplan. Qandamp;A-5 also contains a rule to determine the extent to which theinclusion of elective vacation days under a cafeteria plan operates topermit the deferral of compensation. A cafeteria plan may permit employees to make elective contributions undera qualified cash or deferred arrangement described in section 401(k). Similarly,a cafeteria plan does not impermissibly allow the deferral of compensationmerely because, as an option under the plan, employees may make after-taxemployee contributions under a qualified plan that is subject to section401(m). Finally, the deferred compensation prohibition does not preventan employer from providing employer matching contributions subject to section401(m) with respect to elective contributions under section 401(k) or after-taxemployee contributions subject to section 401(m). Qandamp;A-6 clarifies and expands the rule contained in proposed andSection;1.125-1 concerning when an employee may revoke a benefit election and makea new election under a cafeteria plan. In general, Qandamp;A-6 provides thata plan may allow such a revocation and subsequent election in the followingcircumstances: When a third-party health care insurer or provider significantlyincreases the cost to the employee of coverage or significantly curtailsor ceases coverage; when the participant has a change in family status;or when the participant has separated from service. In addition, a cafeteriaplan may provide that a benefit ceases if the participant has ceased makingrequired premium payments. Finally, a cafeteria plan may allow a revocationor modification with respect to elective contributions subject to section401(k) and after-tax employee contributions subject to section 401(m),to the extent such modification or revocation is permitted under section401(k) or 401(m). Qandamp;A-7 contains special rules applicable to health plans that are flexiblespending arrangements (FSAs). These rules are intended to protect the integrityof the distinction between the taxable treatment of personal medical expenses(subject to the rules of section 213) and the more favorable tax treatmentof employer-provided health plan coverage and benefits under section 106or 105, including benefits received under employee-purchased accident orhealth coverage under section 104. In general, if a health plan has a low maximum limitation on benefits andthe amount of the premium for coverage is the same or similar to this limitationon benefits, there is a significant concern that the plan operates primarilyto exclude from income amounts paid for personal medical expenses thatwould otherwise only be deductible under section 213 to the extent thatthey exceed 7.5 percent of adjusted gross income. This concern is greaterif, with respect to such plan, there is no person, such as an employeror insurance company, who bears a risk of experience loss with respectto the health plan and thus has an interest in regulating the arrangementto minimize adverse selection and substantiate claimed expenses. In orderto limit the extent to which health FSAs effectively operate to excludeamounts paid for personal medical expenses, Qandamp;A-7 applies requirementsto health FSAs that are similar to the requirements that an independenthealth insurer with a meaningful risk of loss would apply to protect againstadverse selection and the inappropriate reimbursement of expenses. Thus,the requirements in the proposed regulation are consistent with those featuresthat are commonly associated with arrangements that exhibit the basic risk-shiftingand risk-spreading characteristics of insurance. Qandamp;A-7 clarifies that an employee's salary reduction contributions undera health FSA are payments of a premium by the employee for health coveragewith respect to which the maximum reimbursement amount is the same or similarto the amount of the required premium. Therefore, health FSAs are bonafide plans and are not separate, employee-by-employee, health expense reimbursementaccounts that operate in a manner similar to employee-funded, defined contributionplans. The maximum amount of reimbursement available under a health FSAat any particular time with respect to an individual cannot be based onthe amount of premium that the individual has paid as of such time. Rather,the maximum reimbursement amount must be uniform throughout the coverageperiod. In addition, health FSAs cannot reimburse employees for premiumsfor other health coverage. Finally, because there is no party directlyinvolved in an FSA with an interest in assuring that claims are bona fide,the proposed regulation imposes certain claims substantiation requirementsfor FSAs.Under the proposed regulation, experience gains under health FSAs (i.e.,premiums in excess of claims paid plus expenses) may be treated as gainsunder bona fide health plans. Thus, such gains may be available to payreasonable and bona fide dividends or premium refunds to the premium payers.Similarly, experience gains may be used to reduce required premiums forcoverage in future years. For example, experience gains for one year maybe used in a second year to permit the health FSA to charge all eligibleemployees only a $490 premium for coverage with a $500 reimbursement maximum.In no case, however, may the treatment of experience gains under a healthFSA have the effect, directly or indirectly, of reimbursing employees basedon their individual claims.<ITAG tagnum="84"> Reliance on These Proposed Regulations </ITAG>Taxpayers may rely on these proposed regulations for guidance pending theissuance of final regulations. Because these proposed regulations are generallyeffective for years beginning after December 31, 1988, the Service willapply these proposed regulations in issuing rulings and in examining returnswith respect to taxpayers and plans after that date. If future regulationsare more restrictive than these proposed regulations, such regulationswill be applied without retroactive effect.<ITAG tagnum="84">Special Analyses </ITAG>The Commissioner of Internal Revenue has determined that this proposedrule is not a major rule as defined in Executive Order 12291 and that aregulatory impact analysis is therefore not required. Although this documentis a notice of proposed rulemaking which solicits public comments, theInternal Revenue Service has concluded that the regulations proposed hereinare interpretative and that the notice and public procedure requirementsof 5 U.S.C. 553 do not apply. Accordingly, the proposed regulations donot constitute regulations subject to the Regulatory Flexibility Act (5U.S.C. Chapter 6).<ITAG tagnum="84"> Comments and Requests for Public Hearing</ITAG>Before adopting these proposed regulations, consideration will be givento any written comments that are submitted (preferably eight copies) tothe Commissioner of Internal Revenue. All comments will be available forpublic inspection and copying. A public hearing will be held upon writtenrequest to the Commissioner by any person who has submitted written comments.If a public hearing is held, notice of the time and place will be publishedin the <T4>Federal Register. </T4><ITAG tagnum="84">Drafting Information</ITAG>The principal authors of the proposed regulations are Felix Zech, DavidMunroe, and Steven Miller of the Office of the Assistant Chief Counsel(Employee Benefits and Exempt Organizations). However, personnel from otheroffices of the Internal Revenue Service and Treasury Department participatedin developing the proposed regulations on matters of both substance andstyle.<ITAG tagnum="74">Table of Contents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Sec. 1.89(a)-1  Miscellaneous questions and answers relating to nondiscriminationrules.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-1: What are the section 89 nondiscrimination rules?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-2: What transitional and special rules are available to health plansunder section 89?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-3: Under what circumstances may employees be disregarded for purposesof section 89 when the employees receive health coverage from other employersor when employees do not have a family or have a family whose members receivehealth coverage from another employer?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-4: What is a health plan under the section 89 nondiscriminationrules and to what extent are health plans comparable or aggregated forpurposes of such rules?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-5: What is the testing methodology for applying the nondiscriminationrules under section 89?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-6: What is the period for testing whether the nondiscriminationrules of section 89 are satisfied?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-7: For purposes of applying section 89 to an employer's health plan,what rules apply for determining the employer-provided benefit and calculatingthe excess benefits?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-8: How are salary reduction contributions treated for purposes ofthe section 89 nondiscrimination tests?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-9: How is an excess benefit under the section 89 nondiscriminationrules to be determined with respect to health plans?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-10: What are the effective dates of the section 89 nondiscriminationand qualification rules? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Sec. 1.89(k)-1 Qualification requirements for certain employee welfarebenefit plans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-1: What is required under section 89(k)?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-2: What plans must meet the requirements of section 89(k)?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-3: What is required under the writing requirement of section 89(k)(1)(A)?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-4: When is a plan legally enforceable within the meaning of section89(k)(1)(B)?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-5: What constitutes reasonable notification of employees under section89(k)(1)(C)?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-6: How does an employer meet the exclusive benefit requirement ofsection 89(k)(1)(D)?    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-7: How is it determined whether a plan was established with theintent of being maintained for an indefinite period of time? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-8: What is the sanction for failure to meet the requirements ofsection 89(k)? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Sec. 1.125-1 Questions and answers relating to cafeteria plans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-30: Are there additional rules for cafeteria plans? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Sec. 1.125-2 Miscellaneous Cafeteria Plan questions and answers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-1: What are the effective dates for these cafeteria plan rules?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-2: What does section 125 of the Code provide? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-3: What is a cafeteria plan under section 125? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-4: What benefits constitute qualified benefits and what benefitsconstitute cash under a cafeteria plan? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-5: May a cafeteria plan include a benefit that defers the receiptof compensation? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-6: In what circumstances may participants revoke existing electionsand make new elections under a cafeteria plan? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Q-7: How do the rules governing the tax-favored treatment of employer-providedbenefits apply to plans that are flexible spending arrangements? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 26 CFR 1.61-1 Through 1.281-1 </ITAG>Deductions, Exemptions, Income taxes, Taxable income. <ITAG tagnum="84">Proposed Amendments to the Regulations </ITAG>The proposed amendments to 26 CFR Part 1 are as follows: <ITAG tagnum="84">Income Tax Regulations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1_[AMENDED] </ITAG><T4>Paragraph 1. </T4>The authority citation for Part 1 is amended by addingthe following citation:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>26 U.S.C. 7805 1.89(a)-1 and 1.89(k)-1 also issuedunder 26 U.S.C. 89(m).</ITAG><T4>Par. 2. </T4>New andSection;andSection; 1.89(a)-1 and 1.89(k)-1 are addedimmediately after andSection; 1.88-1 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.89(a)-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Miscellaneous questions and answers relating to nondiscriminationrules for certain employee benefit plans. </ITAG>The following is a list of the questions addressed in this section: Q-1: What are the section 89 nondiscrimination rules? Q-2: What transitional and special rules are available to health plansunder section 89? Q-3: Under what circumstances may employees be disregarded for purposesof section 89 when the employees receive health coverage from other employersor when employees do not have a family or have a family whose members receivehealth coverage from another employer? Q-4: What is a health plan under the section 89 nondiscrimination rulesand to what extent are health plans comparable or aggregated for purposesof such rules? Q-5: What is the testing methodology for applying the nondiscriminationrules under section 89? Q-6: What is the period for testing whether the nondiscrimination rulesof section 89 are satisfied? Q-7: For purposes of applying section 89 to an employer's health plan,what rules apply for determining the employer-provided benefits and calculatingthe excess benefits? Q-8: How are salary reduction contributions treated for purposes of thesection 89 nondiscrimination tests? Q-9: How is an excess benefit under the section 89 nondiscrimination rulesto be determined with respect to health plans? Q-10: What are the effective dates of the section 89 nondiscriminationand qualification rules?Q-1: What are the sectiion 89 nondiscrimination rules?A-1: (a) <T3>Nondiscrimination rules_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Section 89(a) provides that, notwithstanding any otherprovision of the tax law specifically excluding items from gross income(e.g., sections 79 and l06), the gross income of a highly compensated employee(as defined in section 414(q)) includes an amount equal to the employee'semployer-provided benefit that is found to be discriminatory under therules provided in this section. See paragraph (f)(3) of this Qandamp;A-1for the definition of ``employer-provided benefit'' for these nondiscriminationrules. The nondiscrimination requirements of section 89(a), however, donot affect the exclusion from gross income of death benefits under section101(a) and accident and health benefits under sections 104 and 105. (2) <T3>Timing of inclusion and deduction.</T3> The excess benefit for a testingyear generally is treated as received on the last day of the testing year.Thus, the excess benefit for a testing year generally is included in ahighly compensated employee's gross income for the employee's taxable yearwith or within which the testing year ends. Similarly, the excess benefitfor a testing year generally is treated as paid by the employer on thelast day of the testing year. Thus, the excess benefit for a testing yearis deductible by the employer only for the taxable year of the employerwith or within which the testing year ends. Also, for purposes of determiningthe deductibility of both employer-provided benefits that are not excessbenefits and employer-provided benefits that are excess benefits, excessbenefits are deemed to be attributable to the employer-provided benefitsprovided latest during the testing year. For purposes of determining thetreatment of excess benefits under section 404, excess benefits are treatedas paid under a plan or arrangement that defers the receipt of compensationor benefits to the extent that, under the rule of this paragraph (a)(2),the excess benefits are received after the end of the employer's taxableyear in which the services creating the right to such compensation or benefitsare performed. For these purposes, excess benefits are deemed to be attributableto employees' services performed latest in such testing year. Excess benefitsare treated as paid under such a plan or arrangement even if they are receivednot more than a brief period (e.g., 2\1/2\ months) after the end of theemployer's taxable year (see andSection; 1.404(b)-1T) and even if the employerelects the rule of section 89(a)(2)(B) with respect to excess benefits.An employer's election of the rule of section 89(a)(2)(B) for a testingyear must be made in writing by January 31 of the first calendar year followingthe calendar year in which the testing year ends. Such election, when made,must apply for all plans of the same type. (b) <T3>Discriminatory employee benefit plan</T3>_(1 ) <T3>In qeneral.</T3> A statutory employee benefit plan is a discriminatoryemployee benefit plan for a testing year unless, for such year, the plansatisfies the requirements of paragraphs (c) and (d) of this Qandamp;A-1.Alternatively, in lieu of the requirements of paragraph (d) of this Qandamp;A-1.an employer may elect to apply the requirements of paragraph (e) of thisQandamp;A-1 to a statutory employee benefit plan. However, for testing yearsbeginning in 1989, a statutory employee benefit plan is not treated asa discriminatory employee benefit plan for purposes of section 4976 ifthe excess benefits with respect to such plan are properly reported inaccordance with section 89(1). (2) <T3>Disability coverage. </T3>Generally, a plan (or portion thereof) thatprovides disability coverage is not subject to the requirements of paragraphs(c), (d) or (e) of this Qandamp;A-1 for a testing year and, thus, may notbe taken into account in determining whether any other accident or healthplan satisfies the requirements of such paragraphs. For example, short-termsick pay, short-term and long-term disability plans, worker's compensationplans (as defined in paragraph (f)(1)((v) of this Qandamp;A-I). plans describedin section 104(a)(4) and (5) and similar wage continuation plans are notsubject to the requirements of paragraphs (c), (d) or (e) of this Qandamp;A-1,even if there are significant employer-provided benefits with respect tosuch plans. This paragraph (b)(2) does not apply with respect to disabilitycoverage the benefits of which are excludable from gross income under section105(b) or (c). (3) <T3>No employer-provided benefit. </T3>If there is no employer-providedbenefit (other than by reason of coverage under such plan being consideredexcess benefit) for a testing year, with respect to a plan that is otherwisesubject to the nondiscrimination rules of section 89. such plan is notsubject to the requirements of paragraphs (c), (d) or (e) of this Qandamp;A-1for such testing year. See Qandamp;A-7 of this section to determine a plan'semployer-provided benefit. An employer cannot take into account a plan(or portion thereof) providing no employer-provided benefit in determiningwhether other plans meet the requirements of paragraphs (c), (d) or (e)of this Qandamp;A-1. (4) <T3>Employers with only highly compensated employees. </T3>A statutoryemployee benefit plan is not subject to the requirements of paragraphs(c), (d) or (e) of this Qandamp;A-1 for a testing year if such plan is maintainedby an employer that, for such year, only has employees who are highly compensatedemployees. (c)<T3>Nondiscriminatory provisions requirement_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>A plan satisfies the requirement of this paragraph(c) and section 89(d)(1)(C) only if the plan does not contain any provisionthat (by its terms, operation, or otherwise) discriminates in favor ofhighly compensated employees. In making this determination, an employermust take into account all plans of the same type. For purposes of thisrequirement, an employer's election with respect to testing (e.g., designationof a testing day) is subject to the nondiscriminatory provisions requirementeven though it is not required to be in the single written document requiredunder section 89(k)(1)(A). (2) <T3>Waiting periods under core health plans. </T3>If an employer has twoor more core health plans with different waiting periods, the core healthplans do not satisfy the nondiscriminatory provisions test of this paragraph(c) unless each plan satisfies the 50 percent eligibility test of paragraph(d)(3) of this Qandamp;A-1 either on an individual basis or by inclusionin a group of comparable plans, under paragraph (b) of Qandamp;A-4 of thissection, that includes only one or more additional core health plans thathave the same or shorter waiting periods. If a plan fails to satisfy thisparagraph (c) by reason of this paragraph (c)(2), the excess benefit attributableto this failure is the employer-provided benefit under the plan that relatesto the period of coverage that prevents the plan from being included ina group of comparable plans under the preceding sentence. (3)<T3> Examples.</T3> The provisions of this paragraph (c) are illustratedin the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 1.</T3> Assume that an employer has 25 employees, 5 of whomare highly compensated employees. Two of the 20 nonhighly compensated employeeshave families. The employer provides employee-only health coverage withan employer-provided benefit of $2,000 to all employees, and provides thehighly compensated employees with an additional plan providing employee-onlycoverage with an employer-provided benefit of $2,200. In addition, theemployer provides family-only health coverage (with an employer-providedbenefit of $2,000) to all of the nonhighly compensated employees, but makessuch family-only coverage available to the highly compensated employeesonly if they pay the total cost of such coverage on an after-tax employeecontribution basis. Thus, the highly compensated employees receive no employer-providedbenefit with respect to such family-only coverage. The employer decidesto treat all of its employees as having a family (see Qandamp;A-3 of thissection). The family-only coverage that is treated as received by employeeswithout families may be used under the comparability rule of paragraph(c)(2) of Qandamp;A-4 of this section to support the additional $2,200 employee-onlycoverage provided to highly compensated employees. Although after the applicationof the comparability rule, the $2,200 employee-only coverage for the highlycompensated passes the 80 percent coverage test set forth in paragraph(e) of this Qandamp;A-1, the nondiscriminatory provisions test is violated.This is because the coverage of 18 of the 20 nonhighly compensated employeesis not meaningful because they are not in fact receiving benefits underthe family-only coverage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 2.</T3> A school district selects July 1 as its testing day.On that day, the school district has no part-time employees and only administrativepersonnel, regular faculty and maintenance personnel on its payroll. Thedesignation of July 1 as the testing day does not constitute the designationof a testing day that is fairly representative of the employee pool andbusiness operation of the school district and, therefore, such designationviolates the nondiscriminatory provisions test. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 3.</T3> An employer that operates a department store selectsJuly 1 as its testing day. Traditionally, the number of the employees employedby the employer on July 1 does not reasonably reflect the number of theemployer's employees employed during most of its fiscal year. This designationviolates the nondiscriminatory provisions test. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 4.</T3> Assume that an employer maintains numerous healthplans (both core and noncore plans) for its 5,000 employees. All but onecore health plan, Plan X, provides for a 3-month waiting period for newemployees. Plan X provides coverage after l month of employment for certainexecutive personnel. This 1-month waiting period provision violates thenondiscriminatory provisions test of this paragraph (c) unless P1an X satisfiesthe 50 percent eligibility test of paragraph (d)(3) of this Qandamp;A-1 eitheron an individual basis or by inclusion with another core health plan orplans with the same or shorter waiting periods in a group of comparableplans under paragraph (b) of Qandamp;A-4 of this section. If the 1-monthwaiting period provision fails the nondiscriminatory provisions test ofthis paragraph (c), then the employer-provided benefit under Plan X thatrelates to coverage for the period between the first and third months ofemployment is treated as an excess benefit of each highly compensated employeeeligib1e for coverage under Plan X after l month of employment.</ITAG> (d) <T3>Eligibility and benefit requirements_</T3>(1) <T3>In general.</T3> A plan satisfies the requirements of this paragraph(d) only if the tests of paragraphs (d)(2), (d)(3), and (d)(4) of thisQandamp;A-1 are satisfied.  (2)<T3> 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test._</T3>(i)<T3> In general.</T3> A plan satisfies this test only if at least 90 percentof all  nonhighly compensated employees have available under all plansof the same type an employer-provided benefit that is at least 50 percentof the largest employer-provided benefit available under all such plansto any highly compensated employee. To the extent that an employee is eligibleto be covered under two or more plans of different types (see paragraph(f)(2)(i) of this Qandamp;A-l), but not fully under all such plans, the employeecannot be treated as eligible for the full employer-provided benefit ofeach plan for purposes of the 90 percent/50 percent test. Instead, theemployer must use a reasonable, uniform, and nondiscriminatory allocationmethod to allocate to such employee only a reasonable portion of each plan'sfull employer-provided benefit. Whether a plan is available to an employeeis determined under all of the facts and circumstances. For example, anHMO at a location distant from the location of the employer might not,under the facts and circumstances, be reasonably available to employeesat the location of the employer. See Qandamp;A-8 of this section for thetreatment of salary reduction contributions under this test. Also, seeQandamp;A-2 of this section for a transition rule for the 1989 testing year. (ii) <T3> Example.</T3> The provisions of this paragraph (d)(2) are illustratedin the following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example.</T3> An employer has 12 employees, 10 of whom are nonhighlycompensated employees. The employer maintains two health plans. Plan Ahas an employer-provided benefit of $1,000. It is available to 9 of the10 nonhighly compensated employees and both of the highly compensated employees.Plan B, a dental plan, has an employer-provided benefit of $500. It isavailable only to the two highly compensated employees. The health plansmeet the requirements of this paragraph (d)(2). This is the  result since90 percent of the nonhighly compensated employees (9 of 10) have availableto them an employer-provided benefit of $1,000, which is more than 50 percentof $1,500, the largest employer-provided benefit available to any highlycompensated employee. Note that the dental plan in this example fails the50 percent eligibility test set forth in paragraph (d)(3) of this Qandamp;A-l.</ITAG> (3)<T3> 50 percent eligibility test_</T3>(i)<T3> In general.</T3> A plan satisfies this test only if the plan satisfiesthe requirement of either paragraph (d)(3)(ii) or paragraph (d)(3)(iii)of this Qandamp;A 11. An employee is eligible to participate in a plan onlyif, under all of the facts and circumstances, the employee is reasonablyeligible to participate in such plan. See Qandamp;A-4 of this section withrespect to rules relating to the comparability and aggregation of healthplans.  (ii)<T3> 50 percent eligibility.</T3> A plan satisfies the requirement of thisparagraph (d)(3)(ii) only if at least 50 percent of the employees eligibleto participate in the plan are nonhighly compensated employees.  (iii)<T3> Nondiscriminatory ratio.</T3> A plan satisfies the requirements ofthis paragraph (d)(3)(iii) only if the highly compensated eligibility percentagedoes not exceed the nonhighly compensated eligibility percentage. The highlycompensated eligibility percentage is the percentage determined by dividingthe number of highly compensated employees eligible to participate in theplan by the total number of highly compensated employees. The nonhighlycompensated eligibility percentage is the percentage determined by thesame method substituting nonhighly compensated employees for highly compensatedemployees.(iv)<T3> Example.</T3> The provisions of this paragraph (d)(3) are illustratedin the following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> An employer maintains a plan providing for medical diagnosticexaminations to a group of management personnel. Of this group, 10 percentare nonhighly compensated employees. Unless the plan can be treated aspart of a group of comparable plans that passes the 50 percent eligibilitytest (see paragraph (b) of Qandamp;A-4 of this section), the plan fails thetests described in this paragraph (d)(3).</ITAG>(4)<T3> 75 percent benefits test</T3>_(i) <T3>In general.</T3> A plan satisfies the test of this paragraph (d)(4)only if the average employer-provided benefit actually received under allplans of the same type by nonhighly compensated employees is at least 75percent of the average employer-provided benefit actually received underall plans of the same type by highly compensated employees. See paragraph(f)(2)(ii) of this Qandamp;A-1 for a rule under which, in certain circumstances,plans that are not of the same type may be treated as plans of the sametype for purposes of this paragraph (d)(4). Also, see Qandamp;A-2 of thissection for transition rules for the 1989 and 1990 testing years.(ii)<T3> Example.</T3> The provisions of this paragraph (d)(4) are illustratedin the following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> An employer has 5 highly compensated employees and 15nonhighly compensated employees. The employer maintains only one healthplan with an employer-provided benefit of $1,500. All of the highly compensatedemployees and 10 of the nonhighly compensated employees participate inthe plan. The employer's health plan does not meet the requirements ofthis paragraph (d)(4) since the average employer-provided benefit of thenonhighly compensated employees is only $1,000 ((10 x $1,500)/15), andthis amount is less than 75 percent of the average employer-provided benefitof the highly compensated employees, which is $1,500 ((5 x $1,500)/5).In order to meet the requirements of this paragraph (d)(4), the averageemployer-provided benefit of the nonhighly compensated employees must beat least $1,125 (75 percent of $1,500) or the average employer-providedbenefit of the highly compensated employees must be no more than $1,333.33($1000 is 75 percent of $1333.33).</ITAG>(e)<T3> 80 percent coverage test.</T3> A plan that is a health plan or a group-termlife insurance plan satisfies the requirements of this paragraph (e) onlyif at least 80 percent of the nonhighly compensated employees are coveredunder such plan and the plan meets the requirements of paragraph (c) ofthis Qandamp;A-1 (the nondiscriminatory provisions test). Plans of the sametype may pass the 80 percent test separately or together (e.g., by reasonof health plans being comparable). See Qandamp;A-4 of this section with respectto rules relating to comparability and aggregation. If any of an employer'splans of the same type are tested under this paragraph (e), all plans ofthe same type must be tested under the requirements of this paragraph (e).The employer must elect in writing to use this 80 percent test.(f)<T3> Definitions</T3>_(1)<T3> Statutory employee benefit plan</T3>_(i)<T3> In general.</T3> The term ``statutory employee benefit plan'' meansan accident or health plan (within the meaning of sections 106 and 105)or a group-term life insurance plan (within the meaning of section 79).Also, under section 89(i)(2), an employer may treat certain other plansas statutory employee benefit plans.(ii)<T3> Health plan.</T3> In general, the term ``health plan'' means an accidentor health plan under section 105 or 106, except to the extent the planis a disability plan (see paragraph (b)(2) of this Qandamp;A-1). In addition,a plan that provides payments for accidental death and dismemberment, orbusiness travel accident insurance, is an accident or health plan becausecoverage under such plan is eligible for the exclusion under section 106.Furthermore, plan that provides for medical diagnostic procedures or physicalexamination is an accident or health plan because the plan is eligiblefor the exclusion under section 106.(iii)<T3> Church plans.</T3> The term ``statutory employee benefit plan'' doesnot include a plan maintained by a church (as defined in section 3121(w)(3)(A)),including a qualified church-controlled organization within the meaningof section 3121(w)(3)(B)), if the plan is maintained exclusively for clergyand church employees, and their spouses and dependents.(iv) <T3>Plans maintained by governments.</T3> A plan does not fail to be astatutory employee benefit plan merely because it is maintained by a stateor local government or political subdivision or instrumentality thereof,by the District of Columbia, or by the Federal government or a politicalsubdivision or instrumentality thereof.(v)<T3> Worker's compensation.</T3> The term ``statutory employee benefitplan'' does not include a worker's compensation plan that pays amountsfrom a sickness and disability fund maintained for employees under thelaws of the United States, a state or the District of Columbia (i.e., afund maintained pursuant to a worker's compensation act or statute in thenature of a worker's compensation act, the benefits from which are excludableunder. section 104(a)(1)). Thus such a plan is not subject to the nondiscriminationrequirements of section 89. An employer may not take into account a worker'scompensation plan (or portion thereof) in determining whether other plansmeet the requirements of paragraphs (c), (d) or (e) of this Qandamp;A-1.However, accident or health plans maintained by a government (as definedin paragraph (f)(1)(iv) of this Qandamp;A-1) that provide benefits that areexcludable from the income of the employee solely by reason of section105(b) or (c) are not worker's compensation plans within the meaning ofthe first sentence of this paragraph (f)(1)(v) and thus are subject tothe nondiscrimination requirements of section 89.(2)<T3> Plans of the same type_</T3>(i)<T3> In general.</T3> Two or more plans are treated as plans of the sametype if all of such plans are included in only one of the following categories:accident or health plans (sections 106 and 105); group-term life insurance(section 79); qualified group legal services plans (section 120); educationalassistance programs (section 127); or dependent care assistance programs(section 129).(ii)<T3> Election.</T3> For purposes of applying the requirements of paragraph(d)(4) of this Qandamp;A-1 (the 75 percent benefits test) to plans of thesame type other than health plans for a testing year, an employer may electin writing to treat all plans of the types specified in the election asplans of the same type. Although this election is not available for purposesof determining whether the health plans of the employer satisfy the 75percent benefits test, if such plans satisfy the 75 percent benefits testthey may be taken into account in determining whether plans of the sametype (e.g. group-term life insurance plans), other than health plans, satisfysuch test. For any testing year, if an employer elects to take health plansinto account in determining whether two or more plans of another type ortypes satisfy the 75 percent benefits test, all of the employer's healthplans must be taken into account with all other plans of the type or typessubject to the election. Thus, for example, if an employer elects to takeits health plans into account in testing its group-term life insuranceplans and dependent care assistance programs for purposes of the 75 percentbenefits test, all such plans must be tested on an aggregated basis underthe 75 percent benefits test.(3) <T3>Employer-provided benefit. </T3>In the case of any health or group-termlife insurance plan, the employer-provided benefit for purposes of thissection is the value of the coverage under the plan that is attributableto employer contributions. For example, in the case of a health plan, theemployer-provided benefit is the employer-provided portion of the valueof the entitlement to receive payment on account of personal injury orsickness including medical care or reimbursements of specified medicalexpenses or other medical benefits, subject to various conditions and limits,rather than the value of the reimbursements, products, services and otherbenefits received pursuant to the health coverage. See Qandamp;A-7 of thissection for guidance relating to the value of health coverage. See section89(g)(3)(C) for rules with respect to the value of coverage under a group-termlife insurance plan. ln the case of any other statutory employee benefitplan, an employee's employer-provided benefit under section 89 is the employer-providedportion of the value of the reimbursements, products, services and otherbenefits provided under the plan (rather than the value of the coverageor the entitlement to such benefits). (4) <T3>Highly compensated employee. </T3>The term ``highly compensated employee''is defined as that term is defined in section 414(q). For purposes of determiningwho is a highly compensated employee under section 89, the testing yearis the determination year. (5) <T3>Nonhighly compensated employee. </T3>The term ``nonhighly compensatedemployee'' is defined as each employee other than a highly compensatedemployee. (6) <T3>Employee_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>The term ``employee'' generally means an individualwho performs service for the employer maintaining the plan and who is eithera common law employee of the employer, a self-employed individual treatedas an employee under section 401(c)(1), or an individual who is treatedas an employee with respect to the employer for purposes of the provision(e.g., section 106) that provides for the exclusion of the benefit beingtested under section 89. (ii) <T3>Leased employees_</T3>(A) <T3>In general. </T3>The term ``employee'' includes a leased employee whois treated as an employee of the employer-recipient pursuant to the provisionsof sections 414(n)(1)(A) or 414(o)(2) and the regulations thereunder. Ingeneral, section 414(n) applies with respect to employee benefit planscovered by section 89 in the same manner as it applies with respect toqualified plans covered by section 401(a). Thus, the rule of section 414(n)(1)(B)permitting a recipient to take into account certain benefits provided bya leasing organization is available with respect to benefits subject tosection 89. The safe harbor exception of section 414(n)(5), however, isnot available with respect to section 89. In addition, the rule of andSection;1.414(n)-1(b)(10) regarding services performed on a ``substantially full-timebasis'' is to be applied by appropriately adjusting the hour of servicerequirements to reflect the 6-month period of service requirement. Nevertheless,a leased employee may be disregarded by an employer-recipient when testingits health plans if the employer-recipient treats the health coverage receivedby the leased employee from the leasing organization as health coveragereceived from another employer and, on such basis, applies the rules ofQandamp;A-3 of this section with respect to such leased employee. Notwithstandingthe immediately preceding sentence, no leased employee described in thisparagraph (f)(6)(ii) may be disregarded as having coverage from anotheremployer unless the value of employer-provided core health benefits actuallyreceived by the leased employee from the leasing organization under itsplan is at least 50 percent as valuable as the highest employer-providedcore health benefit available to any highly compensated employee of theemployer-recipient. (B) <T3>Authority to issue additional requirements. </T3>The differing naturesof employee benefit plans covered by section 89 and qualified plans coveredby section 401(a) may require different rules in certain circumstances.The Commissioner may provide such rules, to the extent appropriate, throughrevenue rulings, notices, and other guidance of general applicability.(iii) <T3>Excluded employees. </T3>In general, the term ``employee'' does notinclude employees who are excluded employees under section 89(h) and thuswho are excluded from consideration in applying the nondiscrimination rulesof section 89 with respect to other employees. For example, employees whoare included in a unit of employees covered by a collective bargainingagreement are excluded employees only if there is evidence that the typeof benefits provided under the plan being tested under section 89 was thesubject of good faith bargaining and no employee in such collective bargainingunit of employees is eligible to receive or does receive any benefit underthe plan or any plan of the same type. (7) <T3>Core health benefits. </T3>Except as provided otherwise in this section,the terms ``core health benefits,'' ``core health coverage,'' and ``corehealth plan'' generally refer to coverage providing comprehensive majormedical and hospitalization benefits and similar types of health benefits.Dental care, vision care, accidental death and dismemberment, and disabilitycoverage are examples of health benefits that generally are not core healthplans. Also, any health coverage provided through a flexible spending arrangement(as defined in Qandamp;A-7 of andSection; 1.125-2) is not a core health benefit.(g) <T3>Written election. </T3>In general, unless specifically provided otherwise,an election required to be in writing under this section must be in writingby January 31 of the first calendar year following the calendar year inwhich excess benefits for the testing year (without regard to whether thereare such excess benefits for such year) would be treated as received underparagraph (a)(2) of this Qandamp;A-1. However, if an employer makes an electionunder section 89(a)(2)(B) to delay the inclusion of excess benefits inincome for one year, then any other written elections must be in writingby January 31 of the first calendar year following the calendar year inwhich excess benefits for the testing year (without regard to whether thereare such excess benefits for such year) are treated as received under paragraph(a)(2) of this Qandamp;A-1. See Qandamp;A-1(a)(2) for the time for making thesection 89(a)(2)(B) election. The elections must be written in a mannerthat will allow a reconstruction of the employer's method of testing.Q-2: What transitional and special rules are available to health plansunder section 89? A-2: (a) <T3>Transition rule for 75 percent benefits test_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>With respect to the 1989 and 1990 testing years, anemployer's health plans are deemed to satisfy paragraph (d)(4) of Qandamp;A-1of this section (the 75 percent benefits test) with respect to active employeesfor a testing year if the requirements of paragraphs (a)(2), (a)(3), and(a)(4) of this Qandamp;A-2 are satisfied with respect to such testing year.(2) <T3>Testing years ending in 1989 and 1990. </T3>The requirement of thisparagraph (a)(2) is satisfied only if the testing year ends in either the1989 calendar year or the 1990 calendar year. For purposes of this paragraph(a), a testing year that ends in 1989 is a 1989 testing year and a testingyear that ends in 1990 is a 1990 testing year. (3) <T3>Employer election. </T3>The requirement of this paragraph (a)(3) issatisfied only if the employer elects in writing the application of thetransition rule in this paragraph (a) with respect to a testing year. (4) <T3>Includible coverage for applicable group of employees_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>The requirement of this paragraph (a)(4) is satisfiedfor a testing year only if the employer provided benefits (including theportion attributable to salary reduction contributions) under all healthplans of the employer received by the applicable group of employees forthe testing year are treated as excess benefits for such testing year.If an employer makes an election under paragraph (a) of this Qandamp;A-2,then in determining whether the requirements of paragraphs (d)(2) and (d)(3)of Qandamp;A-1 of this section (the 90 percent/50 percent eligibility testand the 50 percent eligibility test, respectively) are met, the employermay treat benefits that are includible in gross income by reason of thisparagraph (a)(4) as attributable to after-tax employee contributions. (ii) <T3>Applicable group of employees_</T3>(A) <T3>1989 testing year. </T3>For a 1989 testing year, the applicable groupof employees includes all active employees of the employer for such yearwho had more than a 5 percent ownership interest in the employer (determinedin accordance with section 416(i)) at any time between January 1, 1988,and the end of the testing year, and the applicable number of the highlycompensated active employees of the employer who receive the most compensationfor the 1989 testing year. The applicable number for the preceding sentenceis the number of employees representing 20 percent of the highly compensatedactive employees of the employer for the testing year, but in no eventgreater than 1,000 highly compensated employees and in no event less than10 employees (or the total number of highly compensated employees of theemployer if less than 10). (B) <T3>1990 testing year. </T3>For a 1990 testing year, the applicable groupof employees includes all highly compensated active employees of the employerfor such year who had more than a 5 percent ownership interest in the employer(determined in accordance with section 416(i)) at any time between January1, 1989, and the end of the testing year, and the applicable number ofhighly compensated active employees of the employer (or all highly compensatedactive employees if the employer has fewer than the applicable number ofsuch employees) who receive the most compensation for the 1990 testingyear. The applicable number for the preceding sentence is the number ofemployees representing 40 percent of the highly compensated active employeesof the employer for the testing year, but in no event greater than 2,000highly compensated employees and in no event less than 50 employees (orthe total number of highly compensated employees of the employer if lessthan 50). (C) <T3>Compensation. </T3>For purposes of identifying those highly compensatedemployees who receive the greatest amount of compensation, ``compensation''means ``compensation'' as defined in section 414(q)(7). In the case oftwo or more employees with the same amount of compensation, the employermay decide which of such employees is to be treated as receiving more compensation.(b) <T3>Transition rule for 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test? </T3>Ifan employer's health plans are deemed to satisfy paragraph (d)(4) of Qandamp;A-1of this section (the 75 percent benefits test) by reason of paragraph (a)of this Qandamp;A-2 for a testing year ending in 1989, then, for such testingyear, such employer may elect in writing to apply the 90 percent/50 percenteligibility test of paragraph (d)(2) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section withrespect to active employees for such testing year by substituting ``80percent'' for ``90 percent'' and by substituting ``66 percent'' for ``50percent'' (i.e., the test may be treated as an 80 percent/66 percent eligibilitytest). The rule of this paragraph (b) is not applicable for purposes ofdetermining excess benefits under section 89(b). (c)<T3> Special rule for certain large employers_</T3>(1)<T3> In general.</T3> An employer's health plans are deemed to satisfythe requirements of paragraph (d) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section (the eligibilityand benefit requirements) with respect to active employees for a testingyear if all of the requirements of paragraphs (c)(2) through (c)(7) ofthis Qandamp;A-2 are satisfied for such testing year. In applying the requirementsof paragraphs (c)(2) through (c)(7) of this Qandamp;A-2, only nonexcludableemployees are taken into account and, for such purpose, the excluded employeerules of section 89(h)(1)(A), (B), (C), and (D) are to be applied withoutregard to the last sentence of section 89(h)(1) and without regard to sections89(h)(2) and 89(h)(3). Thus, for example, differences in eligibility waitingperiods do not result in the loss of an employee's status as an excludableemployee to the extent that the period with respect to such employee doesnot exceed the maximum period allowed under section 89(h) (e.g., 6 monthsfor core health coverage). The nondiscriminatory provisions test of paragraph(c) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section does not apply to waiting periods undercore health plans as discussed in paragraph (c)(2) of Qandamp;A-1 of thissection with respect to plans tested under this paragraph (c). The rules of this paragraph (c) are not applicable for purposes of determining excessbenefits under section 89(b).  (2)<T3> Employer election.</T3> The requirement of this paragraph (c)(2) issatisfied with respect to a testing year only if the employer elects inwriting the application of the rule of this paragraph (c) with respectto such testing year. If any of an employer's health plans are tested underthis paragraph (c), all of such employer's health plans must be testedunder this paragraph (c).  (3)<T3> Minimum number of employees.</T3> The requirement of this paragraph(c)(3) is satisfied for a testing year only if the employer employs atleast 5,000 active employees on at least 1 day in each quarter of suchtesting year.  (4)<T3> Minimum Percentage of nonhighly compensated employees.</T3> The requirementof this paragraph (c)(4) is satisfied only if at least 90 percent of theemployer's active employees are nonhighly compensated employees.  (5)<T3> Maximum percentage of highly compensated employees.</T3> The requirementof this paragraph (c)(5) is satisfied only if fewer than 3/4 percent (0.75percent) of the employer's active employees have annual compensation (withinthe meaning of section 414(q)(7)) in excess of 200 percent of the dollaramount in effect under section 414(q)(1)(C) for the testing year.  (6)<T3> Health plan eligibility_</T3>(i) <T3> In general.</T3> The requirement of this paragraph (c)(6) is satisfiedonly if both of the tests in paragraphs (c)(6)(ii) and (c)(6)(iii) aresatisfied.  For purposes of this paragraph (c)(6), the rules of paragraph(b) of Qandamp;A-3 of this section are available. However, for purposes ofthis paragraph (c)(6), the comparability rules of paragraph (c) of Qandamp;A-4of this section are not availab1e.  (ii)<T3> 80 percent eligibility test.</T3> This test is satisfied only if atleast 80 percent of the employees eligible to participate in each healthplan of the employer are nonhighly compensated employees. For purposesof this paragraph (c)(6)(ii) the comparability rules of paragraph (b) ofQandamp;A-4(b) of this section and the family eligibility test rules of Qandamp;A-3(b)of this section are available.  (iii)<T3> 80 percent/80 percent eligibility test.</T3> This test is satisfiedonly if at least 80 percent of the nonhighly compensated employees of theemployer have available to them under all health plans an employer-providedbenefit that is at least 80 percent as valuable as the largest employer-providedbenefit available under all such health plans to any highly compensatedemployee. The rules relating to the application of the 90 percent/50 percenteligibility test apply in making this determination.  (7)<T3> Benefits test.</T3> The requirement of this paragraph (c)(7) is satisfiedonly if at least 66 percent of the nonhighly compensated employees of theemployer actually receive core health coverage with an employer-providedbenefit that is at least 66 percent as valuable as the largest employer-providedbenefit available under all health plans (including both core and  noncorehealth coverage) to any highly compensated employee. In determining thelargest employer-provided benefit available to a highly compensated employee,the rules applicable to the 75 percent benefits test apply, except thatfor this purpose salary reduction contributions are treated as employercontributions. For purposes of this paragraph (c)(7), the coverage rulesof Qandamp;A 3(c) of this section are available.Q-3: Under what circumstances may employees be disregarded for purposesof section 89 when the employees receive health coverage from other employersor when employees do not have a family or have a family whose members receivehealth coverage from another employer? A-3: (a) <T3>In general. </T3> For purposes of determining whether health plansproviding coverage to the spouse and dependents (if any) of an employee(i.e., family-only coverage) satisfy the requirements of paragraph (d)(2)(the 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test) and paragraph (d)(3) (the50 percent eligibility test) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section, an employermay elect in writing to apply the rules of paragraph (b) of this Qandamp;A-3.Also, for purposes of determining whether health plans satisfy the requirementsof paragraph (d)(4) (the 75 percent benefits test) or paragraph (e) (the80 percent coverage test) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section, the employer mayelect in writing to apply the rules of paragraph (c) of this Qandamp;A-3.(b) <T3>Eligibility tests. </T3>An employee who is eligible to receive family-onlycoverage under a health plan or would be eligible under the same termsand conditions as other eligible employees if the employee had a spouseand dependents may be treated as eligible to receive such family-only coveragewithout regard to whether the employee has a spouse and dependents. Thisis the case without regard to whether there is a requirement of an employeecontribution or other employee election under the plan so long as any suchelection is uniformly available. If the employer applies the rule of thisparagraph (b) with regard to any employee or any health plan, the employermust apply the rule uniformly with regard to all employees and health plansexcept to the extent such application would cause a plan to fail the nondiscriminatoryprovisions test of paragraph (c) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section. (c) <T3>75 percent benefits test and 80 percent coverage test</T3>_ (1) <T3>Separate testing. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph(c), an employer may elect in writing to apply the requirements of paragraph(d)(4) or (e) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section for a testing year by testingits health plan or plans that provide employee-only coverage separatelyfrom the health plan or plans that provide family-only coverage. If theemployer tests family-only coverage separately from employee-only coverage,all family-only coverage must be tested together under this paragraph (c).Therefore, an employer may not separately test coverage provided to a spousefrom coverage provided to a dependent. Separate testing may be electedunder this paragraph (c)(1) without regard to the fact that family-onlycoverage is not available as a separate option to employees (i.e., theemployee-only and family-only coverages are available or provided onlyas a package to the employee). No amendment to a written plan documentis required to test separately under this paragraph (c)(1). (2) <T3>Presumption of family status. </T3>In applying the requirements ofparagraph (d)(4) or (e) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section for a testing yearto a health plan that provides family-only coverage, an employee does notfail to be treated as receiving family-only coverage merely because theemployee does not have a spouse or dependents. This is the case withoutregard to whether the employer has elected separate testing in accordancewith paragraph (c)(1) of this Qandamp;A-3. Thus, for example, if an employerautomatically provides an employee with family-only coverage (i.e., suchcoverage is provided on a nonelective, noncontributory basis) or automaticallyprovides an employee with family-only coverage if the employee purchasesemployee-only coverage and the employee does purchase such employee-onlycoverage, the employee may be treated as having received the family-onlycoverage even though the employee does not have a spouse or dependents.However, see paragraph (c) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section with respect tothe application of the nondiscriminatory provisions test to certain plansthat provide family-only coverage. (3) <T3>Other core health coverage</T3>_(i) <T3>Employer does not elect separate testing. </T3>If an employer doesnot elect to test plans providing employee-only coverage separately fromplans that provide family-only coverage (as permitted under paragraph (c)(1)of this Qandamp;A-3), an employee who has a family (as determined under thisparagraph (c)) may be disregarded for purposes of applying the requirementsof paragraphs (d)(4) and (e) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section if either ofthe following two requirements are met. First, such employee and familymembers (if any) all receive core health coverage from another employeror from the spouse's or a dependent's employer. Second, if the employerdoes not provide a health plan that includes employer-provided family-onlycoverage, then the employee must receive core health coverage from anotheremployer or from the spouse's or a dependent's employer. (ii) <T3>Employer elects separate testing. </T3>If an employer elects to testemployee-only coverage separately from family-only coverage (as permittedunder paragraph (c)(1) of this Qandamp;A-3), an employee may be disregardedfor purposes of applying the requirements of paragraphs (d)(4) and (e)of Qandamp;A-1 of this section with respect to the family-only coverage ifsuch employee does not have a family (as determined under this paragraph(c)) or if such employee has a family and the family members all receivecore health coverage from another employer or from the spouse's or a dependent'semployer. Similarly, for purposes of applying the requirements of paragraphs(d)(4) and (e) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section with respect to the employee-onlycoverage, an employee may be disregarded if the employee receives corehealth coverage from another employer or from a spouse's or a dependent'semployer. In testing only the health plan or plans that provide employee-onlycoverage, employees are taken into account without regard to whether theyhave families. (4) <T3>Sworn statements</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>An employer may not elect the rules of paragraph (c)(3)of this Qandamp;A-3 unless the employer obtains and maintains adequate swornstatements that satisfy the requirements of paragraph (c)(4)(ii) of thisQandamp;A-3.In the absence of an adequate sworn statement with respect to an employeeor the application of paragraph (c)(4)(iii) of this Qandamp;A-3, certainpresumptions, set forth in section 89(g)(2)(C), are to be applied withrespect to those facts that would otherwise have been provided on the swornstatement.(ii)<T3> Adequate sworn statement.</T3> An adequate sworn statement must containsufficient information to indicate whether the employee has a spouse orany dependents and, if so, the number of dependents and the current receiptby the employee and any spouse or dependents of core health coverage undera plan of another employer or the employer of the spouse or dependent.An employer cannot rely on sworn statements for testing years beginningafter l989 unless such statements are made under penalty of perjury andcontain a designation of the employer-provided health coverage currentlyreceived by the employee under the employer's health plan or plans. Inlieu of including information about the employer-provided health coveragebeing received by an employee under the employer's health plans, an employermay use any other reasonable method to enable it to determine, for eachtesting year, the extent to which an employee who is receiving core healthcoverage under a plan of another employer is also receiving employer-providedhealth coverage from the employer. A sworn statement is not required tobe notarized or on a form approved in advance by the Commissioner. Therule of this paragraph (c)(4)(ii) is illustrated by the following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> As part of its open season on the selection of healthplan coverage, an employer requests that an employee complete a form providinginformation about the employee's family status, number of dependents andwhether the employee or the employee's spouse or dependents receive corehealth coverage through another employer or the employer of the spouseor a dependent. If the employee does receive other core health coverage,the form also requests the name of the other employer and, if applicable,the insurance company administering the program or providing the othercoverage. At the bottom of the form, just above the signature block anddate, is the following phrase: ``Under penalties of perjury, I declarethat the information I have furnished above, to the best of my knowledgeand belief, is true, correct, and complete.'' This form satisfies the swornstatement requirement of section 89(g)(2)(B) and this Qandamp;A-3 providedthat the employer also is able to determine for each testing year, by otherreasonable means, the extent to which employees who receive other corehealth coverage also receive health coverage from the employer.</ITAG>(iii)<T3> Exception.</T3> If an employee is eligible to receive employee-onlycoverage under a core health plan of the employer with a substantial employer-providedbenefit at no cost to the employee and such employee does not elect toreceive any employee-only coverage under a core health plan of the employer,the employer may treat such employee as having completed an adequate swornstatement that the employee has core health coverage from another employer.Similarly, if an employee is eligible to receive family-only coverage undera core health plan of the employer with a substantial employer-providedbenefit and at no cost, and such employee does not elect to receive anyfamily-only coverage under a core health plan of the employer, the employermay treat such employee as having completed an adequate sworn statementthat the employee has no family or has a family all the members of whichreceive other core health coverage. Even if a sworn statement is deemedto have been completed under this paragraph (c)(4)(iii), the employer mustestablish by other reasonable methods the extent to which employees describedin this paragraph (c)(4)(iii) receive health coverage from such employer.For purposes of this paragraph (c)(4)(iii), the plan has a cost to theemployee if the employee is required to make any after-tax or salary reductioncontributions or to waive any other benefit (taxable or otherwise) in orderto obtain the health coverage.(iv)<T3> Frequency of sworn statements.</T3> An employer that elects to usesworn statements as permitted under this paragraph (c)(4) must obtain suchstatements on no less frequent a basis than once each 3-consecutive years.If the employer does not obtain sworn statements from substantially allof its employees or from a statistically valid random sample of all ofits employees determined under statistical standards consistent with thosein paragraph (d) of Qandamp;A-5 of this section, the employer must obtainsuch sworn statements on an annual basis.(5)<T3> Certain highly compensated employees.</T3> A highly compensated employeecannot be disregarded under paragraph (c)(3) of this Qandamp;A-3 if suchemployee receives an employer-provided benefit under all health plans ofthe employer that is greater than 133\1/3\ percent of the average employer-providedbenefit under all such health plans received by nonhighly compensated employees(after applying the rule of paragraph (c)(6) of this Qandamp;A-3). The ruleof this paragraph (c)(5) is applied separately with respect to employee-onlycoverage and family-only coverage if the employer elects under paragraph(c)(1) of this Qandamp;A-3 to test such coverages separately.(6)<T3> Certain nonhighly compensated employees.</T3> A nonhighly compensatedemployee may not be disregarded under paragraph (c)(3) of this Qandamp;A-3because of other core health coverage unless, at the time such other coverageceases, such employee is eligible to elect coverage under any core healthplan of the employer for which the employee was eligible (through electionor otherwise) during the immediately preceding period in which the employeecould have elected coverage (e.g. an open season). The election periodfor purposes of the rule in this paragraph (c)(6) must be no shorter than30 days). This paragraph (c)(6) applies without regard to the reason forthe cessation of the employee's other core health coverage and withoutregard to whether the employer's health plans otherwise permit employeesto commence coverage at other than an open season. Similarly, a nonhighlycompensated employee may not be disregarded as having no family or havinga family with other coverage under paragraph (c)(3) of this Qandamp;A-3 unlesssuch employee is eligible to elect (on the same conditions set forth inthe preceding two sentences) family-only coverage, upon a change in familystatus in which the employee acquires a family or upon a loss of such othercoverage for a member of the family. This paragraph (c)(6) does not requirethat an employee be eligible to participate under a plan for which theemployee would not previously have been eligible. In addition, any otherwiseapplicable eligibility conditions that would have barred participationduring the immediately preceding open season, such as insurability, maycontinue to be applied with respect to eligibility resulting under thisparagraph (c)(6) but only if such conditions exist at the time the othercore health coverage ceases and such conditions are applied on a uniform,consistent and nondiscriminatory basis. However, in no event may an employerimpose conditions on eligibility that were not previously applicable tosuch employee during the immediately preceding open season. Conditionsthat were previously applicable may be applied with regard to the factsin existence either at the time of previous eligibility or at the timethe other core coverage ceases, as long as such application is on a uniform,consistent and nondiscriminatory basis. This paragraph (c)(6) is applicableonly for plan years beginning after December 31, 1990.(7)<T3> Eligibility requirement.</T3> An employer may not disregard employeesunder paragraph (c)(3) of this Qandamp;A-3 for purposes of applying paragraph(e) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section (the 80 percent coverage test) unlessparagraph (e) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section would be satisfied without useof the rules contained in such paragraph on the basis of eligibility toparticipate instead of coverage received.Q-4: What is a health plan under the section 89 nondiscrimination rulesand to what extent are health plans comparable or aggregated for purposesof such rules? A-4: (a) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in this section, a healthplan is a uniform entitlement provided to employees with respect to paymentson account of personal injury or sickness, including specified medicalclaims, expenses, products or services. Any difference in entitlement createsseparate health plans. In addition, any difference in cost to differentgroups of employees, including the fact that salary reduction contributionsare required for coverage that is identical to coverage that is otherwiseemployer-provided, creates separate plans. Each option as to coverage istreated as a separate health plan for purposes of section 89. However,paragraphs (b) through (f) of this Qandamp;A-4 provide testing rules underwhich comparable health plans may be treated as a single health plan, ruleswhen two or more health plans must be aggregated and treated as a singleplan, and rules when separate health plans may be restructured. These rulesapply solely for purposes of testing and calculating discriminatory excesswith respect to an employer's health plans under the section 89 nondiscriminationrules, and do not require that the single written document required byQandamp;A-3 of andSection; 1.89(k)-1 relating to any of such plans be modifiedto conform to the testing status of such plans under these rules. (b) <T3>Comparable health plans for 50 percent eligibility test. </T3>For purposesof applying paragraph (d)(3) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section (the 50 percenteligibility test), two or more health plans included in a group of comparableplans may be treated as a single health plan. A group of plans is comparableif the smallest employer-provided benefit available to any employee inany plan in the group is at least 95 percent of the largest employer-providedbenefit available to any employee in any plan in the group. See paragraph(d) of this Qandamp;A-4 for mandatory aggregation rules that may be applicablebefore the application of this paragraph (b). (c) <T3>Comparable health plans for 80 percent coverage test_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (c),for purposes of applying paragraph (e) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section (the80 percent coverage test), two or more health plans included in a groupof comparable plans, may be treated as a single health plan. A group ofplans is comparable if the smallest employer-provided benefit availableto any employee in any plan in the group is at least 90 percent of thelargest employer-provided benefit available to any employee in any planin the group. See paragraph (e) of this Qandamp;A-4 for mandatory aggregationrules that may be applicable before the application of this paragraph (c).(2) <T3>Alternative general comparability rule. </T3>At the employer's writtenelection, a group of plans is comparable for purposes of applying paragraph(e) of Qandamp;A-1 (the 80 percent coverage test) if the smallest employer-providedbenefit available to any employee in any plan in the group is at least80 percent of the largest employer-provided benefit available to any employeein any plan in the group. This alternative general comparability rule isavailable only if the employer applies the requirements of paragraph (e)of Qandamp;A-1 by substituting ``90 percent'' for ``80 percent.'' Thus, thisalternative general comparability rule applies only if at least 90 percentof the nonhighly compensated employees are covered under the health planor group of comparable plans being tested. (3) <T3>Restriction on general comparability. </T3>If a plan fails to satisfyparagraph (d)(3) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section (the 50 percent eligibilitytest) (the failed plan), the failed plan may not be included with any otherplan in a group of comparable plans under paragraphs (c)(1) or (c)(2) ofthis Qandamp;A-4 unless the following two requirements are met. First, theemployer-provided benefit of the group of comparable plans must be withinat least 95 percent of the employer-provided benefit of the failed plan.Second, the failed plan and the group of comparable plans, considered together,must be comparable under paragraph (c)(1) or (c)(2) of this Qandamp;A-4.The following example illustrates the rules of this paragraph (c)(3):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Assume that an employer with 25 employees, 5 of whomare highly compensated employees, provides all nonhighly compensated employeeswith a health plan with an employer-provided benefit of $3,000. In addition,the employer provides a health plan with an employer-provided benefit of$3,750 only to its highly compensated employees. The employer tests itshealth plans under the 80 percent coverage test of paragraph (e) of Qandamp;A-1of this section. Because the additional $3,750 health plan is availableonly to highly compensated employees and thus fails the 50 percent eligibilitytest, such plan may not be aggregated with the $3,000 plan unless the employer-providedbenefit under the $3,750 plan is reduced to $3,158 ($3,000 is 95 percentof $3,158) or the employer-provided benefit under the other plan is increasedto $3,562 (95 percent of $3,750).</ITAG>(4) <T3>Deemed comparability rule_</T3>(i) <T3>Health plan outside comparability range. </T3>A health plan (or a groupof health plans treated as a single health plan) that is not otherwiseincluded with another health plan in a group of comparable plans (determinedunder paragraph (c) (1) through (3) of this Qandamp;A-4) may be includedin such group if the employer-provided benefit under the former healthplan (or group of health plans) is greater than the employer-provided benefitunder the latter health plan (or group of plans); the former health plan'snonhighly compensated coverage percentage is at least 80 percent of thehighly compensated coverage percentage; and, after the inclusion of theformer plan in a group with the latter plan, the nonhighly compensatedcoverage percentage remains at least 80 percent of the highly compensatedcoverage percentage for such group. No plan can be included under thisrule if a plan with an employer-provided benefit smaller than the employer-providedbenefit of the plan to be included has previously been included in thegroup of comparable plans under this rule. If the employer elects the alternativegeneral comparability rule of paragraph (c)(2) of this Qandamp;A-4, ``90percent'' must be substituted for ``80 percent'' in the preceding sentence.If the deemed comparability rule of this paragraph (c)(4) is applied bytreating a resulting group of comparable plans as a single health plan,the employer-provided benefit for such single health plan, except as providedin paragraph (c)(5)(i) of this section, is the largest employer-providedbenefit of any plan included in the group. (ii) <T3>Coverage percentages. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (c)(4), ahealth plan's (or health plan group's) nonhighly compensated coverage percentageis the percentage determined by dividing the number of nonhighly compensatedemployees covered by the plan (or the group) by the total number of nonhighlycompensated employees of the employer. A health plan's (or group's) highlycompensated coverage percentage is the percentage determined in the samemanner by reference only to highly compensated employees.(iii) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthe rules of this paragraph (c)(4):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>Assume that an employer maintains four health plansthat constitute a group of comparable plans under the general comparabilityrule of paragraph (c)(1) of this Qandamp;A-4. The employer also maintainsanother health plan that has too large an employer-provided benefit topermit it to be included in the group of comparable plans under the generalcomparability rule. Under this paragraph (c)(4), if the nonhighly compensatedcoverage percentage with respect to such plan is at least 80 percent ofthe highly compensated coverage percentage for such plan and if after inclusionof the plan with the group of four comparable plans, the resulting groupof plans has a nonhighly compensated coverage percentage that is at least80 percent of the highly compensated coverage percentage, then the planmay be included in the group of comparable health plans to form a new groupof comparable plans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Assume the same facts as in Example 1, except thatthe other health plan has too small an employer-provided benefit to permitit to be included in a group of comparable plans under the general comparabilityrule of paragraph (c)(1) of this Qandamp;A-4. If the nonhighly compensatedcoverage percentage for the group of comparable plans is at least 80 percentof the highly compensated coverage percentage for such group, and if, afterinclusion of the other plan with the group of comparable plans, the resultinggroup of plans has a nonhighly compensated coverage percentage that isat least 80 percent of the highly compensated coverage percentage, thenthe group of comparable plans may be included with the other plan to forma new group of comparable plans.</ITAG>(5) <T3>Employee cost comparability_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>Health plans may be treated as a group of comparableplans if such plans are available to all of the employees who are coveredunder any of such plans on the same terms and conditions and the differencein the annual employee costs between the plan in the group with the largestemployee cost and the plan in the group with the smallest employee costis not greater than $100 (adjusted for testing years beginning after 1989in accordance with section 89(g)(1)(E)(v)). Two or more plans generallyare not available on the same terms if the employee cost for one plan isin the form of after-tax employee contributions and the employee cost foranother plan is in the form of salary reduction contributions. A healthplan is available to an employee only if, under all of the facts and circumstances,the plan is reasonably available to such employee. The employer-providedbenefit for a group of comparable plans determined under this paragraph(c)(5)(i) is deemed to be the largest employer-provided core health benefitof any plan included in the group under this paragraph (c)(5)(i). If bothsalary reduction contributions and after-tax employee contributions arerequired under each of the plans, the plans may be treated as comparableif the maximum total amount of such annual contributions under each plandoes not differ from the maximum total amount of such contributions underany of the other plans by more than $100. The rules of this paragraph (c)(5)(i)are illustrated by the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>Assume that an employer maintains two health plans,Plan X and Plan Y. Plan X is provided to employees at no employee cost.Plan Y is available to employees under a cafeteria plan for $100 a year,to be paid through salary reduction contributions. These plans may notbe treated as part of a group of comparable plans under an analysis thatcompares the after-tax employee contributions required for Plan X ($0)with the after-tax employee contributions required for Plan Y ($0) becausePlan Y is not actually available for only $0 in after-tax employee contributions,but rather is available for $100 in salary reduction contributions. However,these plans may be treated as part of a group of comparable plans underan analysis that compares the salary reduction contributions of Plan X($0) with the salary reduction contributions of Plan Y ($100) because thesalary reduction contributions under each plan do not differ by more than$100 and neither plan has any required after-tax contributions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Assume that an employer maintains two health plans,Plan V and Plan W. Plan V is provided to employees for an after-tax employeecontribution of $20 a year and a salary reduction contribution of $20 ayear. Plan W is provided to employees for an after-tax employee contributionof $100 a year and a salary reduction contribution of $100 a year. Thesetwo plans may not be treated as part of a group of comparable plans underthis paragraph (c)(5)(i) because the annual maximum total amount of after-taxand salary reduction contributions under Plan V ($40) differs from themaximum total amount of after-tax and salary reduction contributions forPlan W ($200) by more than $100.</ITAG>(ii) <T3>Coordination rule. </T3>A health plan that is not included in a groupof comparable plans under paragraph (c)(5)(i) of this Qandamp;A-4 may beincluded with such group of comparable plans under the comparability rulesof paragraphs (c)(1) through (c)(4) of this Qandamp;A-4 if such plan andthe group are otherwise comparable under such rules. The employer-providedbenefit under the group of plans is to be determined under the rule ofparagraph (c)(5)(i) of this Qandamp;A-4. (iii) <T3>Special employee cost rule. </T3>A health plan that is not otherwiseincluded in a group of comparable plans may be included in a group withrespect to an employee if the employer-provided benefit under the planto be included is less than the employer-provided benefit of the plan withinthe group of comparable plans with the largest employer-provided benefitand, in the case of a nonhighly compensated employee, the employee is eligibleon the same terms and conditions as other employees to participate in theplan in such group with the largest employer-provided benefit and the annualemployee cost for the employee under the plan to be included is equal toor greater than the greatest employee cost for the employee under any planin the group of comparable plans minus $100. Thus, the rule of this paragraph(c)(5)(iii) applies if a nonhighly compensated employee may choose a moreexpensive plan with a lesser employer-provided benefit than any plan inthe group so long as the conditions of this paragraph (c)(5)(iii) are satisfied.A health plan is available to an employee only if, under all of the factsand circumstances, the plan is reasonably available to such employee. Thisparagraph (c)(5)(iii) may be applied with respect to a health plan anda group of comparable plans or with respect to two groups of comparableplans otherwise determined under paragraph (c)(1) through (c)(3) or (c)(5)of this Qandamp;A-4. In such case, the employer-provided benefit of the groupof comparable plans is the largest employer-provided benefit of any plan(whether or not that plan is a core health plan) in such group and thelowest employee cost permitted within the group of comparable plans isequal to the employee cost for the plan in such group with the largestemployee cost minus $100. The rules of this paragraph (c)(5)(iii) are illustratedby the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>Assume that an employer permits all of its employeesto elect coverage under one of two health plans: Plan A (with an employer-providedbenefit of $3,000 and an employee contribution of $300) and Plan B (withan employer-provided benefit of $2,200 and an employee contribution of$500). These two plans may form a group of comparab1e plans under thisparagraph (c)(5)(iii) because Plan B's employer-provided benefit is lessthan Plan A's employer-provided benefit and Plan B's required employeecontribution of $500 is greater than $200 (i.e., Plan A's required employeecontribution minus $100). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Assume that an employer permits all of its employeesto elect coverage under any one of four health plans: Plan A (with an employer-providedbenefit of $2,000 and an employee contribution of $125); Plan B (with anemployer-provided benefit of $2,500 and an employee contribution of $225);Plan C (with an employer-provided benefit of $3,000 and an employee contributionof $200); and Plan D (with an employer-provided benefit of $2,500 and anemployee contribution of $300). Plans A, B, and C may be included in agroup of comparable plans under the rules of paragraph (c)(5)(i). PlanD may be included in such group under the rules of paragraph (c)(5)(iii)with respect to all employees because Plan D's employer-provided benefitof $2,500 is less than Plan C's employer-provided benefit of $3,000 andPlan D's required employee contribution of $300 is greater than $125 (i.e.,Plan B's required employee contribution of $225 minus $100). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Examp1e 3. </T3>Assume that an employer permits all of its employeesto elect coverage under one of three health plans: Plan A (with an employer-providedbenefit of $3,000 and an employee contribution of $500); Plan B (with anemployer-provided benefit of $2,700 and an employee contribution of $350);and Plan C (with an employer-provided benefit of $2,500 and an employeecontribution of $450). Plans A and B are included in a group of comparableplans determined under paragraph (c)(1) of this Qandamp;A-4 (i.e., 90 percentof $3,000 is $2,700). Plan C may be included in such group under the rulesof this paragraph (c)(5)(iii) because Plan C's employeer-provided benefitof $2,500 is less than Plan A's employer-provided benefit of $3,000 andPlan C's required employee contribution of $450 is greater than $400 (i.e.,Plan A's required employee contribution of $500 minus $100).</ITAG>(iv) <T3>Employee cost. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (c)(5), the term``employee cost'' refers to both the employee's after-tax employee contributionsand salary reduction contributions that are required in order for the employeeto receive coverage under the health plan. The de minimis employee costcomparability rule of this paragraph (c)(5) may be applied on the basisof either after-tax employee contributions or salary reduction contributionsunder a cafeteria plan, but not both. Thus, for example, health Plan Xthat is available for $50 in after-tax employee contributions and healthPlan Y that is available for $100 in salary reduction contributions undera cafeteria plan may not be treated as comparable plans under this paragraph(c)(5).(d) <T3>Mandatory aggregation of plans for the 50 percent eligibility test._</T3>(1)<T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of applying paragraph (d)(3) of Qandamp;A-1of this section (the 50 percent eligibility test), if an employee may receivecoverage under two or more health plans the rules of this paragraph (d)must be applied with respect to such plans. In addition, such plans maynot be included in a group of comparable plans under paragraph (b) of thisQandamp;A-4 with regard to such employee until the rules of this paragraph(d) have been applied with respect to such plans. Such health plans mustbe aggregated into an additional, single health plan that provides allof the coverage provided under any of the separate plans. The additionalplan is treated as having an employer-provided benefit equal to the sumof the employer-provided benefits of each of the included plans (with anappropriate adjustment to eliminate the multiple inclusion of overlappingcoverage). A nonhighly compensated employee is treated as eligible forboth the additional plan and the separate plans. A highly compensated employeeis treated as eligible only for the additional plan and is no longer treatedas eligible for the separate plans. (2) <T3>Special rule for salary reduction contributions. </T3>Any employer-providedbenefit that is a non-core health benefit and is attributable to salaryreduction contributions available to any nonhighly compensated employeethat, after application of paragraph (d)(1) of this Qandamp;A-4, exceedsthe greater of $2,000 (adjusted for testing years beginning after 1989in accordance with 89(g)(1)(E)(v)) or the employee's actual salary reductioncontribution is not considered available to such employee. This paragraph(d)(2) is effective for plan years beginning after December 31, 1989. (3) <T3>Examples. </T3>The provisions of this paragraph (d) are illustratedin the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>Assume that, under an employer's health program, anemployee is permitted to elect coverage under one plan from among two healthindemnity plans provided through insurance companies and two HMO plans.Theindemnity and HMO plans are four alternative health coverages and thusan employer is not required to apply this paragraph (d).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Assume the same facts as <T3>Example 1. </T3>In addition to electing one of the indemnity or HMOplans, an employee may also elect coverage under any one or more of thefollowing plans: a dental plan, a vision plan and various levels of healthcoverage (up to and including $1000) under a health flexible spending arrangement(FSA). Under this paragraph (d), each of the indemnity and HMO plans mustbe aggregated with the 3 elective plans, before testing any of the plansunder the 50 percent eligibility test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 3. </T3>Employee X is a nonhighly compensated employee  andmay receive coverage under either Plan A or Plan B, each of which has anemployer-provided benefit of $500, or under both Plans A and B. Under thisparagraph (d), for Employee X, Plan A and Plan B must be aggregated toform an additional Plan AB for purposes of the 50 percent eligibility test.In addition, Plan AB is treated as having an employer-provided benefitequal to $l,000 (assuming no overlapping coverage). Thus, there are threehealth plans that each must pass the 50 percent eligibility test: PlanA ($500), Plan B ($500), and Plan AB ($l,000). Employee X is treated aseligible for all three plans. </ITAG><T3>Example 4. </T3>An employer maintains two health plans: Plan A ($500)and Plan B ($500). The following table illustrates all of the eligibleemployees for these two plans. In addition, HCE denotes a highly compensatedemployee and NCE denotes a nonhighly compensated employee.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10,r10</C>  <H1>Employee</H1><H1>Plan A</H1><H1>Plan B</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">HCE l <D>500 </D><D>500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 2 <D>500 </D><D>Not elig. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 3 <D>Not elig </D><D>500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 4 <D>500 </D><D>500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE l <D>500 </D><D>500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 2 <D>Not elig </D><D>500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 3 <D>500 </D><D>Not elig. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 4 <D>500 </D><D>Not elig. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 5 <D>Not elig </D><D>500</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">The following table reflects the plans after the application of thisparagraph (d):</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10,r10,r10</C>  <H1>Employee</H1><H1>Plan A</H1><H1>Plan B</H1><H1>Plan AB</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">HCE l <D>Not elig </D><D>Not elig </D><D>1000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 2 <D>500 </D><D>Not elig </D><D>Not elig. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 3 <D>Not elig </D><D>500 </D><D>Not elig. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 4 <D>Not elig </D><D>Not elig </D><D>1000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 1 <D>500 </D><D>500 </D><D>1000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 2 <D>Not elig </D><D>500 </D><D>Not elig. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 3 <D>500 </D><D>Not elig </D><D>Not elig. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 4 <D>500 </D><D>Not elig </D><D>Not elig. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 5 <D>Not elig </D><D>500 </D><D>Not elig.</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">After application of this paragraph (d), there are three plans thatmust satisfy the 50 percent eligibility test. Plan A and Plan B satisfythe 50 percent eligibility test, both as separate plans and as plans includedin a group of comparable plans under paragraph (b) of this Qandamp;A-4. However,Plan AB fails the 50 percent eligibility test. See Qandamp;A-9 for rulesrelating to the determination of the excess benefit with respect to a planthat fails to satisfy the 50 percent eligibility test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 5. </T3>An employer maintains two health plans: Plan A ($1,000)and Plan B ($500). The following table illustrates all of the eligibleemployees for these two plans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10,r10 </C>  <H1>Employee </H1><H1>Plan A </H1><H1>Plan B</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 1 <D>$1,000 </D><D>$500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 2 <D>$1,000 </D><D>$500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 1-100 <D>$1,000 </D><D>Not elig.</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">The following table reflects the plans after the application of thisparagraph (d): </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10,r10,r10 </C>  <H1>Employee </H1><H1>Plan A </H1><H1>Plan B </H1><H1>Plan AB</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 1 <D>Not elig </D><D>Not elig </D><D>$1,500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 2 <D>Not elig </D><D>Not elig </D><D>$1,500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 1-100 <D>$1,000 </D><D>Not elig </D><D>Not elig.</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">After application of this paragraph (d), there are three plans thatmust pass the 50 percent eligibility test. Plan A passes the 50 percenteligibility test. Plan B is no longer available to any employee and isnot required to be tested under the 50 percent eligibility test. However,Plan AB fails the 50 percent eligibility test. Under Qandamp;A-9, an excessbenefit must be imputed to HCEs 1 and 2 so that Plan AB may be includedin a group of comparable plans under paragraph (b) of this Qandamp;A-4.</ITAG>(e) <T3>Mandatory aggregation of plans for the 80 percent coverage test_</T3>(1)<T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of applying paragraph (e) of Qandamp;A-1of this section (the 80 percent coverage test), if an employee receivescoverage under two or more health plans the rules of this paragraph (e)must be applied with respect to such plans. In addition, such plans maynot be included in a group of comparable plans under paragraph (c) of thisQandamp;A-4 with regard to such employee until the rules of this paragraph(e) have been applied with respect to such plans. Such health plans mustbe aggregated into an additional, single health plan that provides allof the coverage that is provided under any of the separate plans. The additionalplan is treated as having an employer-provided benefit equal to the sumof the employer-provided benefits of each of the included plans (with anappropriate adjustment to eliminate the multiple inclusion of overlappingcoverage). A nonhighly compensated employee is treated as covered underboth the additional plan and the separate plans. A highly compensated employeeis treated as covered under the additional plan and not covered under theseparate plans. (2) <T3>Exception. </T3>This paragraph (e) does not apply with respect to twoor more health plans if at least 90 percent of the nonhighly compensatedemployees eligible for coverage under each plan are eligible for coverageunder all of such plans on the same terms and conditions as other employees,and each plan (prior to application of the comparability rules of paragraph(c) of this Qandamp;A-4) satisfies the 80 percent coverage test. (3) <T3>Examples. </T3>The provisions of this paragraph (e) are illustratedby the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>Assume that an employer maintains two health plans,Plan A and Plan B. Each has an employer-provided benefit of $500. Also,each plan covers 45 percent of the employer's nonhighly compensated employeeswho are not covered by the other plan. Employee X, a highly compensatedemployee, and Employee Y, a nonhighly compensated employee, are coveredby both Plan A and Plan B. Plan A and Plan B must be aggregated to forman additional single health plan because the exception of paragraph (e)(2)of this Qandamp;A-4 does not apply. Thus, there are three health plans: PlanA ($500), Plan B ($500), and Plan AB ($1,000). The plans fail the 80 percentcoverage test because Plan AB may not be included with Plan A and PlanB under any of the comparability rules of paragraph (c) of this Qandamp;A-4.Thus, the employer-provided benefit under Plan AB must be reduced to $526with respect to Employee X for all plans to pass the 80 percent coveragetest. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Assume that an employer maintains two health plans,Plan A and Plan B. Each has an employer-provided benefit of $500. Eachplan is available on the same terms to all employees of the employer andcovers over 80 percent of the employer's nonhighly compensated employees.Because these plans qualify for the exception of paragraph (e)(2) of thisQandamp;A-4, the employer is not required to aggregate the plans under thisparagraph (e). Plan A and Plan B each satisfy the 80 percent coverage test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 3. </T3>An employer maintains two health plans. Plan A hasan employer-provided benefit of $1,000 and Plan B has an employer-providedbenefit of $500. The following table illustrates all of the eligible employeesfor these two plans. HCE denotes a highly compensated employee and NCEdenotes a nonhighly compensated employee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10,r10 </C>  <H1>Employee </H1><H1>Plan A </H1><H1>Plan B</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 1 <D>$1,000 </D><D>$500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 2 <D>$1,000 </D><D>Not elig. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 1 <D>$1,000 </D><D>$500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 2-100 <D>$1,000 </D><D>Not elig.</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">The following table reflects the plans after the application of thisparagraph (e): </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r10,r10,r10 </C>   <H1>Employee </H1><H1>Plan A </H1><H1>Plan B </H1><H1>Plan AB</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 1 <D>Not elig </D><D>Not elig </D><D>$1,500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HCE 2 <D>$1,000 </D><D>Not elig </D><D>Not elig. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 1 <D>$1,000 </D><D>$500 </D><D>$1,500 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NCE 2-100 <D>$1,000 </D><D>Not elig </D><D>Not elig.</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">After application of this paragraph (e), there are three plans thatmust be comparable in order for the plans to pass the 80 percent coveragetest. The plans fail the 80 percent coverage test even though Plans A andB may be included in a group of comparable plans under paragraph (c)(3)because Plan AB may not be included in a group of comparable plans withPlan A and Plan B under any of the rules of paragraph (c) of this Qandamp;A-4for inclusion in a group of comparable plans with Plans A and B. It does,however, pass the 50 percent eligibility test, and therefore Plan AB'semployer-provided benefit may be reduced to $1,111 ($1,000 is 90 percentof $1,111) and the health plans will be considered comparable.</ITAG>(f) <T3>Permissive plan restructuring. </T3>For purposes of applying paragraphs(d)(3) and (e) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section (the 50 percent eligibilitytest and the 80 percent coverage test, respectively) an employer may, incertain circumstances, restructure two or more health plans into two ormore restructured health plans on the basis of the value of coverages undersuch plans. To the extent mandatory aggregation is applicable and if theemployer decides to apply the comparability rules of this Qandamp;A-4, suchmandatory aggregation and comparability rules must be applied only priorto the application of the permissive restructuring rule of this paragraph(f). Pursuant to this rule, two or more health plans may be restructuredinto one health plan of common value and two or more plans of distinctvalues. In all cases, to the extent the values of any plans being restructuredare equivalent, the values may be restructured into only one plan. In nocase may the plan (or plans) with the lowest value be restructured intotwo or more plans with a lower value. Thus, for example, if an employerhas three plans (after the application of the mandatory aggregation andthe comparability rules of this Qandamp;A-4), Plan A with an employer-providedbenefit of $7,000, Plan B with an employer-provided benefit of $6,000 andPlan C with an employer-provided benefit of $4,000 the employer may restructurethe three plans only in the following manner: A plan providing employer-providedbenefits of $4,000, $2,000 and $1,000 respectively. (g) <T3>Authority to issue additional requirements. </T3>The Commissioner,in revenue rulings, notices and other publications of general applicability,may make any modification to, or issue such additional requirements forthe application of, the rules contained in this Qandamp;A-4 as may be necessaryto ensure proper compliance with the intent of such rules and section 89(g)(1). Q-5: What is the testing methodology for applying the nondiscriminationrules under section 89?  A-5: (a)<T3> In general.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in this Qandamp;A-5, thedetermination of whether a statutory employee benefit plan is a discriminatoryemployee benefit plan for a testing Year is made on the basis of all ofthe applicable facts with respect to the employees of the employer as ofthe testing day included within such testing year. Such facts generallyare to be treated as in existence for the entire testing year.  (b)<T3> Adjustments to facts on the testing day_</T3>(1)<T3> Changes in plan terms.</T3> If the employer-provided benefit (actuallyprovided or made available) of an employee who is taken into account onthe testing day changes during the testing year (either before or afterthe testing day) in connection with any change in plan terms, the amounttaken into account as such employee's employer-provided benefit for suchtesting year must be adjusted to reflect the employer-provided benefitfor the portions of the testing year both before and after such change. (2)<T3> Election changes by highly compensated employees_</T3>(i) <T3> In general.</T3> If the employer-provided benefit (actually providedor made available) of a highly compensated employee for a testing yearwho is taken into account on the testing day changes during the testingyear (either before or after the testing day) solely on account of an electionof the employee. the amount taken into account as such employee's employer-providedbenefit for such testing year must be adjusted to reflect the employer-provided benefit for the portions of the testing year both before and after suchchange.  (ii)<T3> Special rule for the first quarter of each testing year. </T3> Anemployer must make the adjustments otherwise required under this paragraph(b)(2) for election changes during the first quarter of a testing yearonly for those election changes by employees who were highly compensatedemployees for the immediately preceding testing year and employees who,for the current testing year, either are among the 100 highly compensatedemployees who receive the most compensation for the current testing yearor are 5 percent owners of the employer (as determined under section 416(i)). (3)<T3> Distinction between changes in plan terms and election changes.</T3>A change in an employee's employer-provided benefit is treated as an electionchange only if such change is exclusively attributable to an election changeby the employee that is not in connection with or otherwise related toany change in the terms of the plan or other plans of the same type availableto the employee. Changes in an employee's employer-provided benefit aretreated as attributable to changes in plan terms even if the changes arepursuant to an election of the employee that occurs in conjunction withany change in the terms of the plan (or of another plan of the same typeavailable to such employee). Thus. for example, if during an open seasonor election period an employee elects to change health plan coverage andthere is any change to any one or more of the health plans available tosuch  employee during the open season, such employee's change in employer-providedbenefit is treated as in connection with a change in plan terms even ifthe employee is not covered, either before or after the open season, bya health plan that changed. An increase or decrease in the after-tax employeecontributions or employer contributions, including salary reduction contributions,is treated as a change in plan terms.  (4)<T3> Taking required adjustments into account_</T3>(i)<T3> In general.</T3> Adjustments taken into account under this paragraph(b) are to be taken into account as of the effective date of the changein the employer-provided benefit.  (ii)<T3> Adjustment period rule_(A)</T3><T3> In general.</T3> If the requirements of paragraph (b)(4)(ii)(B) and(C) of this Qandamp;A-5 are satisfied, an employer may on a uniform and consistentbasis treat employer-provided benefit changes as having become effectiveas of the first day of the applicable adjustment period or periods.  (B) <T3>Adjustment period.</T3> The requirement of this paragraph (b)(4)(ii)(B)is satisfied only if the employer uses at least 24 adjustment periods forits testing year. Adjustment periods must be regular, uniform periods throughoutthe testing year. For example, an employer may use each 2-week pay periodas an adjustment period.  (C)<T3> Applicable adjustment periods.</T3> The requirement of this paragraph(b)(4)(ii)(C) is satisfied only if, in the case of a nonhighly compensatedemployee, the lowest employer-provided  benefit of such employee on anyday during an adjustment period is taken into account for at least eitherthe current adjustment period (i.e., the period during which the changein employer-provided benefit occurred) or the adjustment period immediatelyfollowing the effective date of the benefit change. In the case of a highlycompensated employee, the highest employer-provided benefit of such employeeon any day during an adjustment period must be taken into account for atleast either the current adjustment period or the adjustment period immediatelyfollowing the effective date of the benefit change.  (5)<T3> Transition rule for 1989_</T3> (i)<T3> In general.</T3> For any testing year that begins prior to July l,1989, the employer may apply the nondiscrimination rules of section 89(including the rules of Qandamp;A-2 of this section) with respect to itshealth plans for such testing year in accordance with the rules in paragraph(b)(5)(ii) through (iv) of this Qandamp;A-5.  (ii)<T3> Partial testing year.</T3> The facts with respect to all employeesof the employer as of the testing day for the testing year are to be treatedas in existence for the entire partial testing year. The partial testingyear begins on the earliest of July l, 1989; the testing day for such testingyear; or the first day of the calendar month beginning three months beforethe end of the testing year. The last day of the partial testing year isthe last day of such testing year.  (iii) <T3>Adjustments.</T3> The employer-provided benefit (received or made available)of an employee determined as of the testing  day is to be adjusted forthe partial testing year as required under this paragraph (b) for electionsand plan design changes occurring during the partial testing year as ifthe partial testing year were the entire testing year.(iv)<T3> Annualization of employer-provided benefit.</T3> The employer-providedbenefit (received or made available) of an employee for the partial testingyear (determined after the application of the other rules in this paragraph(b)(5)) is multiplied by the applicable fraction for the testing year andsuch product is deemed to be the employer-provided benefit (received ormade available) of the employee for the testing year for purposes of applyingthe section 89 nondiscrimination tests to such testing year. The numeratorof the applicable fraction for a testing year is the total number of calendarmonths in the testing year and the denominator of such fraction is thenumber of calendar months in the partial testing year.(v)<T3> Transition rule inapplicable with respect to certain plans</T3>_(A)<T3> Changes in plan terms. </T3>The rule of this paragraph (b)(5) is notavailable with respect to a health plan that provides an employer-providedbenefit for the partial testing year that is less, by more than a de minimisamount, than such plan's employer-provided benefit for the portion of thetesting year that precedes the partial testing year. Thus, for example,the rule of this paragraph (b)(5) is not available if an employer amendsits health plan to provide that employee contributions for coverage duringthe partial testing year are to be in the form of after-tax employee contributionsrather than salary reduction contributions. See paragraph (c) of Qandamp;A-1of this section (the nondiscriminatory provisions test).(B)<T3> New plans.</T3> The rule of this paragraph (b)(5) is not availablewith respect to a health plan that is first established, or coverage undera health plan that is first provided, on or after January 1, 1989, andthat terminates or ceases to be provided before the end of the partialtesting year. Also, such plan or coverage may fail to satisfy the requirementof section 89(k)(1)(E) (that a plan be established with the intention ofbeing maintained for an indefinite period of time).(C)<T3> Certain discriminatory plans.</T3> The rule of this paragraph (b)(5)is not applicable with regard to a plan unless, for the testing year, atleast 25 percent of those employees eligible to participate in the planare nonhighly compensated employees or such plan satisfies the alternative50 percent eligibility test of paragraph (d)(3)(iii) of Qandamp;A-1 of thissection. The rules of Qandamp;A-4 of this section are not available in determiningwhether a plan meets this 25 percent requirement.(vi)<T3> Example.</T3> The rules of this paragraph (b)(5) are illustrated inthe following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> Assume that an employer maintains several health plans,one of which has a plan year beginning on January 1, 1989. The employerelects to use a calendar year testing year for purposes of testing itshealth plans under section 89. Under this paragraph (b)(5), if the employerelects a testing day of July 1, 1989 (or any day after such date and beforeJanuary 1, 1990), the employer may apply the testing day and benefit adjustmentrules of section 89 to the period between July 1, 1989 and January 1, 1990as if such period were the entire testing year. Thus, for example, onlythose benefit changes that occur during the partial testing year need tobe taken into account under the rules of this paragraph (b). Then, employees'employer-provided benefits (received or made available) for the partialtesting year are converted into employer-provided benefits for the fulltesting year by multiplying each of such benefits by two (i.e., 12/6, whichis the applicable fraction, the numerator of which is the total numberof calendar months in the testing year and the denominator of which isthe number of calendar months in the partial testing year). The section89 nondiscrimination tests are then applied with respect to such annualizedemployer-provided benefits.</ITAG>(c)<T3> Testing day.</T3> The testing day is the single day within the testingyear that is elected in writing as the testing day for purposes of applyingthe nondiscrimination tests of section 89 with respect to the testing year.The testing day is not required to be designated in the single writtendocument required under section 89(k)(1)(A) (See Qandamp;A-3 of andSection;1.89(k)(1). If a testing day is not elected in writing, the testing dayis the last day of the testing year. All plans of the same type. and plansthat are not of the same type but are treated as of the same type for nondiscriminationtesting under section 89, must have the same testing day. The testing dayfor any testing year beginning after December 31, 1990, is the same testingday used for the immediately preceding testing year unless a change insuch testing day is made with the consent of the Commissioner or is inaccordance with such rules as the Commissioner may provide with respectto changes in testing days. The election of a testing day is subject tothe requirements of the nondiscriminatory provisions test of paragraph(c) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section. Thus, an employer's testing day mustreasonably reflect the employee pool of the employer and the business ofthe employer throughout the year.(d)<T3> Sampling.</T3> For purposes of determining whether a statutory employeebenefit plan is a discriminatory employee benefit plan, an employer mayelect in writing to apply the rules of paragraphs (d) and (e) of Qandamp;A-1of this section (the general eligibility and benefits tests and the alternative80 percent coverage test, respectively), paragraph (c) of Qandamp;A-2 ofthis section (the special rule for certain large employers), and paragraph(c)(4) of Qandamp;A-3 of this section (relating to sworn statements) on thebasis of a statistically valid random sample of the employer's employees.A sample is statistically valid for purposes of this paragraph (d) onlyif the statistical method and sample size result in at least a 95 percentprobability that the results of the sample with respect to the applicablerequirements have a margin of error not greater than 3 percent. Also, thestatistical validity of the sample and statistical method and analysismust be confirmed in a written opinion of a qualified and independent thirdparty. Q-6: What is the period for testing whether the nondiscrimination rulesof section 89 are satisfied?  A-6: (a)<T3> Testing year_</T3>(1)<T3> In general.</T3> An employer must apply the nondiscrimination testsof section 89 to its health plans and other statutory employee benefitplans on the basis of a testing year that begins on the first day of acalendar month and ends on the last day of a calendar month, regardlessof the beginning of the plan year or years of such plans. Unless the employerelects otherwise in accordance with paragraph (a)(2) of this Qandamp;A-6,the testing year for all statutory employee benefit plans is the calendaryear.  (2)<T3> Election of different testing year.</T3> An employer may elect a uniform12-month testing year other than the calendar year for purposes of applyingthe section 89 nondiscrimination tests to all plans of the same type. Thus,for example, an employer may elect to apply the section 89 nondiscriminationtests to all of its health plans on the basis of an April 1 to March 31testing year. In addition, if the 75 percent benefits test is applied onan aggregate basis to plans of different types (e.g., health plans, group-termlife insurance plans, and dependent care assistance programs) as thoughsuch plans were plans of the same type, the same testing year must be usedwith respect to all such plans.  (3)<T3> Election.</T3> An employer must make the election of a testing yeardescribed in paragraph (a)(2) of this Qandamp;A-6 in writing prior to thecommencement of the testing year to which the election relates. See paragraph(b)(3) of this Qandamp;A-6 for a transition rule for 1989.  (b)<T3> First testing year in 1989_</T3>(1) <T3>In general.</T3> Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this Qandamp;A-6, forthe first testing year applicable with respect to plans of the same type,the employer may elect to apply the section 89 nondiscrimination testswith respect to all plans of the same type on the basis of any 12-monthperiod beginning on the first day of any calendar month beginning on orafter January l, 1989, but no later than the first day that any plan ofsuch type first becomes subject to the section 89 nondiscrimination tests.The rule of this paragraph (b) is applicable even though not all of theplans of the same type are subject to the section 89 nondiscriminationtests for the entire first testing year. See paragraph (c) of this Qandamp;A-6for special rules applicable to the section 89 nondiscrimination testsin such cases. The rule of this paragraph (b)(1) is illustrated in thefollowing example:<ITAG tagnum="21"> <T3> Example.</T3> Assume that an employer maintains three health plans,Plan A, Plan B and Plan C. Plan A's plan year begins on March 1, Plan B'splan year begins on July l, and Plan C's plan year begins on September1. The section 89 nondiscrimination rules apply to plan years that beginafter December 31, 1988. For these plans, the employer may elect as itsfirst testing year under section 89 any 12-month period beginning on orafter January 1, 1989, and on or before March 1, 1989. This is the caseeven though not all of the health coverage provided during any of thesepossible first testing years is subject to the section 89 nondiscriminationtests.</ITAG> (2)<T3> Short testing year.</T3> An employer may elect to apply the section89 nondiscrimination tests to its first testing year commencing in 1989with respect to all plans of the same type on  the basis of a first testingyear that is shorter than 12 months in duration. However, if an employerapplies the section 89 nondiscrimination tests on the basis of such a shortfirst testing year, the second testing year for such employer for suchplans must be 12 months in duration. In addition, in no case may any employer-providedbenefit subject to the section 89 nondiscrimination tests either be excludedfrom consideration in a testing year or considered in more than one testingyear. The rule of this paragraph (b)(2) is illustrated in the followingexample:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example.</T3> Assume that an employer's first testing year in 1989for its health plans commences on March 1, 1989. The employer may electto use a first testing year of March l, 1989, to December 31, 1989, forall of its health plans. In such case, the employer's second testing yearmust commence on January 1, 1990, and must be 12 months in duration.</ITAG> (3)<T3> Election_</T3>(i)<T3> First day.</T3> An employer must elect the first day of the firsttesting year beginning in 1989 with respect to plans of the same type inwriting prior to the earlier of the first day of the second testing yearfor such plans or January l, 1990. If an employer fails to make an electionby such required date with respect to plans of the same type, the firstday of the first testing year beginning in 1989 for all plans of such typeis January 1, 1989.  (ii)<T3> Last day.</T3> If an employer uses a short testing year for the firsttesting year beginning in 1989 with respect to plans of the same type,the employer must elect the last day of such year in writing prior to suchlast day. Thus, for example, if an employer decides to begin the firsttesting year for its health  plans on March l, 1989, and, after such date,decides to use a calendar year testing year beginning in 1990, the employermust, before December 31, 1989, elect December 31, 1989, as the last dayof the first testing year.  (c)<T3> Testing where not all plans are subject to section 89_</T3> (1)<T3> In general.</T3> If, during a testing year with respect to plans ofthe same type, there is any employer-provided benefit that is not subjectto the section 89 nondiscrimination rules for the entire testing year,the rules of this paragraph (c) apply for purposes of testing and excessbenefit calculations.  (2)<T3> Testing.</T3> All employer-provided benefits available or providedduring the first testing year applicable with respect to plans of the sametype are taken into account in applying the nondiscrimination tests ofsection 89. This is the case even if such employer-provided benefits areprovided under a plan that is not yet subject to section 89. The rule ofthis paragraph (c)(2) is illustrated in the following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> Assume that an employer maintains three health plans.Plan A's plan year begins on March 1, Plan B's plan year begins on July1, and plan C's plan year begins on September 1. The section 89 nondiscriminationrules apply to plan years that begin after December 31, 1988. Assume furtherthat the employer elects as its first testing year under section 89 the12-month period beginning on March 1, 1989. For purposes of applying thenondiscrimination tests of section 89, all health coverage provided duringthis 12-month period, including coverage under Plans B and C from March1, 1989, until July 1, 1989, and September 1, 1989, respectively, is takeninto account. </ITAG> <T3> (3) Excess benefit calculation_</T3>(i)<T3> In general.</T3> If, during a testing year with respect to plans ofthe same type, an employer-provided benefit under one plan is not yet subjectto  the section 89 nondiscrimination rules and another plan subject tosection 89 fails to satisfy the nondiscrimination rules, the rules of thisparagraph (c)(3) apply for purposes of calculating the amount of excessbenefit (if any) that is attributable to employer-provided benefits subjectto section 89 for such testing year. Plans that are not of the same typebut are being tested under the 75 percent benefits test as if they wereof the same type are to be treated as plans of the same type for purposesof this paragraph (c)(3).(ii) <T3>Total excess benefit. </T3>The excess benefit for the testing yearwith respect to plans of the same type is calculated with regard to anemployee under the generally applicable rules of section 89 as if all employer-providedbenefits provided under such plans during such year were subject to section89. See Qandamp;A-9 of this section for rules governing the determinationof excess benefits. (iii) <T3>Excess benefit subject to section 89_</T3>(A) <T3>Determination with respect to the 90 percent/50 percent eligibilityand 75 percent benefits tests. </T3>For purposes of determining excessbenefit resulting from the failure of the employer to meet the requirementsof paragraph (d)(2) or (d)(4) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section, the portionof an excess benefit that is attributable to employer-provided benefitssubject to section 89 for the testing year with respect to the plan orplans being tested is determined by multiplying the excess benefit determinedunder paragraph (c)(3)(ii) of this Qandamp;A-6 by a fraction. The numeratorof the fraction is the total employer-provided benefit for the highly compensatedemployee under the plan or plans being tested that are subject to section89, and the denominator is the total employer-provided benefit for thehighly compensated employee under the plan or plans being tested for thefirst testing year, whether or not they are subject to section 89. Therule of this paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(A) is illustrated by the following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Assume that an employer maintains two health plans, PlanA and Plan B. The plan years for these plans and the effective dates forthese plans for purposes of section 89 are January 1, 1989, and July 1,1989, respectively. Plan A provides health coverage with an annual employer-providedbenefit of $1,000, and Plan B provides health coverage with an annual,employer-provided benefit of $2,000. In each case, the employer provided-benefitfor the 1989 year is the same as the benefit for the prior year. With regardto its health plans, the employer uses a 12-month testing year beginningon January l, 1989. Thus, in applying the section 89 nondiscriminationtests, all health coverage under Plan B for this testing year must be takeninto account. Assume that, for the 1989 testing year, the employer determinesthat a highly compensated employee who was in Plan A and Plan B for theentire testing year has an excess benefit of $500 for the testing period.The applicable fraction for this employee is $2,000/$3,000. The $2,000numerator represents the annual employer-provided benefit of Plan A ($l,000)because it was subject to section 89 for the entire testing year plus \1/2\of the annual employer-provided benefit of Plan B ($2,000) because it wasonly subject to section 89 for \1/2\ of the testing year. The denominatoris the annual employer-provided benefit of Plans A and B. Thus, the employeeis treated as having received an excess benefit in the amount of $333.33(i.e., 66\2/3\ percent of $500).</ITAG>(B) <T3>Determination with respect to 50 percent eligibility and 80 percentcoverage tests. </T3>If an excess benefit with regard to a highly compensatedemployee is attributable to a plan failing to meet the requirements ofthe 50 percent eligibility test or the 80 percent coverage test, then thisparagraph (c)(3) (iii)(B) applies. The portion of an employee's excessbenefit that is attributable to employer-provided benefits for the testingyear with respect to the plan or plans being tested is determined by multiplyingthe excess benefit determined under paragraph (c)(3)(ii) of this Qandamp;A-6by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number of months inthe testing year that the plan or plans failing the applicable requirementis subject to section 89, and the denominator is the number of months thatconstitute such testing year. In the case of plans that have become subjectto section 89 at different times during the testing year, which plans areaggregated under the mandatory aggregation requirements of paragraphs (d)and (e) of Qandamp;A-4 of this section, the excess benefit is determinedby calculating a weighted average for each of the originally separate plansin the aggregated plan and adding together such weighted averages. Theweighted average for each plan is determined by multiplying the excessbenefit by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the product ofthe total amount of the employer-provided benefit for the plan year (withoutregard to whether such coverage was subject to section 89 for the entiretesting year) multiplied by the number of months that such plan has beensubject to section 89. The denominator is the product of the total amountof the employer-provided benefit for all the plans in the aggregated plan(without regard to whether such coverage was subject to section 89 forthe entire testing year) multiplied by the number of months in the testingyear. (d) <T3>Changes in testing year_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Subject to paragraph (d)(2) of this Qandamp;A-6, anemployer may elect to change its testing year with respect to plans ofthe same type if such election is made in writing prior to the beginningof such new testing year. In no case may any such change result in anyemployer-provided benefit subject to the section 89 nondiscrimination testsnot being included in any testing year or being included in more than onetesting year. See also paragraph (b)(2) of this Qandamp;A-6 (precluding changesin an employer's second testing year with respect to plans of the sametype if the employer has elected a short first testing year for 1989).(2) <T3>Commissioner approval. </T3>An employer's election to change its testingyear with respect to plans of the same type subject to section 89 may bemade without the prior approval of the Commissioner, provided that thefirst day of the new testing year is on or before January 1, 1991, suchchange otherwise meets the requirements of paragraph (d)(1) of this Qandamp;A-6,and such change has no discriminatory effect. For all subsequent changesin testing years, the employer must obtain the prior approval of the Commissioneror must meet such requirements as the Commissioner may otherwise prescribe.(3) <T3>Example. </T3>The provisions of this paragraph (d) are illustratedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>An employer is using the calendar year as its testingyear for its health plans. On October 3, 1990, the employer designatesthe 12-month period beginning each December l as its new testing year,effective December 1, 1990. This is a permissible change in testing year.The result of this designation is that the employer's testing year beginningon January l, 1990, is a short year ending on November 30, 1990.</ITAG>Q-7: For purposes of applying section 89(a) to an employer's health plan,what rules apply for determining the employer-provided benefit and calculatingthe excess benefits? A-7: (a)<T3> In general.</T3> For purposes of nondiscrimination testing under section89, the employer-provided benefit under a health plan is the value of thehealth coverage under the plan that is attributable to employer contributions,determined in accordance with the rules in this Qandamp;A-7. See paragraph(h) of this Qandamp;A-7 for rules governing the determination of the excessbenefit (if any) under section 89.(b)<T3> Reasonable valuation methods_</T3>(1)<T3> In general.</T3> Prior to the effective date of procedures prescribedby the Secretary in accordance with section 89(g)(3)(B), employers mayuse any reasonable valuation method for valuing health coverage under eachplan for purposes of applying the nondiscrimination tests of section 89.The employer must be able to demonstrate that its method for valuing suchhealth coverage is actuarially reasonable. All features of a health planmust be taken into account under a reasonable method. However, unless theemployer is using a reasonable cost method to value health coverage (inaccordance with paragraph (c) of this Qandamp;A-7), a reasonable valuationmethod may disregard those features that have a de minimis effect on thetotal value of the coverage under the plan and are not disproportionatelyavailable to highly compensated employees. The features that are disregardedcannot, in the aggregate, result in a more than de minimis effect on thetotal value of the plan. If a feature is disregarded as de minimis withrespect to one health plan, it must be disregarded with respect to allhealth plans. An entitlement to a periodic medical diagnostic or physicalexamination, whether or not required as a condition of employment, is notconsidered to have a de minimis effect on the total value of the healthcoverage under the plan and thus the entitlement must be taken into accountin valuing coverage even if the plan is available to nonhighly compensatedemployees on the same or a more favorable basis than it is to highly compensatedemployees and even for employees who do not actually undergo the coveredexaminations.(2)<T3> Presumption where value is substantially unrelated to cost.</T3> Ifthe employer is not using a cost method permitted under section 4980B tovalue heaIth coverage (in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Qandamp;A-7),a valuation method is presumed to be unreasonable if the relative valuesof the plans determined under such method do not reasonably reflect therelative values that would be determined for the plans using a cost methodpermitted under section 4980B. However, the fact that the relative valuesof the plans determined by the employer reasonably reflect the relativevalues of such plans under a cost method permitted under section 4980Bdoes not mean that the valuation method is necessarily reasonable. Theprovisions of this paragraph (b)(2) are illustrated in the following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> Assume that an employer maintains three health plansfor its employees and does not use a cost method permitted under section4980B for purposes of determining the employer-provided benefits with respectto these plans. The applicable premiums under the cost method used undersection 4980B(f)(4) for these plans are as follows: Plan A, $2,500; PlanB, $2,000; and Plan C, $2,100. Thus, Plan B's value under the cost methodis 80 percent of Plan A's value, and Plan C's value, is 84 percent of PlanA's value. Under the employer's valuation method, the values of the plansare as follows: Plan A, $1,600; Plan B, $2,400; and Plan C, $400. Thus,under the employer's valuation method, Plan B's value is 150 percent ofthe value of Plan A, and Plan C's value is 25 percent of Plan A's value.These relative values do not reasonably reflect the relative values underthe section 4980B cost method. Thus, the presumption of this paragraph(b)(2) applies, and unless the employer can demonstrate otherwise, itsvaluation method is not considered reasonable.</ITAG>(3)<T3> De minimis effect.</T3> A feature does not have a de minimis effecton the total value of coverage unless it is demonstrably difficult to valuesuch feature and, if it were valued, the feature would be insignificantin value.(4)<T3> Disproportionate ratio.</T3> A de minimis feature of a health planis not considered to be disproportionately available to highly compensatedemployees if that feature, treated as a separate plan, meets the requirementsof paragraph (d)(3) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section (the 50 percent eligibilitytest). For purposes of this paragraph (b)(4), the availability of the featureis determined based on all health plans of the employer.(c)<T3> Reasonable cost method_(1)</T3><T3> In general.</T3> An employer is deemed to be using a reasonable valuationmethod that satisfies the requirements of paragraph (b) of this Qandamp;A-7if the employer is using a reasonable cost method as described in thisparagraph (c) to value its health coverage. The employer must be able todemonstrate that its method for determining the cost of health coverageis actuarially reasonable. The method that the employer uses to determinethe applicable premium for purposes of the continuation coverage requirementsfor group health plans in accordance with section 4980B(f)(4) is deemedto be a reasonable cost method. If a health plan is not subject to therequirements of section 4980B, the employer may calculate cost on the basisof a method permitted to be used for determining an applicable premiumunder section 4980B(f)(4) as if such plan were subject to that section.A cost method does not fail to be a reasonable valuation method for purposesof section 89 merely because the calculation of cost takes into accountthe average annual cost under section 4980B(f)(4) of substantially similarcoverage for the immediately preceding two years or the immediately precedingyear if two years' data are not available or if data for the two yearswould not be reasonable to use under the facts and circumstances of thecase.(2)<T3> Certain permitted adjustments_</T3>(i)<T3> In general.</T3> An employer may elect in writing to make certainadjustments to the cost of health coverage in determining the value ofsuch coverage under a reasonable cost method. These adjustments are intendedto eliminate cost differences that are unrelated to the relative valueof health coverage. These adjustments may be made only to the extent theyhave not already been taken into account (if permitted) under the methodof determining the applicable premium under section 4980B. If an employermakes an adjustment of the type described in this paragraph (c)(2) withrespect to one health plan, the employer must make that same type of adjustmentfor all health plans. Thus, if an employer maintains two plans providingidentical coverage at two geographic locations and elects to make the geographicadjustment permitted in paragraph (c)(2)(ii) with respect to such plans,the employer must make a geographic adjustment to all plans at all locationssince the values of these plans are compared to one another under the varioustests contained in section 89.(ii)<T3> Geographic adjustment.</T3> Costs may be adjusted to eliminate differencesin cost solely attributable to the employer's operation in significantlyseparate geographic locations.(iii) <T3>Demographic adjustment. </T3>Costs may be adjusted to eliminate differencesin cost solely attributable to the different demographic characteristics(other than family status) of the participants in the plans.(iv) <T3>Utilization adjustment. </T3>Costs may be adjusted to eliminate differencesin costs solely attributable to differences in the utilization of coveragefeatures common to two or more separate health plans. This adjustment mustbe made by allocating the total cost for a common feature among all theplans with such feature on the basis of the number of employees coveredby such feature under each of the plans. The adjustment under this paragraph(c)(iv) is to be made only after all other adjustments that are permittedin this paragraph (c).(d) <T3>Certain cost containment features. </T3>A valuation method is not unreasonableif it fails to make adjustments for bona fide cost containment features,such as second opinion requirements or requirements for physician approvalprior to referral for specialized medical care. In addition, a valuationmethod generally is not reasonable if it makes adjustments based on themethod of health benefit delivery (e.g., traditional indemnity plans, healthmaintenance organizations and preferred provider organizations).(e) <T3>Consistency rule. </T3>With the exception of certain multiemployerplans (see section 89(g)(3)(E)), an employer must use the same valuationmethod (including any permitted adjustment under this Qandamp;A-7) to valueall of the health plans that are tested together under section 89.(f) <T3>Health coverage under flexible spending arrangements. </T3>In the caseof a health plan provided under a flexible spending arrangement (FSA) (asdefined in Qandamp;A-7 of andSection; 1.125-2), the value of the coverage fora year generally is equal to the total cost (i.e., required premium orpayment) of the coverage for the year, whether or not such cost is paidthrough employer contributions, including salary reduction contributions,or after-tax employee contributions. If an employer is separately testingemployee-only health coverage and family-only health coverage (in accordancewith paragraph (c) of Qandamp;A-3 of this section) and health coverage underan FSA is applicable to employees and their family members, the employermay elect to treat 40 percent of the value of the coverage under the healthFSA as family-only coverage and 60 percent of such value as employee-onlycoverage. This election must apply with respect to all employees who havea spouse or dependent. The rule of this paragraph (f) is illustrated inthe following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Assume that an employer maintains a cafeteria plan underwhich an employee may elect to reduce his or her salary by any amount ofcompensation for a year, to a maximum of $2,000, for reimbursements forhealth expenses. Assume further that the maximum reimbursement for anyparticular employee under the arrangement for a year is equal to the amountthe employee has elected to reduce his or her salary for the year. Thisarrangement is a health flexible spending arrangement (FSA). Each differentamount by which an employee may elect to reduce his or her salary for ayear is a separate health plan under the FSA. The salary reduction contributionsare employee premium payments for the level of health coverage electedfor the year. For purposes of the 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test(if salary reduction contributions are treated as employer contributionsunder the rules of Qandamp;A-8 of this section), the health plan under theFSA with the largest employer-provided benefit is the plan with a $2,000maximum reimbursement. Because all employees may elect any level of coverageunder the health FSA, all of the health plans included in the health FSAsatisfy the 50 percent eligibility test. For purposes of the 75 percentbenefits test, if an employee elects to receive health coverage under theFSA providing for the reimbursement of up to $1,200 of health expensesfor a year, the value of such coverage received for the year is $1,200.This is the case without regard to whether the employee actually pays thetotal required premium for the coverage, as long as the employee receivesthe coverage. Finally, for purposes of the 80 percent coverage test, eachdifferent level of coverage under the health FSA is a separate health planwith a value equal to the cost of such level of coverage.</ITAG>(g) <T3>Health coverage attributable to employer contributions_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>The portion of the value of the health coverage ofa plan that is attributable to employer contributions is determined bymultiplying the value of the health coverage of the plan (determined underparagraphs (b) through (f) of this Qandamp;A-7) by a fraction. The numeratorof the fraction is the employer-paid cost of the health plan, and the denominatorof the fraction is the sum of the employer-paid cost and the employee-paidcost of the health plan. For this purpose, the cost of a health plan isits actual cost determined under the same method the employer uses to determinethe applicable premium (for the same coverage) for health continuationcoverage purposes under section 4980B(f)(4) without regard to any of theadjustments permitted in paragraph (c) of this Qandamp;A-7 (other than theadjustment for utilization differences). If a health plan is not subjectto the requirements of section 4980B, the employer may calculate cost onthe basis of a method permitted to be used for determining an applicablepremium under section 4980B(f)(4) as if such plan were subject to thatsection. For purposes of this Qandamp;A-7, health coverage of a self-employedindividual is deemed attributable to employer contributions to the extentthat a deduction under section 162(m) is allowable with respect to thecoverage. Also, the determination of the extent to which health coverageis attributable to employer or employee contributions is to be made withoutregard to whether an employee is permitted a deduction with respect toemployee contributions under section 213.(2) <T3>Exception. </T3>If, for a particular health plan, the employer-paidportion of the cost (treating salary reduction contributions as employercontributions) is less than or equal to 2 percent of the sum of the employer-paidcost and the employee-paid cost of such health plan, the employer may treatsuch health plan as providing no employer-provided benefit.(3) <T3>Salary reduction contributions. </T3>See Qandamp;A-8 of this sectionfor the treatment of salary reduction contributions under a cafeteria planas either employer or employee contributions.(h) <T3>Calculation of excess benefit. </T3>The amount of a highly compensatedemployee's excess benefit under section 89(b) with respect to a healthplan is the cost of the excess benefit based on its actual cost determinedunder the same method the employer uses to determine the applicable premiumfor the same coverage for health continuation coverage purposes under section4980B(f)(4) without regard to any of the adjustments permitted in paragraph(c) of this Qandamp;A-7 (other than the adjustment for utilization differences).This rule applies with respect to both highly compensated and nonhighlycompensated employees. Thus, an employer must use the method it uses todetermine the applicable premium for all coverage provided in making thedetermination of excess benefits. See Qandamp;A-9 of this section for furtherguidance with respect to the determination of excess benefits.Q-8: How are salary reduction contributions treated for purposes of thesection 89 nondiscrimination tests? A-8: (a) <T3>Treatment of salary reduction contributions_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as otherwise provided (see, e.g., paragraphs(b) and (c) of this Qandamp;A-8), salary reduction contributions are treatedas employer contributions. Thus, for purposes of paragraph (d)(3) (the50 percent eligibility test), paragraph (d)(4) (the 75 percent benefitstest), and paragraph (e) (the 80 percent coverage test) of Qandamp;A-1 ofthis section, the portion of the value of health coverage that is attributableto salary reduction contributions is treated as attributable to employercontributions and thus as an employer-provided benefit. See paragraph (d)(2)of Qandamp;A-4 of this section for a special rule for the treatment of certainsalary reduction contributions for purposes of the mandatory aggregationrule for the 50 percent eligibility test. (2) <T3>Definition of salary reduction contributions. </T3>The term ``salaryreduction contributions'' means all employer contributions that are excludablefrom the gross income of an employee by reason of section 125. Thus, allelective contributions under a cafeteria plan described in section 125that are excludable from employees' gross incomes are salary reductioncontributions, even if such amounts are available in cash or other taxablebenefits only if the employee satisfies a specified condition under theplan (e.g., the completion of a statement that the employee has other healthplan coverage). This is the case regardless of the manner in which suchcontributions are described under a plan. For example, amounts that aredescribed as employer or company credits under a cafeteria plan are salaryreduction contributions to the extent that such amounts are available toemployees in cash or other taxable benefits under the plan, even if, forexample, the plan defines salary reduction contributions as only thosecontributions that are directly and explicitly deducted from employees'regular salaries. (b) <T3>90 percent/50 percent eligibility test_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as provided in paragraphs (b)(2) and (c) ofthis Qandamp;A-8, for purposes of paragraph (d)(2) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section(the 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test), salary reduction contributionsare treated as employee contributions (rather than employer contributions)in computing the employer-provided benefit available to any employee. (2) <T3>Election to treat as employer contributions_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>An employer may elect in writing to treat all salaryreduction contributions as employer contributions for purposes of paragraph(d)(2) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section (the 90 percent/50 percent eligibilitytest). An employer may not elect to treat some, but not all, salary reductioncontributions as employer contributions. An employer election under thisparagraph (b)(2) applies with respect to all salary reduction contributionswith regard to plans of the same type whether or not the plans are partof the same cafeteria plan. (ii) <T3>Requirements to qualify for election_</T3>(A) <T3>In general. </T3>In order to make an election under this paragraph(b)(2), an employer must meet the requirements of paragraphs (b)(2)(ii)(B)through (b)(2)(ii)(D) of this Qandamp;A-8. (B) <T3>Plan must be available on same terms. </T3>This requirement is satisfiedonly if all of the benefits available under each cafeteria plan are availableon the same terms and conditions to all employees eligible to participateunder such plans. (C) <T3>Nonhighly compensated employees may not comprise a disproportionateportion of those eligible to participate. </T3>This requirement is satisfiedonly if the nonhighly compensated eligibility percentage for each cafeteriaplan does not exceed the highly compensated eligibility percentage foreach such plan. The nonhighly compensated eligibility percentage is thepercentage determined by dividing the number of nonhighly compensated employeeseligible to participate in the cafeteria plan by the total number of nonhighlycompensated employees, and the highly compensated eligibility percentageis the percentage determined in the same manner by reference only to highlycompensated employees. (D) <T3>No highly compensated employee with benefits outside cafeteria plan.</T3>This requirement is satisfied only if no highly compensated employeeeligible to participate in a cafeteria plan is eligible to participatein any other statutory employee benefit plan that is of the same type asa plan available under the cafeteria plan unless such other statutory employeebenefit plan (whether inside or outside of a cafeteria plan) is availableon the same terms and conditions to all nonhighly compensated employeesthat are eligible to participate in the cafeteria plan. (c) <T3>Mandatory treatment of salary reduction contributions_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Notwithstanding paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(2) of this0andamp;A-8, if certain conditions set forth in paragraph (c)(2) or (c)(3)of this Qandamp;A-8 are satisfied, an employer is required to treat someor all salary reduction contributions available to highly compensated employeesas employer contributions, some or all salary reduction contributions availableto nonhighly compensated employees as employee contributions, or both.Paragraphs (c)(2) and (c)(3) of this Qandamp;A-8 are applied separately.This mandatory treatment applies only for purposes of applying the 90 percent/50percent eligibility test of paragraph (d)(2) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section(including the 80 percent/66 percent and 80 percent/80 percent eligibilitytest alternatives set forth in paragraphs (b) and (c)(6)(iii) of Qandamp;A-2of this section). (2) <T3>Highly compensated employees_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>In computing the largest employer-provided benefitavailable to a high1y compensated employee (and for purposes of the excessbenefit calculation under paragraph (e) of Qandamp;A-9 of this section),core health coverage attributable to salary reduction contributions istreated as attributable to employer contributions (rather than employeecontributions) to the extent that the portion of the core health coverageattributable to salary reduction contributions exceeds 100 percent of theportion of the core health coverage attributable to employer contributions(excluding salary reduction contributions). The rule of this paragraph(c)(2) applies only if the employer has not made the election describedin paragraph (b)(2) of this Qandamp;A-8.(ii) <T3>Examples. </T3>The rule of this paragraph (c)(2) is illustrated bythe following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>Assume that a highly compensated employee may electcoverage under one of two health plans: Plan A has an employer-providedbenefit of $4,000, which is attributable to non-salary reduction, employercontributions; and Plan B (a core health plan) has a total employer-providedbenefit of $5,200 (i.e., $3,200 attributable to non-salary reduction, employercontributions and $2,000 attributable to salary reduction contributions).This paragraph (c)(2) does not require that any of the salary reductioncontributions for Plan B be treated as employer contributions for purposesof determining the plan with the largest employer-provided benefit availableto this highly compensated employee. Thus, for purposes of the 90 percent/50percent eligibility test and assuming that the employer has not made theelection under paragraph (b)(2) of this Qandamp;A-8, Plan A is the plan withthe largest employer-provided benefit available to this employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Assume the same facts as Example 1, except that PlanB's total employer-provided benefit of $5,200 is comprised of $2,500 attributableto non-salary reduction, employer contributions and $2,700 attributableto salary reduction contributions. This paragraph (c)(2) requires that$200 of the salary reduction contributions for Plan B (i.e., the excessof the salary reduction contributions over the non-salary reduction, employercontributions) be treated as employer contributions for purposes of determiningthe plan with the largest employer-provided benefit available to this highlycompensated employee. Thus, for purposes of the 90 percent/50 percent eligibilitytest, Plan B is treated as having an employer-provided benefit of $2,700.However, Plan A still is the plan with the largest employer-provided benefitavailable to this highly compensated employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 3. </T3>Assume the same facts as in Example 1, except thatPlan B has a total employer-provided benefit of $8,000 (i.e., $3,500 attributableto non-salary reduction, employer contributions and $4,500 attributableto salary reduction contributions). This paragraph (c)(2) requires that$1,000 of the salary reduction contributions for Plan B (i.e., the excessof the salary reduction contributions over the non-salary reduction, employercontributions) be treated as employer contributions for purposes of determiningthe plan with the largest employer-provided benefit available to this highlycompensated employee. Thus, for purposes of the 90 percent/50 percent eligibilitytest, Plan B is treated as having an employer-provided benefit of $4,500and, accordingly, is the plan with the largest employer-provided benefitavailable to this highly compensated employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 4. </T3>Assume the same facts as in Example 3, except thatthe highly compensated employee also may elect health coverage under aflexible spending arrangement (FSA) providing for health expense reimbursementsup to and including $5,000. Because hea1th FSAs are not core health plans,this FSA is disregarded in applying this paragraph (c)(2). Thus, the mannerin which such health FSA, the employer-provided benefit of which is whollyattributable to salary reduction contributions, is taken into account forpurposes of the 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test depends upon whethersalary reduction contributions are generally disregarded or are generallytaken into account as employer contributions for purposes of such test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 5. </T3>Assume the same facts as Example 3, except that thehighly compensated employee also has available Plan C, a dental plan notfunded through salary reduction and with an employer-provided benefit of$500. Since the dental plan is not a core health plan, it is not consideredin determining whether salary reduction contributions are treated as employercontributions under this paragraph (c)(2). However, the employer-providedbenefit of the dental plan is added to the total employer-provided benefitavailable to the highly compensated employee in determining the largestemployer-provided benefit available to any highly compensated employee.</ITAG>(3) <T3>Nonhighly compensated employees. </T3>In computing the employer-providedbenefit available to a nonhighly compensated employee, core health coverageattributable to salary reduction contributions is treated as attributableto employee contributions (rather than employer contributions) to the extentthat the portion of the core health coverage attributable to salary reductioncontributions exceeds 100 percent of the portion of the core health coverageattributable to employer contributions (excluding salary reduction contributions).The rule of this paragraph (c)(3) applies only if the employer has madethe election described in paragraph (b)(2) of this Qandamp;A-8.(4) <T3>Transition rule. </T3>This paragraph (c) does not apply with respectto testing years beginning before January 1, 1990.(d) <T3>Certain part-time employees. </T3>See section 89(g)(3)(D)(i) for thetreatment of salary reduction contributions for employees described insection 89(j)(5).Q-9: How is an excess benefit under the section 89 nondiscrimination rulesto be determined with respect to health plans?A-9: (a) <T3>In general. </T3>A highly compensated employee's excess benefit undera discriminatory employee benefit plan that is a health plan for a testingyear generally is determined in accordance with the rules for applyingthe requirements of section 89 for the testing year and with the modificationsset forth in this Qandamp;A-9. Because the method for determining excessbenefits thus differs from the method for applying the nondiscriminationtests of section 89, a statutory employee benefit plan that is a discriminatoryemployee benefit plan under the nondiscrimination tests may, in some circumstances,not have any excess benefit under this Qandamp;A-9. Similarly, a statutoryemployee benefit plan is treated as not having an excess benefit underthis Qandamp;A-9 if such plan satisfies the applicable nondiscriminationtests of section 89 and thus is not a discriminatory employee benefit plan.See paragraph (b) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section. This is the case even ifsuch plan would be determined to have an excess benefit under the rulesof this Qandamp;A-9 if such rules were applicable to such plan. See paragraph(h) of Qandamp;A-7 of this section for the requirement that, for purposesof determining the amount of excess benefit, the value of the benefit ofall employees must be determined under the same method the employer usesfor determining the applicable premium for health continuation coveragepurposes under section 4980B(f)(4) and the nondiscrimination tests reappliedon such basis. In addition, see paragraph (c) of Qandamp;A-6 for rules relatingto the determination of excess benefits for testing years beginning in1989 if some, but not all, of the employer-provided benefits for such yearsare subject to the section 89 nondiscrimination rules.(b) <T3>Determination made under failed requirements</T3>_(1) <T3>In general. </T3>A highly compensated employee's excess benefit undera discriminatory employee benefit plan is determined under the failed requirementsof paragraphs (c), (d) and (e) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section. Thus, forexample, if each health plan satisfies the 50 percent eligibility test,but the health plans collectively fail to satisfy the 75 percent benefitstest, excess benefits are to be determined only under the 75 percent benefitstest. However, an employer may elect in writing to use the 80 percent coveragetest to determine excess benefits without regard to whether it used thattest in determining compliance with section 89. Similarly. the employermay elect in writing to use the tests described in paragraphs (c) and (d)of Qandamp;A-1 of this section to determine excess benefits even if it initiallyused the 80 percent coverage test to determine whether its plans are discriminatory.(2) <T3>Failure of more than one requirement. </T3>Where an employer's healthplans of the same type fail to meet more than one requirement of Qandamp;A-1of this section, the excess benefit calculations for the failed requirementsare to be made in the following order: The 50 percent eligibility test:the 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test; and the 75 percent benefitstest. If a highly compensated employee is determined to have an excessbenefit under the 50 percent eligibility test, then for purposes of determiningsuch employee's excess benefit (if any) under the 90 percent/50 percenteligibility test, such employee's employer-provided benefit for purposesof the 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test excess benefit calculationis first reduced by the amount of such employee's excess benefit determinedunder the 50 percent eligibility test excess benefit calculation. If aportion of the employer-provided benefit of the plan that failed the 50percent eligibility test is attributable to salary reduction contributions,then the same portion of an employee's excess benefit with respect to suchplan is treated as attributable to salary reduction contributions. Forpurposes of determining excess benefits under the 75 percent benefits test,a highly compensated employee's employer-provided benefit under the planor plans that failed the 50 percent eligibility test or the 90 percent/50percent eligibility test (or both) is first reduced by the amount of suchemployee's excess benefit with respect to such test or tests.(c) <T3>Highly compensated employees and the employer-provided benefit takeninto account for purposes of determining excess benefit</T3>_(1) <T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of making the excess benefit calculationsunder this Qandamp;A-9, all highly compensated employees who receive employer-providedbenefits for a testing year under a plan or plan's that fail the applicablenondiscrimination test are eligible to be treated as receiving excess benefits.This is the case even though such highly compensated employees were nottaken into account for any reason on the testing day for such testing year.In addition, only employer-provided benefits that highly compensated employeesactually receive for a testing year under a plan or plans that fail theapplicable nondiscrimination test may be treated as excess benefits. Thus,for example, a highly compensated employee does not have an excess benefitwith respect to a plan that fails the 50 percent eligibility test merelybecause such employee is eligible to receive, but does not actually receive,employer-provided benefits (e.g., health plan coverage) under such plan.Similarly, employer-provided benefits that highly compensated employeesdo not actually receive but were treated as having received under the rulesproviding for the annualization and adjustment of the employer-providedbenefits for the testing day are not treated as excess benefits.(2) <T3>Special rule. </T3>In the case of the first testing year beginningin 1989 of an employer that is using the transition rule included in paragraph(b)(5) of Qandamp;A-5 of this section, the excess benefits (if any) for suchtesting year may be determined by reference to those employer-providedbenefits that highly compensated employees actually receive for the partialtesting year, annualized for the entire testing year as provided in paragraph(b)(5)(iv) of Qandamp;A-5 of this section. If an employer elects to determineexcess benefits in accordance with the preceding sentence, the employermust provide those highly compensated employees having excess benefitsan opportunity to demonstrate that they actually received less employer-providedbenefits during the portion of the testing year preceding the partial testingyear than the deemed employer provided benefits under paragraph (b)(5)of Qandamp;A-5 of this section. If an employee makes such a demonstration,the employer must recalculate such employee's excess benefit based on theemployer-provided benefits actually received for the entire testing yearand make any amendments to required reports relating to such employee (e.g.,Form W-2). This special rule is not available with respect to a plan forwhich paragraph (b)(5) of Qandamp;A-5 of this section is inapplicable.(d) <T3>50 percent eligibility test. </T3>A highly compensated employee's excessbenefit under a health plan that fails to satisfy the 50 percent eligibilitytest of paragraph (d)(3) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section is equal to thatportion of the employer-provided benefit actually received by such employeeunder the plan that is in excess of the maximum employer-provided benefitthat such plan may have and be included in a group of comparable plansunder paragraph (b) of Qandamp;A-4 of this section that satisfies the 50percent eligibility test. The rule of this paragraph (d) is illustratedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>An employer maintains two health plans, Plan A and PlanB. Plan A has an employer-provided benefit of $3,000 and is automaticallyprovided to all employees of the employer other than those eligible forPlan B. Plan B has an employer-provided benefit of $4,000 and is availableto all employees who earn more than $100,000. Plan B fails to satisfy the50 percent eligibility test. As a result, each highly compensated employeewho actually receives coverage under Plan B is treated as receiving anexcess benefit with respect to such plan. The employer-provided benefitunder Plan B must be reduced by $842 to $3,158 ($3,000 is 95 percent of$3,158), in order for Plan B to be included in a group of comparable planswith Plan A under paragraph (b) of Qandamp;A-4 of this section. Thus, fora highly compensated employee who received a full $4,000 employer-providedbenefit under Plan B, the amount of the excess benefit with respect toPlan B is $842.</ITAG>(e) <T3>90 percent/50 percent eligibility test. </T3>A highly compensated employee'sexcess benefit under plans of the same type that fail to satisfy the 90percent/50 percent eligibility test of paragraph (d)(2) of Qandamp;A-l ofthis section is equal to that portion of the employer-provided benefitactually received by such employee under such plans that is in excess of200 percent of the largest amount of employer-provided benefit availableto at least 90 percent of the employer's nonhighly compensated employees.For this purpose, benefits attributable to salary reduction contributionsby nonhighly compensated employees are not treated as employer-providedbenefits, even if the employer has made the election provided under paragraph(b)(2) of Qandamp;A-8 of this section. In addition, benefits with respectto highly compensated employees that are attributable to salary reductioncontributions are not treated as employer-provided benefits except to theextent that such contributions are treated as employer contributions withregard to such employees under paragraph (c)(2) of Qandamp;A-8 of this section.The rule of this paragraph (e) is illustrated as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Assume that an employer maintains numerous health plansfor its employees. For a testing year, the largest employer-provided benefitavailable to any highly compensated employee, determined under the 90 percent/50percent eligibility test, is $12,000. Because only 75 percent of the employer'snonhighly compensated employees have available to them an employer-providedbenefit of at least $6,000, the employer's health plans fail to satisfythe 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test. As a result, the highly compensatedemployees who receive coverage under one or more health plans are treatedas receiving an excess benefit. If, for this testing year, 90 percent ofthe employer's nonhighly compensated employees have available to them anemployer-provided health benefit of at least $4,500, a highly compensatedemployee is treated as receiving an excess benefit to the extent such employeeactually receives (rather than is eligible to receive) an employer-providedbenefit under all health plans in excess of $9,000 (i.e., 200 percent of$4,500). If the largest amount of employer-provided benefit that is availableto 90 percent of the employer's nonhighly compensated employees were $3,000(instead of $4,500), a highly compensated employee's excess benefit wouldbe the amount of such employee's employer-provided benefit that is in excessof $6,000. If no amount of employer-provided benefit is available to 90percent or more of the nonhighly compensated employees, then all highlycompensated employees have excess benefits equal to their total employer-providedbenefits received for the testing year.</ITAG>(f) <T3>75 percent benefits test_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>A highly compensated employee's excess benefit underplans of the same type that fail to satisfy the 75 percent benefits testof paragraph (d)(4) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section is determined under therules of this paragraph (f). If plans of different types are tested togetherunder paragraph (f)(2)(ii) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section, then such plansare treated as plans of the same type for purposes of this paragraph (f).(2) <T3>Reapply test. </T3>The 75 percent benefits test is to be reappliedfor the testing year with respect to those plans of the same type by takinginto account, in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Qandamp;A-9, all highlycompensated employees of the employer and the employer-provided benefitsthat such employees actually received for the testing year. If upon suchreapplication of the 75 percent benefits test, such test is satisfied,there are no excess benefits under section 89(b) with respect to such test.(3) <T3>Amount of excess benefit. </T3>Excess benefits under the 75 percentbenefits test are determined by reducing the employer-provided benefitof the highly compensated employee or employees with the highest amountof employer-provided benefit for the testing year, under the 75 percentbenefits test as reapplied in accordance with this paragraph (f), untileither such employee's employer-provided benefit is equal to the next highestamount of employer-provided benefit for any highly compensated employeeor if no next highest such employee exists, until the employee no longerhas any employer-provided benefit. This method of reduction is then appliedwith respect to additional highly compensated employees (beginning withhighly compensated employees with the highest remaining amounts of employer-providedbenefits) until the 75 percent benefits test is satisfied in accordancewith this paragraph (f). A highly compensated employee's excess benefitis equal to the total amount of such employee's employer-provided benefitthat is reduced under this paragraph (f). (g) <T3>80 percent coverage test_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>A highly compensated employee's excess benefit undera plan that fails to satisfy the 80 percent coverage test of paragraph(e) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section is equal to that portion of the employer-providedbenefit received by such employee under the plan that is in excess of themaximum employer-provided benefit that such plan may have and be includedin a group of comparable plans under paragraphs (c)(1) through (c)(4) ofQandamp;A-4 of this section that satisfies the 80 percent coverage test.(2) <T3>Examples. </T3>The rule of this paragraph (g) is illustrated in thefollowing examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>An employer maintains numerous health plans. All butone of such employer's health plans are included in a group of comparableplans determined in accordance with paragraph (c)(5) of Qandamp;A-4 of thissection (employee cost comparability). Because over 80 percent of the employer'snonhighly compensated employees are covered by a plan included in the groupof comparable plans, each of the plans in such group satisfies the 80 percentcoverage test. The deemed employer-provided benefit for the group of comparableplans is $3,780. Plan F, which has an employer-provided benefit of $5,000,is not included in the group of comparable plans and thus such plan failsthe 80 percent coverage test. If Plan F's employer-provided benefit werereduced by $800 to $4,200 ($3,780 is 90 percent of $4,200), it could beincluded in the group of comparable plans under the rules of paragraph(c)(1) of Qandamp;A-4 of this section. Similarly, if Plan F's employer-providedbenefit were reduced by $1,221 to $3,779, it could be included in the groupof comparable plans under the rules of paragraph (c)(4) of Qandamp;A-4 ofthis section. As a result, each highly compensated employee who receivescoverage under Plan F is treated as receiving an excess benefit of $800(the lesser of $800 and $1,221) with respect to such plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Assume the same facts as Example l except that theplan that is not included in the group of comparable plans fails the 50percent eligibility test of paragraph (b) of Qandamp;A-4 of this section.Under paragraph (c)(3) of Qandamp;A-4 of this section, the eligibility testmust be satisfied before the plan may be included in a group of comparableplans in determining whether the 80 percent coverage test is satisfied.Thus, the excess benefit for Plan F must include the amount necessary topermit such plan to satisfy the 50 percent eligibility test. In this example,this would occur if Plan F's employer-provided benefit were reduced by$1,021 to $3,979 ($3,780 is 95 percent of $3,979).</ITAG>Q-10: What are the effective dates of the section 89 nondiscriminationand qualification rules? A-10: (a) <T3>Effective date_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in this Qandamp;A-10, thenondiscrimination rules of sections 89 (a)-(j) and 89 (l)-(m) and the qualificationrules of section 89(k) apply for plan years beginning after December 31,1988. (2) <T3>Collectively bargained plans_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>In the case of a collectively bargained plan thatis adopted pursuant to one or more collective bargaining agreements ratifiedprior to March 1, 1986, section 89 does not apply to such plan with respectto employees included in a unit of employees covered by any of such collectivebargaining agreements in years beginning before the earlier of January1, 1991, or the date on which the last collective bargaining agreementrelating to the plan expires (determined without regard to extensions afterFebruary 28, 1986). (ii) <T3>Definition of collectively bargained plan. </T3>A collectively bargainedplan is a plan covering only eligible individuals who are included in aunit of employees covered by an agreement that is a collective bargainingagreement entered into between employee representatives and one or moreemployers (as determined under section 7701(a)(46)). A plan that is maintainedpursuant to two or more collective bargaining agreements is treated astwo or more collectively bargained plans to the extent that the employer-providedbenefits provided pursuant to the agreements are not uniform. Thus, forexample, if a multiemployer plan is maintained pursuant to three collectivebargaining agreements, two of which provide for an identical benefit structureand one of which provides for a different benefit structure, the plan istreated as two separate, collectively bargained plans for purposes of thisparagraph (a)(2). (iii) <T3>Plans benefiting non-collectively bargained employees. </T3>If a planprovides employer-provided benefits to employees who are included in aunit of employees covered by a collective bargaining agreement and to employeeswho are not included in any such unit of employees (i.e., non-collectivelybargained employees), the non-collectively bargalned employees are treatedas covered by a plan that is not a collectively bargained plan for purposesof this paragraph (a)(2). Thus, the delayed effective date of paragraph(a)(2)(i) of this Qandamp;A-10 is available only with respect to the portionof the plan that provides employer-provided benefits to the collectivelybargained employees. (iv) <T3>Treatment of collectively bargained employees as excludable employees.</T3>Unless the employer elects otherwise, employees who receive employer-providedbenefits under a collectively bargained plan to which section 89 does notyet apply by reason of this paragraph (a)(2) are to be treated as excludableemployees (i.e., as though they were described in section 89(h)) for purposesof applying the nondiscrimination tests of section 89 to plans that aresubject to section 89. However, an employer may elect in writing not totreat such collectively bargained employees as excludable employees forpurposes of applying section 89 to plans that are subject to section 89.Such an election must be made with respect to all collectively bargainedemployees, regardless of bargaining unit, and once made applies to allsubsequent testing years. Such an election does not accelerate the otherwiseapplicable effective date with respect to the application of the qualificationrules of section 89(k) to such collectively bargained plan or plans. However,if the employer makes an election under this paragraph (a)(2)(iv), thenthe nondiscrimination rules of section 89 are effective with respect tosuch plan or plans and thus a high1y compensated employee within the groupof otherwise excludable employees (i.e., nonexcludable by reason of suchelection), may have an excess benefit under section 89(b). (v) <T3>Examples. </T3>The provisions of this paragraph (a)(2) are illustratedby the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>A collective bargaining agreement ratified in January1986 is scheduled to expire on December 31, 1992. Such agreement providesfor contributions by an employer to a multiemployer plan providing healthcoverage. Assuming that no employee who is included in the collective bargainingunit receives health coverage from the employer other than coverage underthe multiemployer plan, the collective bargaining employees and their healthcoverage may be disregarded by the employer in applying the section 89nondiscrimination tests for any period before January 1, 1991. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Employer X maintains two health plans. Plan A (coveringnon-collectively bargained employees) and Plan B (covering collectivelybargained employees). Plan B is a multiemployer plan that has an effectivedate for purposes of section 89 of January 1, 1991. Plan A is an insuranceplan with a policy that expires on June 30, 1989. The collectively bargainedemployees receiving benefits under Plan B may be treated as excludableemployees until January of 1991 and their health coverage may be disregardedby Employer X in applying the nondiscrimination tests of section 89 untilthat date. However, before that date, Employer X may elect to take suchcollectively bargained employees (and their employer-provided benefits)into account for purposes of testing Plan A for periods prior to Januaryof 1991.</ITAG>(b) <T3>Definition of plan year_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as provided in paragraph (b)(2) or (b)(3) ofthis Qandamp;A-10, for purposes of determining the applicable effective dateof section 89 with respect to a plan, the plan year is the year that isdesignated as the plan year in the written plan. For plans other than healthand group-term life insurance plans, if there is no such designation, theplan year is the calendar year. For purposes of this rule, the designationof a plan year solely for purposes of filing the Form 5500 is to be disregarded.(2) <T3>Certain health and group-term life insurance plans_</T3>(i) <T3>Insured plans. </T3>If a health or group-term life insurance plan'splan year is not clearly ascertainable from a written plan document adoptedand in existence on January 1, 1989, and the plan is provided under anarrangement through an insurance company, the policy year is the applicableplan year for effective date purposes. If there is no policy year, theemployer may elect in writing either the limit/deductible year, the calendaryear, or the employer's fiscal year as the applicable plan year for effectivedate purposes. If the employer does not make such an election, the applicableplan year is the calendar year. An arrangement is not provided throughan insurance company for purposes of this paragraph (b) if the insurancecompany provides merely administrative services under the arrangement.(ii) <T3>Self-insured plans. </T3>If a health or group-term life insurance plan'splan year is not clearly ascertainable from a written plan document adoptedand in existence on January 1, 1989, and the coverage under such plan isnot provided under an arrangement through an insurance company, the employermay elect in writing either the limit/deductible year, the calendar year,or the employer's fiscal year as the applicable plan year for effectivedate purposes. If the employer does not make such an election, the applicableplan year is the calendar year.(iii) <T3>Limit/deductible year. </T3>The limit/deductible year is the year withrespect to which the plan's benefit and deductible limits are applied,except that if different years are used for benefit limit purposes andfor deductible limit purposes, it means the limit or deductible year thatcommences earlier in the calendar year. (3) <T3>Special rule to prevent delay of the section 89 effective date</T3>_(i)<T3>In general. </T3>Notwithstanding paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(2) of thisQandamp;A-10, in the case of a health or group-term life insurance plan withrespect to which the first day of the first plan year beginning after December31, 1988 (determined under paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(2)), is later duringthe calendar year than the first day of the first plan year (also determinedunder such paragraphs) beginning in 1988, the first plan year beginningafter December 31, 1988, is deemed to begin on the day that is 12 monthsafter the first day of the plan's first plan year beginning in 1988. Thus,section 89 becomes effective with respect to such plan on the first anniversarydate of the plan's first plan year beginning in l988. ln addition, forpurposes of this Qandamp;A-10, a plan's last plan year beginning in 1988is not treated as longer than 12 months in duration. Thus, for example,an agreement between an employer and insurance company to extend for longerthan 12 months the last plan year of a health plan beginning in 1988 isnot recognized for purposes of determining the applicable section 89 effectivedate with respect to such plan. Such plan is treated as commencing a newplan year on the day that is 12 months after the first day of the lastplan year commencing in 1988. (ii) <T3>Exceptions</T3>_(A) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as provided in paragraph (b)(3)(iii) of thisQandamp;A-10, paragraph (b)(3)(i) of this Qandamp;A-l0 does not apply to theextent that any of the tests described in this paragraph (b)(3)(ii) (B)through (D) are satisfied. (B) <T3>Three-month rule. </T3>A plan is a health plan and the first day ofthe plan's first plan year beginning after December 31, 1988, is not morethan 3 months later during the calendar year than the first day of theplan's first plan year beginning in 1988 and the selection of the new planyear was for bona fide business reasons unrelated to section 89 (e.g.,by reason of a merger or acquisition). (C) <T3>New carrier rule. </T3>A plan is a health plan and the health coveragefor the plan's first plan year beginning after December 31, 1988, is providedthrough an insurance arrangement with an insurance company unrelated toany insurance company that provided health coverage under the plan forthe first day of the plan's first plan year beginning in 1988 and suchchange in insurance carriers and the selection of the new plan year werefor bona fide business reasons unrelated to section 89. (D) <T3>Uniform plan year. </T3>The first day of the plan's first plan yearbeginning after December 31, l988, is the same day during the calendaryear on which commenced in 1988 the plan year or years of the plan or plansof the same type that provided, in the aggregate, at least 25 percent ofthe total employer-provided benefits provided under all plans of the sametype during 1988 and the selection of the new plan year was for bona fidebusiness reasons unrelated to section 89. This rule may be applied in thecase of a merger or acquisition by treating such transaction as havingoccurred on December 31, 1987. (iii) <T3>Retroactive plan year changes. </T3>This paragraph (b)(3) is to beapplied by disregarding any change in a plan year that is made after thecommencement of such plan year. (iv) <T3>Additional rules. </T3>The Commissioner may, through revenue rulings,notices, and other guidance of general applicability, provide such additionalexceptions to paragraph (b)(3)(i) of this Qandamp;A-10 as are appropriateif such exceptions do not have the effect of permitting employers to delaysignificantly the effective date of section 89 with respect to their planswithout any significant, independent business reason. (4) <T3>New plans. </T3>For purposes of this Qandamp;A-10, a plan is not treatedas a new plan commencing in calendar year 1989, unless such plan providescoverage and benefits that are substantially different from the coverageand benefits previously provided by a plan in calendar year 1988. (5) <T3>Certain dispositions or acquisitions. </T3>If a person becomes or ceasesto be a member of a group described in section 414 (b), (c), (m) or (o)on or before December 31, 1988, the transitional rule of section 89(j)(8)is not applicable with respect to any plan of such person or of any memberof such group unless the requirements of section 89 were met immediatelybefore such change in the group. This determination is to be made as thoughsection 89 (and this section) were effective with respect to all such plansof such person. Alternatively, for testing years beginning in 1989, thenondiscrimination rules of section 89 may be applied separately to theseparate portions of the group under section 414 (b), (c), (m) and (o)involved in the change of the group as if such portions did not becomepart of the same group until December 31, 1989.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.89(k)-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Qualification requirements for certain employee welfare benefit plans.</ITAG>The following is a list of the questions addressed in this section.Q-1: What is required under section 89(k)?Q-2: What plans must meet the requirements of section 89(k)?Q-3: What is required under the writing requirement of section 89(k)(1)(A)?Q-4: When is a plan legally enforceable within the meaning of section 89(k)(1)(B)?Q-5: What constitutes reasonable notification of employees under section89(k)(1)(C)?Q-6: How does an employer meet the exclusive benefit requirement of section89(k)(1)(D)?Q-7: How is it determined whether a plan is established with the intentof being maintained for an indefinite period of time?Q-8: What are the sanctions for failure to meet the qualification requirementsof section 89(k)?Q-1: What is required under section 89(k)? A-1: (a)<T3> In general.</T3> Section 89(k) imposes the following requirementson employers maintaining certain employee benefit plans as described inQandamp;A-2 of this section: The plan must be in writing; employees withinthe class of employees designated in the plan as eligible for participationmust have a legally enforceable right to participate and, if covered undersuch plan, to receive benefits; employees who are eligible to participatemust be provided reasonable notice of the benefits available under suchplan; the plan must be maintained for the exclusive benefit of employees;and the plan must be established with the intent that it will be maintainedfor an indefinite period of time.(b)<T3> Definitions</T3>_(1)<T3> Benefit.</T3> For purposes of section 89(k), the term ``benefit''or ``benefits'' means those payments, reimbursements, products and servicesprovided under the plan to a participant on account of such participant'sclaim, need or event that is covered under the plan. For example, the fairmarket value of the use of an on-site child care facility by a participantis the benefit under a dependent care assistance program described in section129. Similarly, reimbursement of a participant's expense incurred for acovered surgical procedure is a benefit under a health plan. Another exampleof a benefit under a plan is the payment of a death benefit under a group-termlife insurance plan to which section 79 applies.(2)<T3> Employer-provided benefit.</T3> With respect to section 89(k), theterm ``employer-provided benefit'' means that portion of the benefits receivedby an individual that is attributable to employer contributions, includingsalary reduction contributions under a cafeteria plan. See paragraph (f)(3)of Qandamp;A-1 of andSection; 1.89(a)-1 for a definition of ``employer-providedbenefit'' for purposes of the nondiscrimination rules under section 89.(3)<T3> ERISA.</T3> The term ``ERISA'' refers to the Employee Retirement IncomeSecurity Act of 1974, as amended.(4)<T3> Salary reduction contributions.</T3> The term ``salary reduction contributions''means elective contributions under a cafeteria plan described in section125 that would be taxable to an employee, but for section 125, by reasonof such employee's right to receive such amounts as cash or other taxablebenefits. See paragraph (a)(2) of Qandamp;A-8 of andSection; 1.89(a)-1 forfurther guidance regarding the term ``salary reduction contributions.''Q-2: What plans must meet the requirements of section 89(k)? A-2: (a) <T3>In general_</T3>(1) <T3>Types of plans subject to section 89(k). </T3>In general, the followingplans are subject to section 89(k): An accident or health plan (sections106 and 105); a plan of an employer providing group-term life insurance(section 79): a dependent care assistance program (section 129(d)); a qualifiedtuition reduction program (section 117(d)); a cafeteria plan (section 125(c));a fringe benefit program providing no-additional-cost services, qualifiedemployee discounts, or employer-operated eating facilities, the benefitsfrom which are excludable from the gross income of the beneficiary undersection 132; and a plan of which an organization covered by section 505is a part. Section 89(k) applies to these plans without regard to whetherthey are statutory employee benefit plans subject to the nondiscriminationrules of section 89 and without regard to whether they are subject to TitleI of ERISA. Also, section 89(k) applies to plans described in this paragraph(a)(1) even though they are maintained by employers that are state or localgovernments or by the federal government. Finally, except as provided inparagraph (f) of this Qandamp;A-2, section 89(k) also applies to plans describedin this paragraph (a)(1) even though they are maintained by organizationsexempt from taxation under section 501(a). (2) <T3>Plans maintained by an employer. </T3>For purposes of section 89(k),a plan ``maintained by an employer'' is any plan of, or subsidized by,an employer who employs participants in the plan. A plan is maintainedby an employer even if the cost of such plan is borne by the employeesthrough after-tax employee contributions, as long as the value of the coverageunder the plan for any employee is greater than such employee's after-taxcontributions. See section 79 and the regulations thereunder for rulesrelating to when a group-term life insurance plan is subject to section79 and, therefore, to section 89(k). For purposes of this paragraph (a)(2),the term ``employee'' includes the spouse and dependents of an employee.See also Qandamp;A-6 of this section with regard to individuals who may participatein a plan. In addition, plans of the type described in paragraph (a)(1)of this Qandamp;A-2 that are maintained by one or more ``employee organizations,''as that term is defined in section 3(4) of ERISA, or that are maintainedpursuant to one or more collective bargaining agreements, are maintainedby one or more employers and must meet the requirements of section 89(k).(b) <T3>Special rules with respect to accident or health plans_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of section 89(k), an accident or healthplan providing coverage that is excludable under section 106 must meetthe requirements of section 89(k) if benefits under the plan are to beexcludable under section 105 (b) or (c) or, in the case of a death benefitunder a plan described in paragraph (b)(2) of this Qandamp;A-2, under section101. If employer-provided benefits under an accident or health plan arenot excludable under section 105 (b) or (c) or section 101 (other thanby reason of section 89), the plan is not required to comply with section89(k). Thus, for example, employer-provided health plans (including plansthat provide medical diagnostic examinations) must satisfy section 89(k)in order for the benefits thereunder to be excludable under section 105(b) or (c). An accident or health plan the entire cost of which is borneby the employees on an after-tax contributory basis (as determined underQandamp;A-7 of andSection; 1.89(a)-1) is not required to meet the requirementsof section 89(k). Thus, if employees' required after-tax contributionsfor health coverage are equal to or exceed the applicable premium for suchcoverage within the meaning of section 4980B(f)(4), then the health plandoes not have an employer-provided benefit (determined under Qandamp;A-7of andSection; 1.89(a)-1) and thus is not subject to section 89(k). (2) <T3>Accidental death and dismemberment. </T3>In order for the employer-providedbenefit under an accidental death and dismemberment plan to be excludableunder section 101 or 105, the plan must meet the requirements of section89(k). For purposes of section 89, an accidental death and dismembermentplan is a plan that provides insurance type coverage attributable to employercontributions that are excludable under section 106 and that provides onlybenefits excludable from income under either section 105(c) or section101 (where the benefits are payable on account of, and conditioned principallyupon, the accidental death of the employee). If a plan provides for a generaldeath benefit (described in andSection; 1.79-1(a)(1)), it is not an accidentaldeath and dismemberment plan. (3) <T3>Disability and other sick pay plans. </T3>Sick pay plans and disabilityplans are subject to the requirements of section 89(k) only if employer-providedbenefits under such plans are excludable from gross income upon receiptby the individual under section 105 (b) or (c). (4) <T3>Worker's compensation. </T3>A worker's compensation plan that paysamounts from a sickness and disability fund maintained for employees underthe laws of the United States, a state or the District of Columbia (i.e.,a fund maintained pursuant to a worker's compensation act or a statutein the nature of a worker's compensation act, the benefits from which areexcludable under section 104(a)(1)) is not subject to the requirementsof section 89(k). However, accident or health plans maintained by the UnitedStates, a state or the District of Columbia that provide benefits thatare excludable from the income of an employee solely by reason of section105 (b) or (c) are not worker's compensation funds within the meaning ofthe preceding sentence and thus are subject to the requirements of section89(k). (5) <T3>Section 401(h) accounts. </T3>A section 401(h) account contained ina pension or annuity plan is subject to the requirements of section 89(k)with regard to benefits provided through such account. (c) <T3>Special rules relating to dependent care assistance programs, grouplegal services plans and educational assistance programs. </T3>A dependentcare assistance program (within the meaning of section 129(d)) must complywith section 89(k) without regard to whether the employer elects to treatsuch program as a statutory employee benefit plan as allowed under section89(i)(2). Similarly, qualified group legal services plans (within the meaningof section 120(b)) and educational assistance programs (within the meaningof section 127(b)) must satisfy section 89(k) requirements, provided theapplicable statutory provisions are in effect.(d) <T3>Plans to which section 505 applies. </T3>A plan of which an organizationcovered by section 505 is a part must satisfy the requirements of section89(k). Such plans include plans providing benefits through organizationsdescribed in sections 501(c)(9) or 501(c)(17). If section 120 is in effect,plans providing benefits through organizations described in section 50l(c)(20)must satisfy the requirements of section 89(k). The requirements of section89(k) must be met by a plan even if the related organization qualifiesas an organization that is part of a plan maintained pursuant to a collectivebargaining agreement as described in section 505(a)(2). (e) <T3>Multiemployer plans. </T3>If a plan is otherwise subject to section89(k) and is a multiemployer plan within the meaning of section 3(37) ofERISA, that plan is maintained by all contributing employers and is subjectto the requirements of section 89(k). (f) <T3>Church plans. </T3>Employee benefit plans of a type described in paragraph(a)(1) of this Qandamp;A-2 that are maintained by organizations describedin section 3121(w) (i.e., churches or church-controlled organizations)exclusively for their employees and clergy (including the spouse or dependentsof employees or clergy) are not subject to the requirements of section89(k). (g) <T3>Treatment of statutory employee benefit plans providing excess benefits.</T3>A statutory employee benefit plan that provides any amount of employer-providedbenefits is subject to the requirements of section 89(k) even though theplan fails to satisfy the nondiscrimination requirements of section 89(a).Thus, for example, an employer-provided health plan that covers medicaldiagnostic examinations is subject to section 89(k) even if such healthplan fails to satisfy the 50 percent eligibility test of section 89 andthe entire value of the employer-provided coverage with respect to suchplan is treated as an excess benefit under section 89(b). (h) <T3>Dispositions and acquisitions. </T3>The rule of section 89(j)(8) doesnot apply with respect to the requirements of section 89(k). Thus, a planthat is subject to section 89(k) must continue to satisfy such requirementsduring the transition period (defined under section 89(j)(8)) without regardto the fact that the employer maintaining the plan has been involved ina merger, consolidation, or similar transaction. (i) <T3>Effective date. </T3>Generally, see Qandamp;A-10 of andSection; 1.89(a)-1for the effective date of the qualification requirements of section 89(k).However, the general effective date is subject to the transition rulesset forth in this section. (j) <T3>Coordination with ERISA provisions. </T3>The reporting, notificationand written plan document requirements contained in this section are inaddition to, and not in lieu of, any requirements otherwise imposed onemployer-provided benefit plans by TitIe I of ERISA or any other provisionof law. The rules contained herein apply for purposes of section 89(k)and no inference should be drawn therefrom regarding the requirements otherwiseimposed by Title I of ERISA or any other law.Q-3: What is required under the writing requirement of section 89(k)(1)(A)?A-3: (a)<T3> In general.</T3> Section 89(k)(1)(A) requires a plan to be in writing.Generally, this means that all material terms of the plan must be contained,by direct inclusion, by incorporation by reference, or by a combinationof these methods, in a single written document.(b)<T3> Requirement of a single written document</T3>_(1)<T3> In general.</T3> The writing requirement of section 89(k) must bemet with respect to a plan by a single written document. One such documentmay satisfy the writing requirement for more than one plan.(2)<T3> Incorporation by reference.</T3> Written documents relating to theplan are treated as part of the single written document if they are specificallyincorporated by reference in the single written document. Section 89(k)(l)(A)is satisfied with respect to a plan if the single written document withregard to such plan either contains all of the plan's material terms or,to the extent a material term is not contained in the single written document,incorporates by reference the document containing such term. Examples ofdocuments which may be so incorporated in the single written document are:Contracts with insurance providers; contracts with any other provider ofbenefits under the plan; contracts with plan administrators of, or consultantsto, the plan; documents creating a trust or other funding instrument relatedto the plan; resolutions of the employer's governing body relating to thecreation, operation, maintenance or termination of the plan; collectivebargaining agreements; pronouncements made by the employer, an agent ofthe employer, a plan administrator or other person relating to or concerninga material term in the plan; and all plan-related documents required tobe provided to any employee or filed with any regulatory agency or instrumentalityof any federal, state, or local governmental body by statute, rule, orregulation, including but not limited to the documentation required tobe provided to employees by the notice requirement of section 89(k)(1)(C)(see Qandamp;A-5 of this section). There is no limitation on the number ofsingle written documents that may incorporate a document by specific reference.(c)<T3> Contents of single written document</T3>_(1)<T3> In general.</T3> Certain minimum information must be included in thesingle written document in order for the plan to satisfy the writing requirementof section 89(k)(1)(A). All material terms of the plan must be includedin the single written document. If a material term of an insured plan isnot defined in the single written document of the plan or in a documentincorporated therein by reference, and such term is stated in the insurancecontract, the term has the meaning given it by the insurance company'susual practice. See paragraph (c)(4) of this Qandamp;A-3 for the definitionof a material term of a plan. Further, the provisions required to be includedin the single written document by paragraphs (c)(2) and (c)(3) of thisQandamp;A-3 are deemed to be material terms.(2)<T3> Recitation of certain qualification requirements.</T3> The singlewritten document must contain a recitation of the qualification requirementscontained in section 89(k)(1)(B) and (D). Thus, the single written documentmust state that the employer intends that the plan terms, including thoserelating to coverage and benefits, are legally enforceable and that theplan is maintained for the exclusive benefit of employees.(3)<T3> Additional requirements under specific exclusion provision.</T3> Thesingle written document must include any information or term required byany other applicable provision of the Code or accompanying regulation.(4)<T3> Definition of a material term of a plan. </T3>The phrase ``materialterm of a plan'' generally means a term relating to an employee's rightsto be covered by, participate in, or benefit under a plan. The followingare examples of material terms of a plan: the eligibility rules governingplan participation; terms relating to the periods during which coverageor benefits are provided; descriptions of available benefits; the proceduresgoverning participants' elections under the plan, including the periodduring which an election may be made, the extent to which elections areirrevocable, and the periods with respect to which elections are effective;the manner in which employer contributions may be made under the plan,such as by salary reduction agreements between a participant and the employerand by nonelective employer contributions, as well as any maximum limitationon employer contributions on behalf of any participant; terms relatingto the timing or amount of salary reduction or employee contributions tothe plan; terms relating to deductibles, co-payments or similar requirements,including any dollar limit on any benefit; conditions precedent or subsequentwith regard to a participant's qualification or continued qualificationfor any coverage or benefit, including any limitations or restrictionsrelating to benefits, such as a pre-existing condition limitation; provisionsrelating to the procedure under which claims are to be made and evaluatedfor reimbursement; provisions relating to health continuation coverageunder section 4980B; and the procedures or circumstances under which theplan may be terminated, including a statement, if applicable, that theplan may be terminated at will by the employer.(d)<T3> Timing_</T3>(1)<T3> In general.</T3> Except as set forth in paragraph (d)(2) or (d)(3)of this Qandamp;A-3, the material terms of the plan, as well as any amendment,extension, or modification of any of such material terms of the plan, mustbe in writing prior to the first day for which coverage is provided underan insured or insurance-type plan, or benefits are available under anyother type of plan, or prior to the effective date of any amendment, extensionor modification of such material terms, as the case may be.(2)<T3> Certain plan modifications_</T3>(i)<T3> Clarifications of material terms.</T3> Where a plan modification constitutesmerely a clarification to a material term (i.e., if the change merely clarifiesan existing term in the plan and will have a de minimis impact on the individualseligible or covered under the plan), the plan document need not reflectsuch modification until 120 days after the effective date of the modificationor, if there is no separate effective date, until 120 days after the adoptionof such amendment. A clarifying change generally includes a change in theplan language (either by addition or amendment) that reflects the previousintention of the employer with respect to a term of the plan. Whether thechange is a clarifying change is to be determined not only by referenceto the existing plan provisions and the notices provided to the employees,but also with regard to all of the facts and circumstances including, butnot limited to, whether and the extent to which the amended language isconsistent with the previous operation of the plan.(ii) <T3>Extension of time where notice provided. </T3>If the employer providesreasonable notice satisfying the requirements of section 89(k)(1)(C) relatingto the material terms of a plan to those entitled to notice under Qandamp;A-5of this section prior to the effective date of the plan or prior to theeffective date of any addition or amendment to any material term of theplan (including any amendment to the terms contained in documents thatare incorporated in the single written document by reference), then thetime by which the single written document must meet the requirements ofparagraph (d)(1) of this Qandamp;A-3 to reflect such notice (or the relatedadditions or amendments) is extended until 120 days after the effectivedate of the new plan or modification. However, this rule is available onlyif the notice contains a statement that the terms of the notice are legallyenforceable. (iii) <T3>Certain retroactive modifications_</T3>(A) <T3>In general. </T3>A modification to a material term of a plan does notfail to satisfy section 89(k)(1)(A) or this section merely because suchmodification applies retroactively to periods prior to the date of adoptionof such modification if all of the conditions set forth in paragraph (d)(2)(iii)(B) through (F) are satisfied. (B) <T3>Expansion of coverage or benefits. </T3>The modification must constitutean expansion of coverage or benefits under the plan (i.e., results in theplan having a larger value). (C) <T3>Notification. </T3>Employees under the plan (including all employeescovered under the plan for any portion of the period to which the retroactivecoverage applies, regardless of whether they are currently covered) mustbe reasonably notified (within the meaning of Qandamp;A-5 of this sectiondetermined without regard to the last sentence of paragraph (g)(2) of Qandamp;A-5)of the modification within 60 days after its adoption. (D) <T3>Plan amendment. </T3>The single written document must be amended toreflect the modification no later than 120 days after the adoption of themodification. (E) <T3>Duration. </T3>The modification must continue in effect with respectto all eligible individuals with respect to the plan from the effectivedate of the modification until 12 months after the date of adoption. (F) <T3>Nondiscrimination. </T3>The modification must not discriminate in favorof highly compensated employees. (iv) <T3>Nonmaterial terms. </T3>Modification to any term contained in the singlewritten document that is not a material term must be incorporated in thedocument no later than 120 days after the effective date of the modificationor, if there is no separate effective date, no later than 120 days afterthe adoption of such amendment. Thus, to the extent that the single writtendocument includes nonmaterial terms of the plan, such writing must accuratelyreflect such nonmaterial terms and any modifications thereto must be incorporatedin the single written document within the time set forth in the precedingsentence. (v) <T3>Examples. </T3>The requirements of this paragraph (d) are illustratedby the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>A plan is amended to change the level of employee contributionsrequired to participate. This constitutes an amendment to a material termof the plan. If the employer properly notifies the employees prior to theamendment being effective, the single written document need not be amendedto reflect such change until 120 days after the effective date of suchchange as long as the notice contains a statement that its terms are legallyenforceable. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>An administration agreement incorporated by referencein the plan document is amended to change the timing of fees paid to theplan administrator. Unless the circumstances indicate that this is a materialterm, no amendment to the plan document is required until 120 days afterthe effective date of the new fee agreement. In such case, the single writtendocument must be amended to reflect by specific reference (by an addendumor otherwise) the date of execution of the new fee agreement.</ITAG>(3) <T3>Exception for certain on-site medical and eating facilities. </T3>Certainon-site medical and eating facilities are exempt from the requirementsof section 89(k)(1)(A). An on-site medical facility is described in thisparagraph (d)(3) if it is located and operates exclusively on a work-siteof the employer and there is no physician care provided at the site atany time. A wellness program sponsored by the employer may be consideredan on-site medical facility. A medical facility is not described in thisparagraph (d)(3) unless access to the facility is available on the sameterms to each member of a group of employees that is defined under a reasonableclassification set up by the employer that does not discriminate in favorof highly compensated employees. An eating facility is described in thisparagraph (d)(3) if it is described in and meets the requirements of section132(e)(2). (4) <T3>Transition rule. </T3>A plan is not required to meet the writing requirementof section 89(k)(1)(A) with respect to the first plan year beginning in1989. For the subsequent plan year, a plan is not required to meet thewriting requirement of section 89(k)(1)(A) before the later of the firstday of such plan year, and the day following the end of the 12-month periodbeginning on the first day of the first plan year in 1989 that the planis subject to section 89. For purposes of this transition rule, the extensionof time due to a notice that is described in paragraph (d)(2)(ii) of thisQandamp;A-3 is not available.Q-4: When is a plan legally enforceable within the meaning of section 89(k)(1)(B)?A-4: (a) <T3>In general. </T3>A plan is considered legally enforceable only if theconditions required for an employee to participate, receive coverage andobtain a benefit are definitely determinable under the terms of the planand an employee satisfying such conditions is able to compel such participation,coverage and benefit. (b) <T3>Employer discretion_</T3>(1) <T3>Impermissible discretion_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>A plan generally is not considered legally enforceableif a decision as to whether to grant or deny participation, coverage ora benefit is discretionary with the employer either pursuant to the termsof the plan or through the operation of the plan. Thus, except as providedin paragraph (b)(2) of this Qandamp;A-4, a plan that permits the employer,either directly or indirectly, through the exercise of discretion, to grantor deny an employee the right to participate, receive coverage or obtaina benefit under the plan for which the employee is otherwise eligible orineligible (but for the employer's exercise of discretion) violates therequirement of section 89(k)(1)(B). An employer is deemed to have exerciseddiscretion in a manner inconsistent with section 89(k)(1)(B) if the employerimposes conditions or limitations on eligibility for coverage that arenot contained in the single written document comprising the plan and havenot been included in the notice described in paragraph (d)(2)(ii) of Qandamp;A-3of this section. Likewise, except as provided in paragraph (c) of thisQandamp;A-4, a plan violates section 89(k)(1)(B) if the employer waives anotherwise applicable condition, restriction or other term contained inthe plan if the single written document does not contain objective, clearlyascertainable criteria and procedures under which such condition, restrictionor term may be waived. Finally, a plan violates section 89(k)(1)(B) ifparticipation, coverage or benefits under the plan are subject to objectiveconditions that are within the control of the employer. (ii) <T3>Employer. </T3>For purposes of this Qandamp;A-4, the term ``employer''includes the plan administrator, fiduciary, trustee, actuary, independentthird party, and other persons. Thus, if a plan grants any person the discretionto deny or limit the availability of a plan benefit for which the employeemay otherwise be eligible under the plan (but for the exercise of suchdiscretion), and such exercise is not provided for under the terms of theplan through objective criteria or otherwise permissible under this Qandamp;A-4,then the plan violates section 89(k)(1)(B). (2) <T3>Permissible discretion_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>A plan may permit discretion with respect to the administrationof the plan, including the application of objective criteria specificallyset forth in the plan. In addition, a plan does not fail to meet the requirementsof this Qandamp;A-4 merely because discretion is exercised in accordancewith a qualified medical opinion of a physician. Also, if plan coverageor benefits are limited to those employees who satisfy certain objectiveconditions that are clearly set forth in the single written document andare not generally subject to the employer's discretion, an employer mayexercise discretion to the extent reasonably necessary to determine whetherthe objective conditions have been met. (ii) <T3>Administrative discretion. </T3>Administrative discretion means a determinationby the employer with respect to participation in, or coverage or benefitsunder, a plan or with respect to the general operation of a plan to theextent the exercise of such discretion is based exclusive1y on clearlydefined and ascertainable criteria contained in the single written document.The following provisions that permit limited administrative discretionare examples of provisions that do not violate section 89(k)(1)(B), providedthat the provisions are described in the single written document priorto the date a claim is incurred by a participant who is affected by theadministrative discretion and, when the provisions are made effective,they apply only to claims that have not yet been incurred: A provisionallowing for the commencement of benefits under the plan as soon as administrativelyfeasible after a stated date or event; a provision granting the employerauthority to determine whether an employee has satisfied the age and servicerequirements of the plan or is an excludable employee under section 89(h);and a provision stating that the benefits under the plan are limited toan amount equal to the reasonable and customary charge for such services.(iii) <T3>Medical discretion_</T3>(A) <T3>In general. </T3>A health plan does not fail to be legally enforceablemerely because coverage or benefits under the plan are conditioned on aqualified medical opinion of a physician. For example, the following planprovisions do not violate the requirements of this Qandamp;A-4: The requirementof a qualified medical opinion of a physician that treatment or benefitsare medically necessary or appropriate prior to the provision of such treatmentor benefits under a health plan; the requirement of a second opinion orother cost-containment feature of a health plan that is conditioned ona qualified medical opinion of a physician; and the inclusion under theplan of a managed care program. This is the case even if the qualifiedopinion is provided by a physician who is an employee of the employer.(B) <T3>Managed care programs. </T3>A managed care program is a program thatpermits the provision of alternative medical care not otherwise availableunder a health plan for medical conditions that are covered under the plan.A managed care program must operate pursuant to conditions and proceduresclearly ascertainable under the plan. That is, the availability of theprogram as well as a description of the types of cases that may qualifyunder the program must be contained in the single written document. Also,the provision of alternative medical care must be based on the consentof the employee and a qualified medical opinion of a physician. Such programmay also be conditioned upon the consent of the employer.(iv) <T3>Certain benefit limitations. </T3>A health plan does not include impermissiblediscretion merely because the plan limits certain benefits, such as reimbursements,for specified medical claims to those benefits that constitute the ``prevailing''or ``reasonable and customary'' charge for the claim if such charge isdetermined in accordance with a reasonable, uniform, consistent and nondiscriminatorymethod. In addition, a health plan does not include impermissible discretionmerely beoause such plan reimburses medical claims in excess of a ``prevailing''or ``reasonable and customary'' charge if such reimbursements are authorizedin accordance with reasonable, uniform, consistent, and nondiscriminatoryclaims review and reimbursement procedures set forth in the single writtendocument. (c) <T3>Certain retroactive modifications in the plan. </T3>A modificationto a plan's material terms does not fail to satisfy section 89(k)(1)(B)merely because such modification applies retroactively to periods priorto the date of adoption of such modification if all of the conditions setforth in paragraph (d)(2)(iii) of Qandamp;A-3 of this section are satisfiedwith respect to such modification. (d) <T3>Examples. </T3>The requirements of this Qandamp;A-4 are illustrated asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>A plan does not fail to meet the requirements of section89(k)(1)(B) because the employer grants benefits to an employee with apre-existing medical condition in contravention of a specific plan termexcluding coverage for any pre-existing conditions if the single writtendocument is amended to reflect such expanded coverage, it is provided ina nondiscriminatory manner, and the expanded coverage continues in effectfor a period of at least 12 continuous months from such amendment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>A plan includes a managed care program which providesthat upon the recommendation of the attending physician and the consentof both the insurer and the participant, the plan will reimburse alternativecare (e.g., home health care expenses) instead of continued hospitalization.This program does not cause the plan to fail to meet the requirements ofsection 89(k)(1)(B). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 3. </T3>An employer maintains a health plan for former employeeswho retire from the employer on or after age 55 with at least 10 yearsof service if the employer consents to such employee's separation fromservice. Conditioning participation in this health plan on the employer'sconsent to the employee's separation constitutes impermissible discretionand violates section 89(k)(1)(B).</ITAG>(e) <T3>Transition rule. </T3>A plan that is otherwise subject to the rulescontained in section 89(k) is not required to comply with section 89(k)(1)(B)prior to the first day of the plan year following the first plan year beginningin 1989. Q-5: What constitutes reasonable notification of employees under section89(k)(1)(C)? A-5: (a) <T3>In general. </T3>The employer or, if the plan is a multiemployer plan(within the meaning of section 3(37) of ERISA), the plan administratormust provide reasonable notice of the terms of a plan in order to satisfysection 89(k)(1)(C). Such reasonable notice must be provided to all eligibleindividuals (other than those individuals deriving their eligibility solelythrouqh another individual, such as dependents who derive their eligibilityin a health plan through an employee). An eligible individual is an individualwho participates under the plan or is described in the plan as eligibleto participate. An otherwise eligible individual is an eligible individualeven if participation under the plan is conditioned upon an election notyet made by such individual or the passage of a waiting period requiredby the plan. For purposes of this paragraph (a), an eligible individualalso includes an individual who is a qualified beneficiary (as definedin section 49808(g)(1)) under a health plan by reason of an occurrenceof a qualifying event described in section 49808(f)(3)(A), (C) or (E).Thus, such a qualified beneficiary must receive notice separate from theemployee through whom such beneficiary derived eligibility in the healthplan. See paragraph (g) of this Qandamp;A-5 for rules regarding the timingof notice. (b) <T3>Content of reasonable notice. </T3>The notice must contain a fair andcomplete summary of the material terms of the plan that are reasonablylikely to be of significance to an eligible individual. These terms includeat least the following: A general description of who is eligible to participatein the plan; a general description of the coverage or coverages offered(including the general types of benefits provided under the plan, basiclimitations on such benefits, and required deductibles and co-payments);the timing and method of any election to participate; the cost to the employeerelating to the plan. whether by way of salary reduction or employee contributions;the method by which a copy of the plan may be obtained; and the name andmeans of contacting a person from whom to request further information aboutthe plan. (c) <T3>Alternative form of compliance. </T3>For any plan other than an accidentor health plan, in lieu of a notice meeting the requirements of paragraph(b) of this Qandamp;A-5, the employer (or plan administrator, if the planis a multiemployer plan) may furnish each eligible individual with a copyof the single written document and all related documents that have beenincorporated by reference. This alternative cannot be used unless the singlewritten document complies in all material respects with the requirementsof 29 CFR 2520.102-2 (style and format of summary plan description). (d) <T3>Specific rule as to dependent care assistance programs. </T3>If a planis a dependent care assistance program described in section 129, any noticeto employees that is required for any plan year commencing on or afterJanuary 1, 1990, shall include a general description of the dependent carecredit (under section 21), the relationship between the credit and participationin the dependent care assistance program, and the general circumstancesunder which the credit may be more advantageous to a taxpayer than theexclusion. If any other provision of law requires that a notice be providedto individuals eligible to participate in a dependent care assistance program,the requirements of this Qandamp;A-5 are deemed satisfied to the extent suchnotice meets the requirements of this Qandamp;A-5. (e)<T3> Maintenance of single written document.</T3> The notice must containa statement that the employer (or the plan administrator, if the plan isa multiemployer plan) shall make the single written document (includingall related documents incorporated therein by reference) available forinspection upon reasonable notice. At a minimum, the following individualsshall be entitled to inspect and copy the single written document: anyeligible individual; any other employee of the employer maintaining theplan; and any employee organization that represents employees of such employer.The document must be made available at no cost to the requesting individualat a reasonable time and place and, if a copy of the document is requested,a copy is to be provided at a cost no greater than that prescribed in andSection;601.702(f)(5)(iv)(B) of this Title.  (f)<T3> Method of notification.</T3> Notification to eligible individualsmust be provided by the employer (or the plan  administrator, if the planis a multiemployer plan). For purposes of this paragraph (f), notice thatotherwise meets the requirements of this Qandamp;A-5 and is provided by aninsurance company, health maintenance organization or other health careentity is considered to be provided by the employer. Notice must be providedto all eligible individuals (other than those individuals deriving theireligibility solely through another individual, such as dependents who derivetheir eligibility in a health plan through an employee). Except as otherwisestated in the final sentence of this paragraph (f), notice must be madein a manner consistent in all material respects with 29 CFR andSection; 2520.104b-l(b)(1).If the employer elects to notify eligible individuals through the use ofthe alternative described in paragraph (c) of this Qandamp;A-5, the noticemust be provided to each such eligible individual either by hand or bymail with first class postage prepaid to the last known address of theeligible individual.  (g)<T3> Timing of notice_</T3>(1)<T3> In general.</T3> The notice required under section 89(k) must be providedprior to the first day on which coverage is provided under an insured orinsurance-type plan or benefits are available under any other type of planand prior to the effective date of any material amendment, extension ormodification of such coverage or benefits, and no later than a reasonabletime prior to the availability of any election with respect to participationunder such plan. For purposes of this paragraph (g), the first date onwhich coverage is provided or  benefits are available is the earliest dateon which a claim may be incurred and be covered under coverage providedunder a written document in existence on the date the claim is incurred. (2)<T3> Plan modifications.</T3> If there is a modification to a materialterm of a plan (including any change in plan design that results in a modificationof a material term), eligible individuals must be provided with noticeof such modification no later than 60 days after the effective date ofthe modification. In addition, a notice of a retroactive modification willbe treated as satisfying this paragraph (g)(2) if all of the conditionsset forth in paragraph (d)(2)(iii) of Qandamp;A-3 of this section are satisfiedwith respect to such modification.  (3)<T3> New employees.</T3> If an employee's participation in a plan is nonelectiveand begins within the employee's first 60 days of employment, the noticeto such employee required under section 89(k)(1)(C) is not required priorto 60 days after the first day such employee is employed.  (4)<T3> Transition rule.</T3> With respect to a plan year beginning on orafter January 1, 1989, a plan is not required to comply with this Qandamp;A-5prior to the later of July 1, 1989, or the first day of such plan year.The transition rule of this paragraph (g)(4) is solely for purposes ofcompliance with section 89(k)(l)(C). Use of the transition rule of thisparagraph (g)(4) does not accelerate the first date by which the plan mustmeet the writing requirement of section 89(k)(1)(A).  (h)<T3> Examples.</T3> The requirements of this Qandamp;A-5 are  illustratedin the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 1.</T3> An employer has its open season relating to healthplan selection from September l to October 1. Because the employer operatesat several locations, employees are provided notice at different times.However, the employer ensures that all of its eligible individuals arenotified during the period of time beginning 90 days before and endingon the first of September. The employer has notified eligible individualson a timely basis. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 2.</T3> An election with respect to a plan is available ona continuous basis throughout the plan year. The employer provides therequired notice to all eligible individuals 30 days prior to the beginningof the plan year. The employer has notified eligible individuals on a timelybasis. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 3.</T3> A plan is amended effective June l to increase themaximum amount payable for a benefit provided under the plan. The amendmentis adopted on May l and notice is provided to eligible individuals on thatdate. The amendment relates to a material term of the plan, and the employerhas notified the eligible individuals on a timely basis. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 4.</T3> An employee begins employment on October 10. Underthe terms of the employer's health plan, the employee becomes a participantin the plan as of the beginning of the next calendar month. If notice isprovided to the employee no later than December 9, the employer has providedtimely notice regardless of the fact that the employee becomes a participanton November 1. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 5.</T3> The facts are the same as in Example 4 except thatthe plan is elective. The notice is timely only if the employee is givennotice prior to November 1.</ITAG>Q-6: How does an employer meet the exclusive benefit requirement of section89(k)(1)(D)?A-6: (a) <T3>In general. </T3>A plan must be maintained for the exclusive benefitof those employees who participate in the plan. A plan may fail the requirementof this Qandamp;A-6 by reason of its terms or operation. Whether this ruleis satisfied is based on all of the facts and circumstances.(b) <T3>Requirements as to the individuals who may participate in a plan_</T3>(1)<T3>In general. </T3>The exclusive benefit provisions are satisfied onlyif all of the participants in the plan or plans are common law employeesof the employer or employers maintaining the plan. In the case of a voluntaryemployees' beneficiary association described in section 501(c)(9) (VEBA)that is part of a plan which must satisfy the requirements of section 89(k)(1)(D),those individuals who may participate in the plan include those who maybe members of the VEBA under andSection; 1.501(c)(9)-2(a).(2) <T3>Deemed common law employees. </T3>An individual who is not a commonlaw employee of an employer maintaining the plan and who receives coverageor benefits under such plan is deemed to be an employee for purposes ofparagraph (b)(1) if the exclusion from gross income that is granted underthe relevant provision of the Code (e.g., sections 79, 105, 106, 129 and132) is available to such individual on the same basis that it is availableto a common law employee. In addition, a qualified beneficiary, as definedin section 4980B(g)(1), is treated as a common law employee for purposesof paragraph (b)(1) of this Qandamp;A-6 with respect to a health plan underwhich the qualified beneficiary receives continuation coverage.(3) <T3>Certain nonemployees_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>An individual who is not a common law employee ofthe employer maintaining the plan, but who performs significant servicesfor the employer in a capacity other than as an employee, and receivescoverage or benefits under such plan may be disregarded in applying paragraph(b)(1) of this Qandamp;A-6 if such individual pays for such coverage entirelyon an after-tax basis. Thus, a nonemployee participant may be disregardedin applying paragraph (b)(1) of this Qandamp;A-6 with respect to a healthplan if the participant performs significant services for the employerand purchases the full coverage under the plan with after-tax contributions.(ii) <T3>Self-employed individuals. </T3>A self-employed individual who is treatedas an employee under section 401(c)(1) is treated as a common law employeeof the employer for purposes of applying paragraph (b)(1) of this Qandamp;A-6.(4) <T3>Examples. </T3>The requirements of this paragraph (b) are illustratedby the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>Under section 132(f)(3), certain use of air transportationby a parent of an employee is treated as use by the employee for purposesof determining the excludability of the value of air transportation. Theparent of the employee is deemed to be a common law employee for purposesof applying section 89(k)(1)(D) to a plan providing such air transportationbecause the air transportation provided to the parent is excludable fromgross income under section 132.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>A health plan provides coverage with respect to thespouse and dependents of a common law employee-participant. Because thevalue of such coverage is excludable under section 106 and the benefitsare excludable under section 105(b), the spouse and dependent childrenare deemed to be common law employees and the plan does not violate theexclusive benefit requirement of section 89(k) by reason of such coverage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 3. </T3>An employer allows an independent contractor to purchasehealth care continuation coverage under section 4980B. The plan does notfail to meet the requirements of section 89(k) by reason of the participationof the independent contractor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 4. </T3>A full-time life insurance salesman within the meaningof section 7701(a)(20) participates in an accident or health plan of aninsurance company. Since this individual is treated as an employee forpurposes of sections 105 and 106, the inclusion of such an individual inthe plan does not violate the exclusive benefit requirement of section89(k).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 5. </T3>A former employee of Employer X participates in EmployerX's accident or health plan. Because this individual is treated as an employeeof Employer X for purposes of sections 105 and 106, the former employee'sinclusion in the plan does not violate the exclusive benefit requirementof section 89(k).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 6. </T3>An individual who is a leased employee with respectto the recipient under section 414(n) of the individual's services is treatedas an employee of the recipient for purposes of sections 105 and 106, andthus, the inclusion of such leased employee in an accident or health planof the recipient does not violate the exclusive benefit requirement ofsection 89(k).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 7. </T3>An individual who provides significant services toanother person for a year but who is not a leased employee under section414(n) of such person and is not otherwise an employee of such person isnot treated as that person's employee for purposes of sections 105 and106. However, the inclusion of such individual in an accident or healthplan maintained by the employer does not violate the exclusive benefitrequirement of section 89(k) if such individual's participation in suchplan is fully paid for by such individual with after-tax contributions.</ITAG>(c) <T3>Multiemployer plans. </T3>A multiple employer plan or a multiemployerplan maintained by two or more employers does not fail to satisfy the requirementsof section 89(k)(1)(D) merely because employees of contributing employersparticipate in such plan or because the plan includes employees of an employeeorganization or of the plan.(d) <T3>Rules under other sections of the Code relating to the individualswho may participate in a plan. </T3>Nothing in this Qandamp;A-6 modifiesany other section of the Code or the regulations specifically relatingto who may participate in a plan. To the extent this Qandamp;A-6 is morerestrictive than another section of the Code or regulations, this Qandamp;A-6applies only for purposes of section 89. Notwithstanding the precedingsentence, the rules relating to who may participate in plans provided throughorganizations to which section 505 applies (i.e., organizations describedin sections 501(c)(9) and 501(c)(17)) continue to be applicable to suchorganizations. Similarly, in addition to the rules contained in this Qandamp;A-6,the rule contained in section 125(c)(1)(A) remains applicable in determiningwho may participate in a cafeteria plan.(e) <T3>Example. </T3>The provisions of this Qandamp;A-6 are illustrated in thefollowing example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>A self-insured health plan is funded through a voluntaryemployees' beneficiary association (within the meaning of section 501(c)(9))which accepts employee contributions.Under the plan, the experience gainfor a year is used to fund a part of the cost of the program for the followingyear by reducing the employee cost of participation (i.e., employee premiums)for all participants. The provision does not violate the exclusive benefitrule of section 89(k).</ITAG>(f) <T3>Transition rule. </T3>A plan that is subject to the rules containedin section 89(k) is not required to comply with section 89(k)(1)(D) priorto the first day of the plan year following the first plan year beginningin 1989.Q-7: How is it determined whether a plan is established with the intentof being maintained for an indefinite period of time? A-7: (a) <T3>In general. </T3>Whether a plan is established with the intent thatit will be maintained for an indefinite period of time as required by section89(k)(1)(E) is to be determined on the basis of all of the facts and circumstances.For purposes of section 89(k)(1)(E), a plan generally is treated as establishedwith the intent that it will be maintained for an indefinite period oftime if it is established and maintained for at least a consecutive 12-monthperiod. (b) <T3>Plan modifications and terminations_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Generally, a plan does not fail the requirement ofsection 89(k)(1)(E) merely because the employer reserves the right to modifyor terminate the plan or because the plan is not renewed pursuant to aspecific plan provision or is terminated. However, in certain circumstances,significant modifications in the coverage or benefits under the plan ora termination of coverage or benefits raises a presumption that the planwas not established with the intent that it continue for an indefiniteperiod of time. A plan is not considered to be modified or terninated merelybecause of a change in the insurance carrier or health care provider ifthe coverage and benefits under the plan are not substantially changed.(2) <T3>Coverage in effect for at least 12 consecutive months. </T3>The requirementof section 89(k)(1)(E) is not violated by reason of a material modificationor termination of a plan, if such material modification or terninationis effective on a prospective basis and the affected coverage (or substantiallysimilar coverage) has been in effect for at least a consecutive 12-monthperiod. This paragraph (b)(2) applies even if the plan contains a termspecifying the intent of the employer to terminate the plan upon the expirationof a 12-month period. (3) <T3>Coverage in effect for less than 12 consecutive months. </T3>For planyears beginning after December 31, 1989, special scrutiny will be givenwith respect to material modifications and terminations of a plan thatoccur before the terminated or modified coverage or benefits have beenin effect for at least 12 consecutive months. Such a termination or modificationwill not violate the requirement of section 89(k)(1)(E) if the employercan demonstrate that there is a substantial, independent business reasonfor such termination or modification and that the termination or modificationdoes not discriminate in favor of one or more highly compensated employees.(4) <T3>Certain modifications. </T3>A retroactive modification to a plan doesnot cause the plan to fail to satisfy section 89(k)(1)(E) if all of theconditions set forth in paragraph (d)(2)(iii) of Qandamp;A-3 of this sectionare satisfied with respect to such modification. (c) <T3>Examples. </T3>The requirements of this Qandamp;A-7 are illustrated inthe following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>An employer merges with another company. Pursuant tothe merger and in order to consolidate operations, the surviving employerterminates the health coverage in mid-year for the merged company's employeesand adds these employees to the plan maintained by the surviving company.The merger constitutes a valid business purpose for the termination ofthe health plan of the merged company and, thus, neither plan has failedthe requirements of section 89(k)(1)(E). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>A dental plan is modified on July 1 to include coveragefor certain orthodontic benefits. The plan year of the dental plan is thecalendar year. The requirements of section 89(k)(1)(E) are not violatedif the orthodontic benefits are eliminated from the plan on or after July1 of the following year because the coverage would have been in effectfor at least 12 consecutive months. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 3. </T3>An employer announces that employees who retire fromthe employer on or after age 55 with at least 10 years of service willreceive employer-provided health coverage for 1 year after separation ifsuch employees retire during a specified 2-month period. This plan doesnot fail to satisfy section 89(k)(1)(E) merely because the retirement windowis only 2 months long, because such window is a coverage eligibility conditionrather than a limitation on the period of coverage under the plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 4. </T3>A health plan with a broad range of coverage providedto all nonhighly compensated employees of an employer is in existence foronly one day in a year. The employer designates this day as the testingday for its health plans. Under the facts of the case, a reasonable inferencemay be made that the intention of the employer in granting the coverageunder the health plan in existence only on the testing day is to enhancethe likelihood that the employer's other health plan will satisfy the nondiscriminationrequirements of section 89. This plan fails the requirement of section89(k)(1)(E). These circumstances may also result in a finding by the Commissionerthat the plan or plans fail the nondiscriminatory provisions test of section89(d)(1)(C). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 5. </T3>The requirement of section 89(k)(1)(E) may be violatedif a plan is established under circumstances in which it is likely to benefitonly one individual. For example, assume that a plan is adopted after anillness is diagnosed with respect to an individual and that the coverageprovided relates to this illness. If the plan is terminated after the paymentof these expenses, the plan may fail the permanency requirement. In thisindividual is a highly compensated employee these circumstances may alsoresult in a finding by the Commissioner that the plan fails the nondiscriminatoryprovisions test of section 89(d)(1)(C). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) <T3>Exception for fringe benefits constituting no-additional-cost servicesand qualified employee discounts. </T3>The requirements of section 89(k)(1)(E)and this Qandamp;A-7 do not apply to any plan providing no-additional-costservices as described in section 132(b) or to any plan providing qualifiedemployee discounts as described in section 132(c).</ITAG>Q-8: What are the sanctions for failure to meet the qualification requirementsof section 89(k)? A-8: (a) <T3>In general</T3>_(1) <T3>Employer provided benefits. </T3>If a plan subject to section 89(k)fails to satisfy any of the requirements of that section, the employer-providedbenefits under the plan generally are not eligible for any exclusion fromgross income under Part III, Subchapter B, Chapter 1, Subtitle A, of theCode. For purposes of this Qandamp;A-8, such benefits are termed ``nonexcludablebenefits''. Thus, for example, employer-provided benefits provided undera health plan that fails to satisfy the requirements of section 89(k) arenot excludable under section 105. See, however, the limit on the amountof the nonexcludable benefits under paragraph (c)(4) of this Qandamp;A-8.In addition, see section 6652(k) with respect to certain sanctions thatmay be imposed on the employer with respect to the employer's responsibilitiesunder section 89. (2) <T3>Employee-provided benefits. </T3>Employee-provided benefits are notsubject to section 89(k) and continue to be subject to any applicable exclusionincluding, for example, the exclusion provided in section 104(a)(3) withrespect to accident and health plans. (3) <T3>Determination of includible benefit. </T3>The includible benefit isdetermined by calculating the total amount of the benefits provided underthe plan and then subtracting the amount of the employee-provided benefit.Determination of the amount of the employee-provided benefit must be madeunder the provisions of paragraph (d) of this Qandamp;A-8 regarding the allocationof benefits. (4) <T3>Section 89(b) excess benefits. </T3>Except as provided under paragraph(e) of this Qandamp;A-8, benefits received under a plan that fails to satisfysection 89(k) include those benefits received under coverage that constitutesan excess benefit under section 89(b). That is, for example, sections 101and 105 (b) and (c) are not applicable to benefits received under a discriminatoryaccident or health plan that also fails to satisfy section 89(k). In addition,a plan's failure to satisfy section 89(k) does not, in and of itself, affectthe extent to which the coverage provided with respect to such plan (asopposed to the benefits under the plan) is eligible for an exclusion fromgross income. Thus, for example, coverage under a health plan does notfail to be excludable under section 106 merely because the plan fails tosatisfy section 89(k). (b) <T3>De minimis failures to comply with section 89(k)(1) (A) and (C)</T3>_(1)<T3>In general. </T3>If a plan fails to satisfy the writing or notice requirementsof section 89(k) and such failure constitutes a de minimis failure (asdefined in paragraph (b)(2) of this Qandamp;A-8), then the plan will be deemedto have complied with the requirements of section 89(k) with respect tothe failed requirement, provided that such failure is corrected within90 days after the employer has notice of such failure. (2) <T3>Definition of de minimis failure to comply</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>A failure constitutes a de minimis failure to complyonly if the failure meets all of the requirements of paragraph (b)(2)(ii)of this Qandamp;A-8. Whether a failure to comply is described in paragraph(b)(2)(ii) of this Qandamp;A-8 is determined under all of the facts and circumstances.(ii) <T3>Requirements for qualifying as a de minimis failure</T3>_(A) <T3>Good faith effort. </T3>The employer must have acted in good faithand must have made a reasonable effort to comply with the applicable requirement.(B) <T3>No discriminatory effect. </T3>The failure must not have had the effectof causing the plan to discriminate in favor of one or more highly compensatedemployees. (C) <T3>No retroactive reduction of coverage. </T3>Correction of the failurecannot require that coverage be reduced under the single written document(as that plan existed at the time of the failure). That is, a failure isnot a de minimis failure if its correction requires that the coverage describedin the single written document be reduced with retroactive effect to conformto the previous operation of the plan. (iii) <T3>Examples. </T3>The requirements of paragraph (b)(2)(ii) of this Qandamp;A-8are illustrated by the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>An employer provides notice to its employees regardinga health plan. Despite the employer's good faith and reasonable effortsto provide timely notice, the notice is 1 week late. The notice complieswith all other requirements of section 89(k). Provided that no facts orcircumstances suggest otherwise, this is a de minimis failure to comply.The correction occurred when the notice was provided. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Despite the employer's good faith and reasonable efforts,an employer fails to give notice to its employees with respect to nonelectivecoverage under a dental plan that has been added to the employer's healthprogram. The employer has no knowledge (constructive or otherwise) of suchfailure. Only one employee incurs a covered expense under the dental programand the employee submits a claim to the employer notwithstanding the factthat the employee is not sure whether the claim is covered. If within 90days of receiving notice of the failure the employer follows the singlewritten document, reimburses the expense, and gives notice relating tosuch coverage (including the effective date of the dental plan), then theemployer has corrected the failure to comply with the notice requirements.</ITAG>(3) <T3>Correction. </T3>The terms ``correct'' and ``correction'' mean, withrespect to a de minimis failure to comply, that the employer performs allthe necessary acts in order to comply with section 89(k) and places theaffected employees in a financial position not worse than that in whichthey would have been if the employer had been in full compliance with section89(k). If a subsequent notice is given to correct a de minimis failure,such notice must reflect the original effective date relating to the coverage,benefit or other material term that is the subject of the notice and mustindicate that the employer will honor (and the employer must in fact honor)claims incurred after such effective date (including those prior to thedate of such correcting notice). This paragraph (b)(3) is illustrated inthe following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Despite the good faith and reasonable efforts of theemployer, a benefit is denied by a plan administrator in contraventionof the written terms of the plan. If at a later date payment is made underthe plan and the employer otherwise places the participant in a financialposition no worse than if the employer had complied (e.g., by paying thebenefit, interest if applicable and any fees incurred in compelling payment),then the failure is a de minimis failure and there has been correction.If the employee cannot be put in the same financial position as if theemployer had complied, the failure cannot be corrected and the employerhas failed to meet the requirements of section 89(k).</ITAG>(c) <T3>Determination of the amount of nonexcludable benefit</T3>_(1) <T3>In general. </T3>The amount of a nonexcludable benefit with respectto an employee under a plan that fails to satisfy section 89(k) (includingany insurance-type plan) is the value of the benefits (rather than thecoverage) either received by the employee under the plan during the planyear or received thereafter but incurred under coverage in effect duringthe plan year. Thus, the calculation of the amount of the nonexcludablebenefit under section 89(k) is based on the plan year of the failed planand not, as is the case with the determination of excess benefit undersection 89(b), on the testing year of the employer. To the extent thatthe single written document does not reflect a plan year, the determinationof the plan year shall be based on paragraph (b) of Qandamp;A-10 of andSection;1.89(a)-1. Nonexcludable benefits under section 89(k) are treated as receivedby an employee at the time such benefits are actually received or, butfor the employee's election to defer the receipt of such benefits, firstbecome available for receipt. In no case, however, will the amount of anonexcludable benefit with respect to an employee exceed the limit forsuch employee determined under paragraph (c)(4) of this Qandamp;A-8. (2) <T3>Definition of plan</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>The nonexcludable benefits with respect to a planthat fails to satisfy section 89(k) include all benefits received undersuch plan. Unless the special definition of plan set forth in paragraph(c)(2)(ii) of this Qandamp;A-8 applies, the nonexcludable benefits are thosebenefits described in the single written document that relates to the failureunder section 89(k).  (ii)<T3> Severable coverage.</T3> To the extent that the failure of a planto satisfy section 89(k) is directly and exclusively related to a specificportion or aspect of coverage provided in a plan, such portion or aspectof the coverage may be treated as a separate plan for purposes of determiningthe nonexcludable benefits under a plan that fails to satisfy section 89(k).In such a case, the coverage remaining under the single written documentafter the severance of the coverage providing nonexcludable benefits doesnot fail to satisfy the requirements of section 89(k) solely by reasonof the failure related to the severed coverage. This paragraph (c)(2)(ii)does not permit the severance of coverage of one individual from similarcoverage provided to other individuals under the single written document. (3)<T3> Examples.</T3> The requirements of paragraph (c) (1) and (2) of thisQandamp;A-8 are illustrated by the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 1.</T3> An employer maintains a single health plan. Duringthe plan year, the employer allows a claim for a pre-existing conditionin direct contravention of a provision in the plan. lf the plan is notmodified in accordance with paragraph (d)(2)(iii) of Qandamp;A-3 of thissection and if no correction occurs, coverage for that benefit is deemedto constitute a separate plan and the benefit thereunder is nonexcludable.However, unless a pattern or practice indicates that this provision wasintended to be a part of the employer's health plan (e.g., by continuousoperation in a similar manner), benefits properly paid with respect tothe plan are not taxable by reason of the above described failure. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 2.</T3> An employer fails to notify certain eligible individualswho are not highly compensated employees concerning their eligibility toelect to have coverage under a health plan. Certain of the individualsfail to receive coverage under the plan and incur medical expenses thatare not reimbursed due to the fact that the insurance company refuses toretroactively cover these individuals. The plan relating to the noticefails to comply with section 89(k) and all benefits described in the singlewritten document that relates to the failure are  nonexcludable to therecipients.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 3.</T3> A health program contained in a single written documentis terminated. The plan provided core coverage and dental care. The portionof the program containing dental coverage recently became effective andthe termination with respect to such coverage fails to meet the permanencerequirement of section 89(k)(1)(E). The failed coverage under the dentalprogram can reasonably be severed from the balance of the program. Thus,the dental coverage is treated as a separate plan and the benefits thatwere provided under such plan are nonexcludable. Other benefits providedunder the single written document which relates to the failed plan however,are not affected by such failure. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 4.</T3> A benefit is mistakenly granted to a participant inthat the benefit amount exceeds the dollar limitation described in thesingle written document. Unless the plan is modified in accordance withparagraph (d)(2)(iii) of Qandamp;A-3 of this section, the operation of theplan in a manner inconsistent with the single written document violatesthe writing requirement of section 89(k). The amount of the benefit inexcess of the dollar limitation may be treated as severable coverage andthus be nonexcludable without adverse impact upon the balance of the program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 5.</T3> An employer maintains a core health plan. A participantincurs an expense that is determined by the plan administrator to be incurredfor a benefit not covered by the plan. The benefit is denied by the planadministrator in contravention of the terms of the plan. Coverage for suchbenefit is actually available under the terms of the insurance contractthat describes medical benefits and coverage. However, if the employeris not able to correct the failure on a timely basis, all benefits describedin the single written document that relates to the failure are nonexcludablebecause the coverage involved is not reasonably severable from the generalcore coverage under the plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 6.</T3> A notice sent to participants fails to satisfy section89(k). The notice contains a modification of a material term relating tocosmetic surgical procedures coverage. lf the failure is not corrected,benefits received under the coverage of the type described in the noticeare nonexcludable. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Example 7.</T3> A notice is sent to employee participants failingto disclose a material term of the plan. The material term does not relateto a particular coverage or benefit, but rather applies to all benefitsunder the plan. All benefits provided under the single written documentrelated to the notice are nonexcludable unless such failure is correctedon a timely basis.</ITAG> (4)<T3> Limit on nonexcludable amount.</T3> Notwithstanding any other provisionof this Qandamp;A-8, the amount of the employer-provided portion (see paragraph(d)(2) of this Qandamp;A-8) of the nonexcludable benefits received by anemployee (and the employee's spouse and dependents) during a taxable yearof the employee under one or more accident and health plans that fail tosatisfy section 89(k) (but do not fail to be accident or health plans undersection 105 and 106) shall not exceed the sum of the following 4 amounts:10 percent of the employee's compensation (before inclusion of the employer-providedbenefit) from the employer maintaining the plan for the employee's taxableyear, up to and including the dollar amount in effect for such year undersection 414(q)(1)(C); 25 percent of the employee's compensation in excessof such dollar amount up to and including 200 percent of such dollar amount;75 percent of the employee's compensation in excess of 200 percent of suchdollar amount up to and including 300 percent of such dollar amount; and100 percent of the employee's compensation in excess of 300 percent ofsuch dollar amount. The limitation under this paragraph (c)(4) is appliedafter the determination of the employer-provided portion of the nonexcludablebenefits described in paragraph (d)(2) of this Qandamp;A-8, but before thecoordination of nonexcludable benefits with excess benefits as describedin paragraph (e) of this Qandamp;A-8. Compensation of an employee as usedin this paragraph (c)(4) is compensation as determined under section 414(q)(7)and with respect to the taxable year of the employee in which the  nonexcludablebenefit is received. Thus, for example, if an employee with compensationfrom the employer of $25,000 for a calendar year also receives $20,000in employer-provided benefits under a health plan that fails to satisfysection 89(k), the maximum amount of nonexcludable benefit for such employeefor such year is $2,500 (i.e., 10 percent of $25,000). The remaining $17,500in benefits under the plan that failed to satisfy section 89(k) may beexcludable from gross income under section 105. Finally, this paragraph(c)(4) does not apply if, in addition to failing one or more of the requirementsof section 89(k), a plan also fails to be an accident or health plan undersections 106 and 105.  (d)<T3> Allocation between employer and employee contributions_</T3>(1)<T3> In general.</T3> Section 89(k) generally eliminates the otherwiseavailable exclusions only with regard to benefits attributable to the employer-providedportion of the benefits received. Thus, for example, if a portion of thecoverage provided under a plan is attributable to after-tax employee contributions,an allocation of the benefits under such plan must be made on the basisof the relative cost to the employer and the employee for the plan. Allocationis permitted, however, only to the extent that a nonexcludable benefitis directly related to the portion of the coverage under the plan thatis attributable to employee contributions.  (2) <T3>Accident or health plans. </T3>If coverage provided under an accidentor health plan is partially attributable to after-tax  employee contributions,an allocation of the benefits under such plan is made in accordance witha method set forth in paragraphs (c), (d) or (e) of andSection; 1.105-1 andthe method permitted to determine the applicable premium for a group healthplan under section 4980B(f)(4) to determine the cost of a health plan.For purposes of this paragraph, coverage that is taxable by reason of beingconsidered an excess benefit (as defined in section 89(b)) is not consideredto be attributable to employee contributions to the plan. See paragraph(e) of this Qandamp;A-8 for rules regarding coordination of sanctions.  (3)<T3> Group-term life insurance plans.</T3> The portion of coverage undera plan to which section 79 applies that is attributable to employee contributionsmust be computed in the manner set forth in andSection; 1.79-3(e). In addition,the rule of paragraph (d)(1) of this Qandamp;A-8 does not apply to certainbenefits received under a group-term life insurance program subject tosection 79. Thus, while the table value of coverage over $50,000 is taxablewithout regard to section 89, such coverage is not attributable to employeecontributions for purposes of the rule in this paragraph (d). Similarly,coverage that is taxable by reason of being considered excess benefit (asdefined in section 89(b)) is not considered to be attributable to employeecontributions to the plan. See paragraph (e) of this Qandamp;A-8 for rulesregarding coordination of sanctions.  (4)<T3> Example.</T3> The following example illustrates the rule containedin this paragraph (d):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Employer A maintains a plan under which it pays two-thirdsof the annual premium cost on individual policies of accident and healthinsurance for its employees. The remainder of each employee's premium ispaid through after-tax payroll deduction from the wages of the employee.The annual cost of coverage determined by the method permitted to determinethe applicable premium (as defined in section 4980B(f)(4) for plans towhich that section applies) for Employee X is $240, of which $160 is paidby the employer. Thus, two-thirds (160/240) of all amounts received byEmployee X under such insurance policy are attributable to the contributionsof the employer and are nonexcludable if the plan fails to meet the requirementsof section 89(k).</ITAG>(e) <T3>Coordination rules_</T3>(1) <T3>Relationship between statutory employee benefit plans that fail tomeet the section 89(k) requirements and nondiscrimination tests. </T3>Theemployer-provided benefit (as defined in andSection; 1.89(a)-1 for purposesof the section 89 nondiscrimination tests) with respect to a statutoryemployee benefit plan must be taken into account for purposes of nondiscriminationtesting under section 89 even though the plan has failed the requirementsof section 89(k). That is, unless the coverage under a statutory employeebenefit plan is purchased by the employee with after-tax employee contributions(or is treated as having been purchased with after-tax employee contributions),the coverage is subject to section 89 nondiscrimination testing. For thepurposes of this paragraph (e), coverage that is taxable by reason of beingan excess benefit under section 89(b) is not treated as purchased withafter-tax employee contributions. Thus, employer-provided benefits (asdefined in paragraph (b) of Qandamp;A-1 of this section) that are attributableto such excess benefits are nonexcludable benefits if the plan also failssection 89(k). Also, a group-term life insurance plan subject to section79 must be considered for purposes of section 89 without regard to thefact that the cost of coverage is currently taxable to the extent providedin section 79 (those amounts in excess of $50,000) or by reason of beingconsidered excess benefit under section 89(b). (2) <T3>Coordination of sanctions where there is a failure of section 89(k)related to discriminatory coverage_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>If an individual has a nonexcludable benefit by reasonof section 89(k), the treatment of that benefit and the related excessbenefit under section 89(b) are coordinated by limiting the taxable amountof any employee to the greater of either the nonexcludable benefit or theexcess benefit. (ii) <T3>Nonexcludable benefit must be related to discriminatory coverage. </T3>Coordinationof sanctions with respect to a nonexcludable benefit under section 89(k)and a discriminatory excess benefit under section 89(b) is available onlywhen the nonexcludable benefit under section 89(k) is related to the excessbenefit that is taxable by reason of its being contained in a discriminatoryemployee benefit plan under section 89(c). For this purpose, a plan meansany specific option under the health program. The determination of relatednessis made on the basis of all of the facts and circumstances. Generally,if an employee is treated as having received an excess benefit under section89(b) and the excess benefit relates to a failure to meet the requirementsof paragraph (d)(2) (the 90 percent/50 percent eligibility test) or (d)(4)(the 75 percent benefits test) of Qandamp;A-1 of andSection; 1.89(a)-1, thereis a presumption that such excess benefit does not relate to a plan (orportion thereof) that fails section 89(k). Thus, for example, an employeewho receives employer-provided coverage with a value of $2,500 under anindemnity plan and employer-provided coverage with a value of $750 undera dental plan and who is treated as receiving an excess benefit of $1,000under section 89(b) because these health plans fail to meet the requirementsof the 75 percent benefits test or the 90 percent/50 percent eligibilitytest, and a nonexcludable benefit of $600 because the dental plan failssection 89(k), the entire $1,000 excess benefit is treated as attributableto the indemnity plan and the total includible amount would be $1,600 ($1,000plus $600). If the employee received an excess benefit of $3,000 undersection 89(b), then $500 of such excess benefit would be allocated to thedental plan and the total includible amount would be $3,100. If the dentalplan failed the 50 percent eligibility test, then $750 of the excess benefitor the higher of the excess benefit if less than $750 of the excess benefitrelated to the dental plan under Qandamp;A-9 of andSection; 1.89(a)-1 or the$600 nonexcludable benefit would be includible in the employee's grossincome.(iii) <T3>Coordination where nonexcludable benefit received in taxable year otherthan the taxable year in which testing year ends. </T3>If a nonexcludablebenefit under section 89(k) is received in a taxable year of the employeeother than that taxable year in which ends the testing year for which thereis a related excess benefit under section 89(b) (including any additionaltime permitted by reason of an election under section 89(a)(2)(B)) andif the benefits otherwise qualify for the coordination described in thisparagraph (e), the rules of this paragraph (e)(2)(iii) apply. If the testingyear ends in a later taxable year of the employee than the taxable yearin which the nonexcludable benefit is received, the amount of the excessbenefit that is included in gross income for the later taxable year isreduced (but not below zero) by the amount of nonexcludable benefit includedin gross income for the earlier taxable year. Similarly, where the nonexcludablebenefit is received in a later taxable year of the employee than the taxableyear in which the testing year ends, the amount of the nonexcludable benefitincluded in gross income for the later year is reduced (but not below zero)by the amount of the excess benefit included for the earlier taxable yearto which the nonexcludable benefit relates.(iv) <T3>Examples. </T3>The provisions of this paragraph (e)(2) are illustratedby the following examples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>Assume that an employer's testing year under section89(a) is the calendar year. Plan A has a plan year beginning on July 1and has an employer-provided benefit, based on its annual applicable premium,of $2,000. Employee X receives a reimbursement under plan A on July 10in the amount of $500. Assume that Plan A fails section 89(k). Assume furtherthat Employee X has received $1,000 in excess benefit for the testing year,all of which relates to the total value of coverage under Plan A. For thiscalendar year, Employee X must include in gross income $l,000. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Assume the same facts as in Example 1, except thatthe $500 reimbursement is $1,500. Employee X must include in income $1,500.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 3. </T3>Assume that an employer's testing year begins on July1. Plan A has an applicable premium of $2,000 and its plan year is the1991 calendar year. Employee X receives a reimbursement of $500 under PlanA on July 10, 1991. Assume that Plan A fails section 89(k). The employerdetermines that Employee X has $2,000 in excess benefit in the testingyear that begins July 1, 1991, related to Plan A. For 1991, Employee Xmust include $500 in gross income. However, for 1992, Employee X may usethat $500 as an offset against the amount of excess benefit related tothe coverage under which the benefit was granted. Thus, Employee X is onlyrequired to include $1,500 in gross income for 1992 ($2,000^$500).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 4. </T3>Assume the same facts as Example 3, except that EmployeeX received the reimbursement on June 10, 1991. Unless other facts indicateotherwise, no offset is available since the reimbursement did not relateto excess benefit calculated with regard to the 1991 testing year.</ITAG>(f) <T3>Authority to limit nonexcludable benefits. </T3>The Commissioner, inrevenue rulings, notices and other publications of general applicability,may limit the nonexcludable benefit that would otherwise be determinedunder section 89(k) and this proposed regulation to the extent the factsand circumstances indicate that the elimination of the otherwise availableexclusions from gross income would be inconsistent with the purposes underlyingthe requirements of section 89(k). Among the facts and circumstances tobe taken into account are the relationship between the p1an's failure undersection 89(k) and the employee's receipt of benefits under such p1an, theextent to which the plan's failure was attributable to a reckless or intentionaldisregard of the requirements of section 89(k), and whether the impositionof the full sanction under section 89(k) would impose a hardship on theemployee that is not justified by the nature and degree of the plan's failure.<T4>Par. 3. </T4>Proposed andSection; 1.125-1 as published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on May 7, 1984 (49 FR 19321), and amended onDecember 31, 1984 (49 FR 50733), is amended by adding a new Qandamp;A-30at the end, to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.125-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Questions and Answers relating to cafeteria plans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>Q-30: Are there additional rules for cafeteria plans? A-30: Yes. Additional rules for cafeteria plans are contained in andSection;1.125-2 and take effect as set forth in Qandamp;A-1 of andSection; 1.125-2.To the extent that andSection; 1.125-2 and this andSection; 1.125-1 are inconsistent,andSection; 1.125-2 supersedes this andSection; 1.125-1. <T4>Par. 4. </T4>New andSection; 1.125-2 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.125-2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Miscellaneous cafeteria plan questions and answers. </ITAG>The following is a list of the questions addressed in this section. Q-1: What are the effective dates of these cafeteria plan rules? Q-2: What does section 125 of the Code provide? Q-3: What is a cafeteria plan under section 125? Q-4: What benefits constitute qualified benefits and what benefits constitutecash under a cafeteria plan? Q-5: May a cafeteria plan include a benefit that defers the receipt ofcompensation? Q-6: In what circumstances may participants revoke existing elections andmake new elections under a cafeteria plan? Q-7: How do the rules governing the tax-favored treatment of employer-providedbenefits apply to plans that are flexible spending arrangements? Q-1: What are the effective dates of these cafeteria plan rules? A-1: Qandamp;A-1 through Qandamp;A-6 of this andSection; 1.125-2 apply to planyears of cafeteria plans as set forth in Qandamp;A-10 of andSection; 1.89(a)-1(regarding the effective date of section 89). Qandamp;A-7 of this andSection;1.125-2 (relating to flexible spending arrangements) applies to plan yearsbeginning after December 31, 1989. Q-2: What does section 125 of the Code provide? A-2: In general, an employee who has an election among nontaxable benefitsand taxable benefits (including cash) must include in gross income anytaxable benefits that the employee could have actually received pursuantto the employee's election. The amount of these benefits is included inthe employee's income in the year in which the employee would have actuallyreceived the taxable benefits if the employee had elected such benefits.This generally is the result even if the employee's election between thenontaxable benefits and taxable benefits is made prior to the year in whichthe employee would have actually received the taxable benefits. However,section 125 provides that cash (including certain taxable benefits) providedunder a nondiscriminatory cafeteria plan will not be included in a participant'sgross income merely because the participant has the opportunity, beforethe cash becomes currently available to the participant, to choose amongcash and the nontaxable benefits under the cafeteria plan Q-3: What is a cafeteria plan under section 125? A-3: A cafeteria plan is a plan maintained by an employer for the benefitof its employees that satisfies the requirements of section 89(k), underwhich all participants are employees, and under which each participanthas the opportunity to choose among cash and qualified benefits. Additionally,a cafeteria plan satisfies the written plan document requirement of clause(v) of Qandamp;A-3 of andSection; 1.125-1 only if the plan describes the maximumamount of elective contributions available to any employee under the planeither by stating the maximum dollar amount or maximum percentage of compensationthat may be contributed as elective contributions under the plan by employeesor by stating the method for determining the maximum amount or percentageof elective contributions that employees may make under the plan. The meaningof ``elective contributions'' under a cafeteria plan is the same as themeaning of ``salary reduction contributions'' under a cafeteria plan. Seealso paragraph (a)(2) of Qandamp;A-8 of andSection; 1.89(a)-1.Q-4: What benefits constitute qualified benefits and what benefits constitutecash under a cafeteria plan? A-4: (a)<T3> Qualified benefits</T3>_(1)<T3> In general.</T3> A benefit is a qualified benefit under a cafeteriaplan if the benefit does not defer the receipt of compensation and thebenefit is not includable in an employee's gross income by reason of anexpress provision of Chapter 1 of the Code. In the case of insurance-typebenefits, such as benefits provided under accident or health plans (sections106 and 105) and group-term life insurance plans (section 79), the benefitis the coverage under the plan.(2)<T3> Items that constitute qualified benefits_</T3>(i)<T3> Accident or health plans.</T3> Coverage under an accident or healthplan is a qualified benefit to the extent that such coverage is excludablefrom income under section 106. Thus, for example, coverage under a long-termdisability plan and coverage under an accidental death and dismembermentpolicy may be qualified benefits.(ii)<T3> Group-term life insurance.</T3> Group-term life insurance coveragethat is excludable from gross income under section 79 and group-term lifeinsurance coverage that is includable in gross income solely because thedeath benefit payable thereunder is in excess of the dollar limit of section79 are qualified benefits.(iii)<T3> Certain discriminatory benefits.</T3> Accident or health plan coverage,group-term life insurance coverage, and benefits under a dependent careassistance program do not fail to be qualified benefits under a cafeteriaplan merely because they are includable in gross income solely becauseof section 89 or any other applicable nondiscrimination requirement (e.g.,section 129(d)).(iv)<T3> Certain dependent care assistance benefits.</T3> Benefits under adependent care assistance program that would have been excludable fromgross income under section 129 but for the elimination of overnight campexpenses from dependent care assistance under such section (effective January1, 1988) or the reduction of the age limit on children qualifying as dependentsunder such section (effective January 1, 1989) do not fail to be qualifiedbenefits merely because such changes in law cause such benefits to be taxable.However, the preceding sentence applies only if the benefits are providedunder a program that otherwise qualifies as a dependent care assistanceprogram under section 129, are taxable to the employee upon receipt, andare provided by the December 31 next following the effective date of theapplicable change in law. After such date, such benefits will not constitutequalified benefits but may be treated as cash pursuant to paragraph (b)of this Qandamp;A-4.(b)<T3> Currently taxable benefits treated as cash.</T3> In general, a benefitis treated as cash if such benefit does not defer the receipt of compensationand an employee who receives such benefit purchases such benefit with after-taxemployee contributions or is treated, for all purposes under the Code (including,for example, reporting and withholding purposes), as receiving, at thetime that such benefit is received, cash compensation equal to the fullvalue of such benefit at such time and then purchasing such benefit withafter-tax employee contributions. Thus, for example, long-term disabilitycoverage is treated as cash if the cafeteria plan provides that an employeemay purchase the coverage under the plan with after-tax employee contributions,or provides that the employee receiving such coverage is treated as havingreceived cash compensation equal to the value of the coverage and thenas having purchased the coverage with after-tax employee contributions.Any taxable benefit that is not described in paragraph (a) of this Qandamp;A-4and is not treated as cash under this paragraph (b) may not be includedin a cafeteria plan.(c)<T3> Qualified cash or deferred arrangements.</T3> Elective contributionsto a qualified cash or deferred arrangement (section 401(k)) are permittedunder a cafeteria plan. In addition, after-tax employee contributions undera qualified plan subject to section 401(m) are permitted under a cafeteriaplan. The right to make such contributions will not cause a plan to failto be a cafeteria plan merely because, under the qualified plan, employermatching contributions are made with respect to elective or after-tax employeecontributions.(d)<T3> Benefits that do not constitute qualified benefits or cash.</T3> Benefitsof the type described in section 117 or 132 do not constitute qualifiedbenefits or cash and thus may not be included in a cafeteria plan regardlessof whether any such benefit is purchased with after-tax employee contributionsor on any other basis. Thus, for example, health diagnostic or examinationplans are qualified benefits under a cafeteria plan because such plansare accident or health plans that are eligible for the exclusion undersection 106 and are not, in any case, eligible for the exclusion undersection 132.Q-5: May a cafeteria plan include a benefit that defers the receipt ofcompensation? A-5: (a) <T3>In general. </T3>A cafeteria plan may not include any plan that offersa benefit that defers the receipt of compensation. In addition, a cafeteriaplan may not operate in a manner that enables employees to defer compensation.For example, a plan that permits employees to carry over unused electivecontributions or plan benefits (e.g., accident or health plan coverage)from one plan year to another operates to defer compensation. This is thecase regardless of how the contributions or benefits are used by the employeein the subsequent plan year (e.g., whether they are automatically or electivelyconverted into another taxable or nontaxable benefit in the subsequentplan year or used to provide additional benefits of the same type). Similarly,a cafeteria plan operates to permit the deferral of compensation if theplan permits participants to use contributions for one plan year to purchasea benefit that will be provided in a subsequent plan year (e.g., life,health, disability, or long-term care insurance coverage with a savingsor investment feature, such as whole life insurance). For example, a cafeteriaplan operates to permit the deferral of compensation if the cafeteria planincludes a health plan that is a flexible spending arrangement (as definedin Qandamp;A-7 of this section) and such health plan may reimburse participants'premium payments for other accident or health coverage extending beyondthe end of the plan year. See Qandamp;A-7 of this section for the treatmentof experience gains under a health plan that is a flexible spending arrangement.(b) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>A plan does not fail to be a cafeteria plan merelybecause the plan permits participants to make elective contributions undera qualified cash or deferred arrangement under section 401(k) or permitsparticipants employed by certain educational institutions to purchase retireegroup-term life insurance. Similarly, a cafeteria plan does not includea benefit that defers the receipt of compensation merely because the cafeteriaplan provides the opportunity to make after-tax employee contributionssubject to section 401(m) under a qualified plan. In addition, a cafeteriaplan will not be treated as including a benefit that defers the receiptof compensation merely because, under the qualified plan, employer matchingcontributions (as defined in section 401(m)(4)(A)) are made with respectto such elective contributions or after-tax employee contributions. Finally,reasonable premium rebates or policy dividends paid with respect to benefitsprovided under a cafeteria plan do not constitute impermissible deferredcompensation if such rebates or dividends are paid before the close ofthe 12-month period immediately following the plan year to which such rebatesand dividends relate. (c) <T3>Treatment of paid vacation days under a cafeteria plan_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>A cafeteria plan may include elective, paid vacationdays by permitting participants to receive either additional or fewer paidvacation days than the employer otherwise provides to the employees ona nonelective basis, if the inclusion of elective vacation days under theplan does not operate to permit the deferral of compensation. (2) <T3>Ordering of elective and nonelective vacation days. </T3>In determiningwhether a plan that provides for paid vacation days operates to permitthe deferral of compensation, and thus fails to be a cafeteria plan, aparticipant is deemed to use nonelective vacation days (i.e., the vacationdays with respect to which the employee had no election) before electivevacation days. (3) <T3>Cashing out unused elective vacation days. </T3>A plan does not operateto permit the deferral of compensation merely because the plan permitsa participant who has not used all elective, paid vacation days for a planyear to receive in cash the value of such unused days in exchange for suchdays if the participant receives the cash on or before the earlier of thelast day of the plan year of the cafeteria plan or the last day of theemployee's taxable year to which the elective contributions used to purchasethe unused days relate. (4) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the rules of thisparagraph (c):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>Assume that an employer provides an employee with 2weeks of paid vacation for each calendar year and maintains a calendaryear cafeteria plan that permits the employee to ``purchase,'' with electivecontributions, an additional week of paid vacation. Assume further thatEmployee A, with a calendar tax year, purchases 1 additional week of vacation.If Employee A uses only 2 weeks of vacation during the year, the employeeis treated as having used the 2 nonelective weeks and as having retainedthe 1 elective week. If the 1 remaining week (i.e., the elective week)may be carried over to the next year (or the value thereof used for anyother purpose in the next year), the plan operates to permit the deferralof compensation and thus is not a cafeteria plan. However, the cafeteriaplan may permit the employee to receive the value of the unused electivevacation week in cash before the end of the applicable calendar year. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>The facts are the same as set forth in Example 1, exceptthat Employee A uses only 1 week of vacation during the year. Thus, EmployeeA is treated as having used 1 nonelective week and as having retained 1nonelective week as well as 1 elective week of vacation. Because the nonelectivevacation days are not part of the cafeteria plan (i.e., the employer orplan does not permit participants to exchange regular vacation days forother benefits), Employee A may be permitted to carry over the 1 nonelectiveweek of vacation to the next year. In addition, under the terms of thecafeteria plan, Employee A must either forfeit the remaining elective vacationweek or receive in cash the value of such unused days before the end ofthe applicable calendar year.</ITAG>Q-6: In what circumstances may participants revoke existing elections andmake new elections under a cafeteria plan? A-6: (a) <T3>In general. </T3>A plan is not a cafeteria plan unless the plan requiresthat participants make elections among the benefits offered under the plan.In general, an election will not be deemed to have been made if, aftera participant has elected and begun to receive a benefit under the plan,the participant is permitted to revoke the election during the period ofcoverage under the plan, even if the revocation relates only to the remainingportion of the coverage period with respect to the benefit and even ifthe revocation is in response to a change in the tax treatment of suchbenefit. However, in the circumstances specified in paragraphs (b) through(g) of this Qandamp;A-6, notwithstanding Qandamp;A-8 of andSection; 1.125-1,the terms of a cafeteria plan may permit a participant to revoke an existingelection and, in some cases, to make a new election with respect to theremaining portion of the period of coverage. If a new election is permittedunder this Qandamp;A-6, then such new election must be consistent with thereason that such change was permitted. In addition, a cafeteria plan maypermit an election change to the extent required under paragraph (c)(6)of Qandamp;A-3 of andSection; 1.89(a)-1. Such election changes will not causetaxable benefits offered under the cafeteria plan to be treated as currentlyavailable to employees. See Qandamp;A-7 of this section for certain additionallimits on election changes that relate to certain flexible spending arrangements.(b) <T3>Significant cost or coverage changes_</T3>(1) <T3>Cost changes. </T3>If the cost of a health plan provided by an independent,third party provider under a cafeteria plan increases or decreases duringa plan year and under the terms of the cafeteria plan, employees are requiredto make a corresponding change in their premium payments, the cafeteriaplan may, on a reasonable and consistent basis, automatically increaseor decrease, as the case may be, all affected participants' elective contributionsor after-tax employee contributions for such health plan. Alternatively,if the premium amount significantly increases, a cafeteria plan may permitparticipants either to make a corresponding change in their premium paymentsor to revoke their elections and, in lieu thereof, to receive on a prospectivebasis, coverage under another health plan with similar coverage. No electiveadjustments of participants' contributions or revocations of participants'elections other than those provided for in the preceding sentence may bepermitted under a cafeteria plan on account of changes in the cost of ahealth plan. (2) <T3>Coverage changes. </T3>If the coverage under a health plan providedby an independent, third-party provider is significantly curtailed or ceasesduring a period of coverage, a cafeteria plan may permit all affected participantsto revoke their elections of the health plan and, in lieu thereof, to receiveon a prospective basis coverage under another health plan with similarcoverage. (c) <T3>Certain changes in family status. </T3>A cafeteria plan may permita participant to revoke a benefit election during a period of coverageand to make a new election for the remaining portion of the period if therevocation and new election are both on account of a change in family statusand are consistent with such change in family status. For purposes of thisparagraph (d), examples of changes in family status for which a benefitelection change may be permitted include the marriage or divorce of theemployee, the death of the employee's spouse or a dependent, the birthor adoption of a child of the employee, the termination of employment (orthe commencement of employment) of the employee's spouse, the switchingfrom part-time to full-time employment status or from full-time to part-timestatus by the employee or the employee's spouse, and the taking of an unpaidleave of absence by the employee or the employee's spouse. Election changesare also permitted where there has been a significant change in the healthcoverage of the employee or spouse attributable to the spouse's employment.Benefit election changes are consistent with family status changes onlyif the election changes are necessary or appropriate as a result of thefamily status changes. (d) <T3>Separation from service. </T3>A cafeteria plan may permit an employeewho separates from the service of the employer during a period of coverageto revoke existing benefit elections and terminate the receipt of benefitsfor the remaining portion of the coverage period. However, in such case,the plan must prohibit the employee, if the employee should return to servicefor the employer, from making new benefit elections for the remaining portionof the period of coverage. (e) <T3>Cessation of required contributions. </T3>A cafeteria plan may providethat a benefit will cease to be provided to an employee if the employeefails to make the required premium payments with respect to the benefit(e.g., employee ceases to make premium payments for health plan coverageafter a separation from service). However, in such case, the plan mustprohibit the employee from making a new benefit election for the remainingportion of the period of coverage. (f) <T3>Elective contributions under a qualified cash or deferred arrangement.</T3>A cafeteria plan may permit a participant who has elected to makeelective contributions under a qualified cash or deferred arrangement (withinthe meaning of section 401(k)) to modify or revoke the election as permittedunder section 401(k). Similarly, a cafeteria plan may permit a participantwho has elected to make after-tax employee contributions subject to section401(m) to modify or revoke the election as permitted under section 401(m).Thus, for example, a cafeteria plan may include a benefit option providingfor elective contributions under a qualified cash or deferred arrangementwhich requires that, as a condition of a hardship distribution, the employeereceiving the distribution cease making elective contributions under thearrangement for a specified period.Q-7: How do the rules governing the tax-favored treatment of employer-providedbenefits apply to plans that are flexible spending arrangements? A-7: (a) <T3>In general. </T3>Health plans that are flexible spending arrangementsas defined in paragraph (c) of this Qandamp;A-7 (health FSAs) must conformto the generally applicable rules under sections 105 and 106 in order forthe coverage and reimbursements under such plans to qualify for tax-favoredtreatment under such sections. Thus, health FSAs must qualify as accidentor health plans. This means that, in general, while the health coverageunder the FSA need not be provided through a commercial insurance contract,health FSAs must exhibit the risk-shifting and risk-distribution characteristicsof insurance. Similarly, reimbursements under health FSAs must be paidspecifically to reimburse the participant for medical expenses incurredpreviously during the period of coverage. Furthermore, a health FSA cannotoperate under a cafeteria plan in a manner that enables participants toreceive coverage only for periods for which the participants expect toincur medical expenses if such periods constitute less than a plan year.A reimbursement is not paid specifically to reimburse the participant formedical expenses if the participant is entitled to these amounts, in theform of cash or any other taxable or nontaxable benefit (including healthcoverage for an additional period), without regard to whether or not theemployee incurs medical expenses during the period of coverage. A healthFSA will not qualify for tax-favored treatment under sections 105 and 106of the Code if the effect of the reimbursement arrangement eliminates all,or substantially all, risk of loss to the employer maintaining the planor other insurer. These rules apply with respect to a health plan withoutregard to whether the plan is provided through a cafeteria plan. See Qandamp;A-17of andSection; 1.125-1. (b) <T3>Special requirements</T3>_(1) <T3>In general. </T3>A health FSA must satisfy the requirements set forthin this paragraph (b) in order for the employer-provided health coverageprovided through the health FSA to qualify for the exclusion from incomeunder section 106 and for the reimbursements and other benefits pursuantto the health FSA coverage to qualify for the exclusion from income undersection 105. (2) <T3>Uniform coverage throughout coverage period. </T3>The maximum amountof reimbursement under a health FSA must be available at all times duringthe period of coverage (properly reduced as of any particular time forprior reimbursements for the same period of coverage). Thus, the maximumamount of reimbursement at any particular time during the period of coveragecannot relate to the extent to which the participant has paid the requiredpremiums for coverage under the health FSA for the coverage period. Similarly,the payment schedule for the required premiums for coverage under a healthFSA may not be based on the rate or amount of covered claims incurred duringthe coverage period. Reimbursement will be deemed to be available at alltimes if it is paid at least monthly or when the total amount of the claimsto be submitted is at least a specified, reasonable minimum amount (e.g.,$50). If the employee revokes existing elections, the employer must reimbursethe employee for any amount previously paid for coverage or benefits relatingto the period after the date of the employee's separation from serviceregardless of the employee's claims or reimbursements as of such date.The following examples illustrate the rules of this paragraph (b)(2):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>Assume that an employee elects coverage under a healthFSA providing coverage of up to $300 in medical expenses and the annualpremium for a calendar year of coverage is $300. Assume also that the employeeis permitted to pay the $300 premium through salary reduction of $25 permonth throughout the coverage period. The employee must be eligible toreceive the maximum amount of reimbursement of $300 at all times throughoutthe coverage period (reduced by prior reimbursements). Thus, if the employeeincurs $250 of medical expenses in January, the full $250 must be availablefor reimbursement even though the employee has made only one premium payment.If the employee incurs another $50 in health expenses in February, theremaining $50 of the $300 maximum must be available for reimbursement.The employer or plan may not provide for an acceleration of the requiredpremium payments based on the employee's incurred claims and reimbursements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Assume that an employee elects coverage under a healthFSA with a maximum reimbursement limit of $500 for a calendar year of coverageand is required to pay the $450 premium for such coverage in two equal$225 installments, one at the beginning of the period of coverage and thesecond installment by the beginning of the sixth month of coverage. Assumefurther that the employee incurs a $400 medical expense in February andthe FSA makes a $400 reimbursement to the employee in March. The employeedoes not incur any additional medical expenses before the end of June,at which time the employee separates from service. If the employee failsto make the second premium installment, the employee's coverage under theFSA may be terminated as of the end of June so that medical expenses incurredafter June are not covered. If the employee pays the second premium installment,the employee's coverage under the FSA must continue, so that additionalmedical expenses (up to the remaining $100) incurred before the end ofDecember are covered.</ITAG>(3) <T3>Twelve-month period of coverage. </T3>The period of coverage undera health FSA must be 12 months or, in the case of a short first plan yearor a short plan year of a cafeteria plan where the plan year is being changed,the entire short plan year. Election changes to increase or decrease thelevel of coverage under a health FSA during the 12-month period of coverageare not permitted with respect to health FSAs. However, a cafeteria planmay permit participants to make health FSA election changes for the remainingportion of the 12-month period of coverage on account of and consistentwith certain family status changes. See Qandamp;A-6 of this section. In addition,a cafeteria plan may provide that the period of coverage under a healthFSA terminates if the employee ceases to make required premium payments;however, such employee may not be permitted to make a new health FSA benefitelection for the remaining portion of the original coverage period. Also,a cafeteria plan may permit an employee who separates from the serviceof the employer during a period of coverage to revoke existing benefitelections and terminate receipt of benefits, including coverage under thehealth FSA. For the application of the health care continuation rules ofsection 4980B of the Code to health FSAs, see the regulations under section4980B or its predecessor section 162(k) of the Code. The requirements ofthis paragraph (b)(3) are illustrated by the following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Assume that an employee has elected a $300 calendar yearhealth FSA, with monthly premium payments of $25 during the 12-month periodof coverage. Such employee separates from service for the employer at theend of June and ceases to make additional premium payments. The cafeteriaplan may provide that the FSA's period of coverage does not extend beyondJune if the employee does not continue to make the required premium payments.However, if the employee makes the total premium payment for the 12-monthperiod of coverage, the cafeteria plan may not terminate the FSA's periodof coverage merely because the employee separated from service before theend of the coverage period.</ITAG>(4) <T3>Prohibited reimbursement. </T3>A health FSA can only reimburse medicalexpenses as defined in section 213. Thus, for example, a health FSA cannotreimburse dependent care expenses. In addition, a health FSA may not treatparticipants' premium payments for other health coverage as reimbursableexpenses. Thus, for example, a health FSA may not reimburse participantsfor premiums paid for other health plan coverage, including premiums paidfor health coverage under a plan maintained by the employer of the employee'sspouse or dependent. (See also Qandamp;A-5 of this section with respect towhether the reimbursement of other premiums constitutes impermissible deferredcompensation.) This paragraph (b)(4) does not prevent premiums for currenthealth plan coverage (including coverage under a health FSA) from beingpaid on a salary reduction basis through the ordinary operation of thecafeteria plan. (5) <T3>Claims substantiation. </T3>A health FSA may reimburse a medical expenseonly if the participant provides a written statement from an independentthird party stating that the medical expense has been incurred and theamount of such expense and the participant provides a written statementthat the medical expense has not been reimbursed or is not reimbursableunder, any other health plan coverage. Thus, for example, as with any otherflexible spending arrangement, a health FSA cannot make advance reimbursementsof future or projected expenses. In determining whether, under all thefacts and circumstances, employees are being reimbursed for inadequatelysubstantiated claims, special scrutiny will be given to other arrangementssuch as employer-to-employee loans that are related to the employee premiumpayments or actual or projected employee claims. (6) <T3>Claims incurred. </T3>Medical expenses reimbursed under a health FSAmust be incurred during the participant's period of coverage under theFSA. Expenses are treated as having been incurred when the participantis provided with the medical care that gives rise to the medical expenses,and not when the participant is formally billed or charged for, or paysfor the medical care. Also, expenses are not treated as incurred duringa period of FSA coverage if such expenses are incurred before the laterof the date the health FSA is first in existence or the participant firstbecomes enrolled under the health FSA. (7) <T3>FSA experience gains. </T3>If a health FSA has an experience gain withrespect to a year of coverage, the excess of the premiums paid (e.g., employercontributions, including salary reduction contributions and after-tax employeecontributions) and income (if any) of the FSA over the FSA's total claimsreimbursements and reasonable administrative costs for the year may beused to reduce required premiums for the following year or may be returnedto the premium payers (the participants for premiums paid by salary reductionor employee contributions) as dividends or premium refunds. Such experiencegains must be allocated among premium payers on a reasonable and uniformbasis. It is permissible to allocate such amounts based on the differentcoverage levels under the FSA received by the premium payers. However,in no case may the experience gains be allocated among premium payers based(directly or indirectly) on their individual claims experience. The requirementsof this paragraph (b)(7) are illustrated in the following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Assume that an employer maintains a cafeteria plan underwhich its 1.200 employees may elect one of several different annual coveragelevels under a health FSA in $100 increments from $500 to $2,000. For aplan year, 1,000 employees elect levels of coverage under the health FSA.For such year, the FSA has an experience gain of $5,000 (i.e., premiumpayments for the year exceed reimbursed claims plus administrative costsby $5,000). The $5,000 may be allocated to all premium payers for the year,as a premium refund, on a per capita basis weighted to reflect the participants'elected levels of coverage. Alternatively, the $5,000 may be used to reducethe required premiums under the health FSA for all eligible employees forthe next plan year (e.g., a $500 health FSA for the next year might bepriced at $480) or to reimburse claims incurred above the elective limitin such year as long as such reimbursements are made in a nondiscriminatorymanner.</ITAG>(8) <T3>Dependent care assistance. </T3>Analogous rules to this paragraph (b),with the exception of paragraph (b)(2) relating to uniform coverage throughoutthe coverage period, are applicable to dependent care assistance providedunder section 129. See Qandamp;A-18 of andSection; 1.125-1. (c) <T3>Definition of flexible spending arrangement. </T3>A flexible spendingarrangement (FSA) generally is a benefit program that provides employeeswith coverage under which specified, incurred expenses may be reimbursed(subject to reimbursement maximums and any other reasonable conditions)and under which the maximum amount of reimbursement that is reasonablyavailable to a participant for a period of coverage is not substantiallyin excess of the total premium (including both employee-paid and employer-paidportions of the premium) for such participant's coverage. A maximum amountof reimbursement is not substantially in excess of the total premium ifsuch maximum amount is less than 500 percent of the premium. A single FSAmay provide participants with different levels of coverage and maximumamounts of reimbursement. However, for purposes of section 89, each differentlevel of coverage under a FSA is a separate plan. (d) <T3>Effective date. </T3>This Qandamp;A-7 is effective for plan years beginningafter December 31, 1989. (e) <T3>Authority to issue additional requirements. </T3>The Commissioner,in revenue rulings, notices and other publications of general applicability,may make any modification to, or issue such additional requirements forthe application of, the rules contained in this Qandamp;A-7 as may be necessaryto insure proper compliance with the intent of such rules. (f) <T3>Example. </T3>The provisions of paragraph (c) of this Qandamp;A-7 areillustrated by the following example:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 1. </T3>Assume that an employer with 1,000 employees maintainsa cafeteria plan under which the employees may elect among several benefitoptions, including insured health plans and HMOs. The plan provides thatthe required premiums or contributions for the benefits are to be madeby salary reduction. Even though the plan may characterize employees' premiumpayments and other contributions as flexible spending contributions orcredits, the operation of a cafeteria plan to permit employees' contributionsto be made on a salary reduction basis does not, standing alone, causethe plan (or any benefit thereunder) to be treated as a flexible spendingarrangement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2. </T3>Assume that an employer with 1,000 employees maintainsa cafeteria plan under which the employees may elect, among other benefits,a level of coverage under an arrangement that will reimburse medical expensesincurred during a year up to the specified amount elected by the employee.The maximum amount of reimbursement that can be deducted for a year is$5,000.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Each employee's premium for such coverage is equal to the maximumreimbursement amount selected by the employee. Such an arrangement is ahealth FSA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Lawrence B. Gibbs, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Internal Revenue. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-5136 Filed 3-2-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4830-01-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>